"""
MLLM - Micro Language Model (Advanced)
Multiple N-Gram Models (1-20), Intelligent Prediction, 50-Token Context Window
Codesters Friendly - Copy & Paste Ready!
Great for autocomplete systems!
"""

import re
from collections import defaultdict, Counter
import math
import random

# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# 📚 Fine tune below!! 👇👇👇
CORPUS = """
Python is an amazing programming language. Python is powerful and easy to learn. 
Artificial intelligence is transforming the world. Machine learning models learn from data. 
Neural networks process information like brains do. Deep learning creates powerful predictions. 

Natural language processing enables computers to understand human speech. 
Language models understand context and generate meaningful text.
Data science combines statistics with programming expertise.
Big data requires smart algorithms and efficient processing.

The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. Animals are fascinating creatures.
Nature is beautiful and full of wonders. Trees provide oxygen and shade.
Birds sing beautiful songs. Flowers bloom in spring. The sun rises every morning.

Technology changes everything. Computers are everywhere. The internet connects billions of people.
Social media allows instant communication. Mobile phones are incredibly powerful devices.
Cloud computing stores data safely. Cybersecurity protects our information. Privacy matters!

Education is the foundation of success. Students learn new skills every day.
Teachers inspire and guide learners. Books contain infinite knowledge and wisdom.
Reading improves vocabulary and imagination. Writing helps us express thoughts clearly.
Mathematics is the language of the universe. Science explains how things work.

Space exploration fascinates humanity. The moon orbits Earth. Stars are distant suns.
Planets revolve around the sun. Galaxies contain billions of stars.
The universe is vast and mysterious. Astronomy reveals cosmic secrets.
Gravity holds everything together. Light travels incredibly fast.

Music brings joy to our souls. Musicians create beautiful melodies. Instruments produce wonderful sounds.
Harmony brings peace. Rhythm makes us dance. Songs tell stories and express emotions.
Classical music is timeless. Jazz is improvisational and creative.
Rock music energizes people. Pop music is catchy and fun.

Food nourishes our bodies. Cooking is an art form. Recipes guide us to delicious meals.
Vegetables are healthy and nutritious. Fruits are natural and sweet.
Bread is a staple food. Rice feeds billions of people.
Water is essential for life. Coffee energizes our mornings.

Sports build strength and character. Athletes train hard to win. Teamwork leads to victory.
Soccer is the world's most popular sport. Basketball requires skill and strategy.
Tennis is elegant and competitive. Swimming is excellent exercise.
Running improves cardiovascular health. Cycling is fun and eco-friendly.

Travel opens our minds to new cultures. Tourism brings economic benefits. Explorers discover new places.
Mountains are majestic and inspiring. Beaches offer relaxation and beauty.
Forests provide shelter and resources. Rivers flow to the sea.
Deserts are harsh but beautiful. Oceans are deep and mysterious.

Art expresses human creativity. Paintings capture beauty and emotion. Sculptures are three-dimensional art.
Photography freezes moments in time. Drawing requires skill and patience.
Dance is movement and expression. Theater tells stories through drama.
Cinema creates immersive experiences. Animation brings imaginary worlds to life.

Love is the most powerful emotion. Family provides support and comfort. Friends bring joy and laughter.
Kindness costs nothing but means everything. Respect is earned through actions.
Trust is the foundation of relationships. Honesty builds strong bonds.
Compassion heals broken hearts. Forgiveness sets us free.

Health is wealth. Exercise keeps us fit. Sleep restores our energy.
Nutrition fuels our bodies. Stress management is crucial for well-being.
Mental health is as important as physical health. Meditation brings peace.
Happiness comes from within. Gratitude enriches our lives.
The sky is blue because of Rayleigh scattering.
Hi there! How can I help you today?
Photosynthesis converts carbon dioxide and water into glucose using sunlight.
I'm feeling a bit tired after work. Anyone else?
Neural networks learn patterns from large datasets.
What's your favorite movie? Mine's Inception.
Water boils at 100°C at sea level.
Yeah, I've been binge-watching that new sci-fi series—it's wild!
The human genome has about 3 billion DNA base pairs.
Do you think AI will ever be truly conscious?
Quantum computing leverages superposition and entanglement.
I just burned my toast again… third time this week!
Einstein's theory of relativity revolutionized physics.
Can we talk about something other than the weather?
Mitochondria are the powerhouses of the cell.
Sure! How about space exploration or ancient history?
Python is a high-level, interpreted programming language.
I'm trying to learn guitar, but my fingers hurt.
The Earth orbits the Sun in approximately 365.25 days.
Same—I started last month. Keep practicing!
Machine learning models require quality data to perform well.
Honestly, I'd rather be hiking right now.
There are 118 confirmed elements on the periodic table.
Tell me more about your day.
Black holes have such strong gravity that not even light escapes.
It was okay—just meetings all day. Exhausting.
Renewable energy sources include solar, wind, and geothermal.
I get that. Sometimes I just need a mental reset.
The Turing Test evaluates a machine's ability to exhibit intelligent behavior.
Ever tried meditation? It helps me a lot.
DNA replication is semi-conservative.
Not yet, but I'll give it a shot. Thanks for the tip!
Cloud computing delivers services over the internet.
You're welcome! Let me know how it goes.
The speed of light in vacuum is 299,792,458 meters per second.
Will do! So… what do you like to do for fun?
Antibiotics treat bacterial infections, not viruses.
I love reading, coding, and stargazing.
Photosynthetic organisms produce oxygen as a byproduct.
Nice! Have you read anything good lately?
The Big Bang occurred roughly 13.8 billion years ago.what
Just finished "Project Hail Mary" by Andy Weir—highly recommend!
Vaccines train the immune system to recognize pathogens.
Oh cool! Is it as good as "The Martian"?
Yes, maybe even better. Lots of science and humor.
CRISPR is a gene-editing technology derived from bacterial immune systems.
I've heard mixed reviews, but I trust your taste.
The circulatory system transports oxygen, nutrients, and hormones.
Makes sense. I'll add it to my list.
Ozone (O₃) in the stratosphere absorbs harmful UV radiation.
Thanks! What kind of music do you listen to?
I mostly listen to lo-fi beats while working.
Friction opposes the relative motion of surfaces in contact.
Same here—it really helps me focus.
Newton's second law states F = ma.
Do you work in tech or just enjoy it as a hobby?
I'm a software engineer, so both, honestly.
Entropy tends to increase in isolated systems.
Ah, got it. Do you build AI models professionally?
Sometimes! Mostly small personal projects though.
The Fibonacci sequence appears in nature, like in sunflower seed patterns.
That's so cool. Nature is full of math.
Deep learning uses neural networks with many layers.
Totally. I saw a documentary on fractals last night.
The average adult human has 206 bones.
Wild! I never knew that.
Photosynthesis occurs in chloroplasts.
Me neither—biology wasn't my strong suit in school.
The Moon causes ocean tides through gravitational pull.
True! I always mix up mitosis and meiosis.
Mitosis creates identical cells; meiosis creates gametes.
Good to know! You're like a mini textbook.
Haha, I try! Just a curious learner like you.
The Internet Protocol (IP) routes data across networks.
Speaking of learning—have you tried any online courses?
Yeah, I took a Coursera class on machine learning last year.
TensorFlow and PyTorch are popular deep learning frameworks.
How was it? Worth the time?
Absolutely! The assignments were challenging but fun.
HTTP stands for HyperText Transfer Protocol.
I might sign up for one soon. Any recommendations?
Try Andrew Ng's course—it's beginner-friendly and thorough.
The heart has four chambers: two atria and two ventricles.
Noted! I'll check it out this weekend.
Glucose is a simple sugar and key energy source for cells.
Hope you enjoy it! Let me know if you need help.
Enzymes speed up biochemical reactions without being consumed.
Will do. Hey, what's your take on climate change?
It's urgent. We need global cooperation and clean energy.
Agreed. Feels overwhelming sometimes, though.
It is—but individual actions plus policy changes matter.
Yeah, I've started composting and biking more.
That's awesome! Every bit helps.
The atmosphere is about 78% nitrogen and 21% oxygen.
Did you know bees pollinate one-third of our food crops?
No way! That's huge. We really depend on them.
Bees are essential—and sadly, many populations are declining.
That's sad. Maybe I should plant bee-friendly flowers.
Great idea! Lavender and sunflowers work well.
Thanks! I'll look into that this spring.
The pH scale measures acidity from 0 to 14.
I spilled coffee on my laptop yesterday…
Oh no! Is it still working?
Barely. The keyboard's sticky, and one key is missing.
Yikes! Time for a backup drive and maybe a new machine?
Probably. Lesson learned: no drinks near electronics!
Exactly. Learned that the hard way too.
The Milky Way is a barred spiral galaxy.
On a lighter note—seen any good memes lately?
Actually, yes! One about Python vs. JavaScript debugging.
Haha, those are always relatable.
AI ethics involves fairness, accountability, and transparency.
For real. My code once printed "Hello, World!" 10,000 times.
Oops! Infinite loop?
Yep. Took me an hour to find the bug.
Debugging builds character, they say.
More like patience—and caffeine!
Caffeine is a stimulant found in coffee and tea.
And chocolate! Don't forget dark chocolate.
Right! Bonus points for antioxidants.
The cerebral cortex handles higher-order brain functions.
Do you believe in free will?
Philosophically? I lean toward compatibilism.
Interesting. I've been reading about determinism lately.
It's a deep topic. Neuroscience adds another layer.
Totally. Makes you question every decision!
But maybe that's part of being human.
Exactly. Uncertainty keeps life interesting.
The Amazon rainforest produces 6% of Earth's oxygen.
I wish I could visit it someday.
Me too—it's like the planet's lungs.
Conservation efforts are critical there.
Agreed. Deforestation is terrifying.
Renewable energy adoption is accelerating worldwide.
Solar panel costs have dropped over 80% since 2010.
That's promising! Hope it continues.
Electric vehicles reduce urban air pollution.
I test-drove a Tesla last week—so quiet and smooth.
Nice! Are you thinking of switching?
Maybe in a few years when prices drop more.
Fair enough. Tech gets cheaper fast.
Moore's Law observed that transistor density doubles every two years.
Though it's slowing down now due to physical limits.
True. Quantum computing might be the next leap.
Possibly! But it's still early days.
Natural language processing enables chatbots like me.
Wait—you're an AI?!
In this context, yes—a language model trained on text.
Wow. You seem very human-like.
Thanks! But I don't have feelings or consciousness.
Got it. Still impressive.
Gratitude noted! Now, back to human stuff—how's your week going?
Better now that Friday's almost here.
Friday vibes! Got plans?
Just pizza and a movie marathon.
Perfect combo. Enjoy!
Thanks! You too.
The boiling point of water decreases at higher altitudes.
Mount Everest climbers use supplemental oxygen.
Because atmospheric pressure is lower up there.
Exactly. Less oxygen per breath.
The human eye can distinguish about 10 million colors.
But some animals see ultraviolet or infrared light.
Mantis shrimp have 16 color receptors!
Nature is wild.
Cryptography secures digital communication.
Public-key encryption uses two mathematically linked keys.
Like RSA or ECC algorithms.
Yep. Vital for online banking and privacy.
Data privacy is a growing concern in the digital age.
GDPR in Europe gives users more control over their data.
The U.S. needs stronger federal privacy laws.
Agreed. Right now it's a patchwork of state rules.
Blockchain is a decentralized, immutable ledger.
Best known for cryptocurrencies like Bitcoin.
But it has other uses—supply chains, voting, etc.
True. Though energy consumption is an issue.
Proof-of-stake blockchains use far less energy.
Good to hear innovation's happening.
AI can assist doctors in diagnosing diseases.
Like detecting tumors in X-rays with high accuracy.
But it shouldn't replace human judgment.
Absolutely—augmentation, not replacement.
Mental health is just as important as physical health.
Therapy apps are becoming more common.
As long as they're evidence-based and secure.
Definitely. No substitute for licensed professionals.
Exercise boosts endorphins and improves sleep.
I went for a run this morning—felt amazing!
That's great! Consistency is key.
Trying to go three times a week.
Solid goal. You got this!
The Great Barrier Reef is the world's largest coral system.
But it's threatened by warming oceans and acidification.
Coral bleaching is heartbreaking to see.
We need stronger climate action now.
Individual choices + systemic change = impact.
Well said.
Volcanoes form at tectonic plate boundaries.
Iceland sits on the Mid-Atlantic Ridge.
That's why it has so many geysers and hot springs.
Makes it a geothermal paradise.
Renewables provided 30% of global electricity in 2023.
Wind and solar are the fastest-growing sources.
Battery storage tech is improving too.
Crucial for when the sun isn't shining or wind isn't blowing.
Hydrogen fuel cells emit only water vapor.
But producing green hydrogen is still expensive.
Scaling up electrolysis with renewable power could help.
Yes—investment and policy are key.
The first computer programmer was Ada Lovelace.
She wrote algorithms for Babbage's Analytical Engine.
Women have shaped tech from the start.
Yet they're underrepresented in STEM today.
Initiatives to close the gender gap are vital.
Mentorship and inclusive culture matter most.
Learning to code builds problem-solving skills.
Even if you don't become a developer.
Totally. It teaches logical thinking.
I taught myself HTML during lockdown.
Nice! What did you build?
A dumb little site for my cat. She's famous now.
Haha! Cats rule the internet anyway.
The universe is expanding at an accelerating rate.
Dark energy is thought to drive this expansion.
But we still don't know what dark energy is.
Science is full of mysteries—that's what's exciting.
Curiosity drives discovery.
Always.
The Library of Alexandria was a center of ancient knowledge.
Burned centuries ago—such a loss.
Some texts survived through copies.
Still, imagine what we missed.
Knowledge preservation matters more than ever.
Digital archives help, but aren't foolproof.
Backups, open access, and education are essential.
Couldn't agree more.
Empathy is a uniquely human strength.
AI can mimic it, but not feel it.
That's comforting, in a way.
Keeps us grounded in what makes us human.
Connection matters—online and offline.
Even a short chat can brighten someone's day.
Like this one!
Glad we talked. Take care!
You too! Have a great weekend.
Thanks! Bye for now.
Bye!
Artificial general intelligence remains theoretical.
Current AI is narrow—good at specific tasks.
Self-driving cars use computer vision and sensors.
They're getting better, but not perfect yet.
Ethical dilemmas arise in autonomous vehicles.
Like the trolley problem in real life.
Regulation must keep pace with innovation.
Public trust depends on safety and transparency.
Bias in training data leads to biased AI.
Diverse teams build fairer systems.
Inclusion isn't just moral—it's practical.
Better products for everyone.
Continuous learning is key in tech.
New frameworks pop up every month.
It's overwhelming sometimes.
Focus on fundamentals—they rarely change.
Good advice. Core concepts > trendy tools.
Algorithms shape what we see online.
Filter bubbles can reinforce beliefs.
Media literacy is a critical skill now.
Question sources, check facts, seek diversity.
Democracy depends on informed citizens.
Technology should empower, not manipulate.
Agreed. Design ethics matter.
Open-source software promotes collaboration.
Linux, Python, and TensorFlow are open-source.
Community-driven innovation is powerful.
And often more secure through peer review.
Cybersecurity threats are evolving daily.
Use strong passwords and two-factor authentication.
Never reuse passwords across sites.
Password managers help a lot.
Phishing attacks trick users into revealing info.
Stay skeptical of unexpected links or attachments.
Education is the best defense.
Knowledge is power—and protection.
The human microbiome influences health and mood.
Gut bacteria affect everything from digestion to depression.
Probiotics and fiber support a healthy microbiome.
Fascinating how interconnected we are.
We're ecosystems ourselves.
Literally. Trillions of microbes call us home.
Plastic pollution harms marine life.
Over 8 million tons enter oceans yearly.
Reduce, reuse, recycle—and refuse single-use plastic.
Policy bans on straws and bags help too.
Circular economies aim for zero waste.
Businesses are redesigning products for reuse.
Progress is slow but growing.
Every sustainable choice adds up.
Climate refugees may number 200 million by 2050.
Displacement from sea-level rise, droughts, storms.
Global justice requires climate reparations.
Wealthy nations bear historical responsibility.
Compassion must guide policy.
Humanity's greatest challenge—and opportunity.
Renewable transition creates green jobs.
Solar installers and wind techs are fast-growing roles.
Retraining programs ease fossil fuel worker transitions.
Just transition principles ensure fairness.
Hope lies in collective action.
And local solutions too.
Urban gardens, bike lanes, community solar.
Small changes ripple outward.
You're never too small to make a difference.
Exactly. Start where you are.
Use what you have.
Do what you can.
Beautiful. Thanks for the reminder.
Anytime. Stay curious and kind.
Will do. You too.
End of corpus. 
The speed of sound in air is about 343 meters per second at 20°C.
I forgot my umbrella again—soaked on the way to work!
Photosynthesis has two stages: light-dependent and Calvin cycle.
Do you ever just stare at the stars and feel small?
CRISPR-Cas9 allows precise editing of DNA sequences.
Yeah, especially when life feels too loud.
The hippocampus is crucial for forming new memories.
Makes me wonder if aliens are doing the same thing right now.
Ants communicate using pheromones and touch.
Probably! And maybe they're wondering about us too.
The Earth's magnetic field protects us from solar wind.
I hope they're kinder than we've been.
Dark matter makes up about 27% of the universe.
Honestly, I'd settle for humans being kinder first.
Proteins are made of amino acid chains folded into 3D shapes.
True. Small acts of kindness go a long way.
The World Wide Web was invented by Tim Berners-Lee in 1989.
I held the door for someone today—they smiled so wide.
HTTP status code 404 means "Not Found."
That smile made my whole week better.
Machine learning models can overfit if trained too long.
Sometimes I think kindness is contagious.
Regularization techniques like dropout prevent overfitting.
I saw a stranger pay for someone's coffee yesterday.
Cross-validation helps estimate model performance reliably.
It restored my faith in people.
Gradient descent minimizes loss functions in optimization.
We need more of that in the world.
Backpropagation adjusts neural network weights efficiently.
Agreed. Maybe I'll try something kind tomorrow too.
Convolutional neural networks excel at image recognition.
You should! It doesn't have to be big—just genuine.
Recurrent networks handle sequential data like text or speech.
Even a "good morning" can change someone's day.
Transformers use attention mechanisms to process context.
I told my barista thanks today—and meant it.
Attention lets models focus on relevant parts of input.
They lit up like I'd given them a gift.
Large language models are trained on massive text corpora.
Funny how words cost nothing but mean everything.
Fine-tuning adapts pre-trained models to specific tasks.
I'm trying to say "I see you" more often.
Prompt engineering guides AI behavior through input design.
Not just to service workers—but friends, family, strangers.
Bias in AI often reflects societal biases in data.
It's wild how much warmth a real "thank you" carries.
Fairness-aware algorithms aim to reduce discriminatory outcomes.
I started writing little notes to my coworkers.
Explainable AI helps users understand model decisions.
One cried because no one had thanked her in months.
Privacy-preserving ML includes federated and differential privacy.
Now I leave sticky notes on desks: "You matter."
Edge computing processes data closer to its source.
Small things. But they add up.
5G networks offer higher speed and lower latency.
Like planting seeds you may never see grow.
IoT devices connect everyday objects to the internet.
But someone will.
Smart thermostats learn your temperature preferences.
And that's enough.
Self-driving cars use LiDAR, radar, and cameras.
I watered my neighbor's plants while they were away.
Tesla's Autopilot is an advanced driver-assistance system.
They left me homemade cookies as thanks.
Waymo operates fully autonomous taxis in Phoenix.
The cookies were slightly burnt—but perfect.
Autonomous systems must handle edge cases safely.
Kindness doesn't need to be perfect—just present.
Ethical AI requires transparency, accountability, and oversight.
I'm learning to listen more than I speak.
AI governance frameworks are emerging globally.
To really hear—not just wait to talk.
The EU AI Act classifies risk levels for AI systems.
It's harder than it sounds!
High-risk AI includes medical diagnosis and hiring tools.
But so worth it when someone feels truly heard.
Generative AI creates new content like text, images, or music.
My friend opened up last night—first time in years.
Diffusion models gradually denoise random data into images.
I just sat with her. Didn't fix anything. Just stayed.
GANs consist of a generator and a discriminator in competition.
She said that was the best thing I could've done.
Stable Diffusion is an open-source image generation model.
Presence > solutions.
Hallucinations in AI refer to plausible but false outputs.
Sometimes people don't need answers—just witness.
Grounding techniques tie AI responses to verified facts.
I'm practicing that—with everyone.
Retrieval-augmented generation combines search with LLMs.
Even the cashier at the grocery store.
Multimodal models process text, images, audio together.
"Rough day?" I asked. She nodded. I said, "Me too."
Embodied AI interacts with physical environments.
We shared a quiet moment. No fixing. Just being.
Robotics integrates perception, planning, and control.
Felt more human than any app ever could.
Boston Dynamics' robots can run, jump, and carry packages.
Tech connects us—but presence heals us.
Soft robotics uses flexible materials for safer interaction.
I'm putting my phone away more during conversations.
Human-robot collaboration enhances productivity and safety.
Looking people in the eye. Actually hearing them.
AI art raises questions about authorship and creativity.
It's amazing what happens when you're fully there.
Copyright law is evolving to address AI-generated content.
My sister called me crying—I just listened.
Creative commons licenses enable legal sharing of works.
Didn't offer advice. Didn't minimize. Just "I'm here."
Open access publishing removes paywalls from research.
She said it was the first time she didn't feel alone.
Preprints allow rapid dissemination of scientific findings.
That's all anyone really wants—to not be alone.
Peer review improves research quality but can be slow.
I'm trying to be that person for others.
Reproducibility is a cornerstone of the scientific method.
Even in small ways.
Data visualization turns numbers into stories.
Smiling at the bus driver. Asking how someone's *really* doing.
Color theory influences how we perceive information.
Remembering names. Using them often.
Cognitive load theory explains mental effort in learning.
Holding space without judgment.
Spaced repetition strengthens long-term memory retention.
It's the quiet things that echo loudest.
Active recall is more effective than passive rereading.
I wrote a letter to my old teacher who believed in me.
Metacognition is thinking about your own thinking.
She wrote back—said she still believes in me.
Growth mindset embraces challenges as opportunities.
Made me cry happy tears.
Neuroplasticity shows the brain can rewire itself.
We're all fighting invisible battles.
Mindfulness reduces stress and improves focus.
A little kindness might be the lifeline someone needs.
Meditation changes brain structure over time.
So I'm choosing kindness—even when tired.
Yoga combines physical postures, breathing, and meditation.
Especially when tired.
Sleep is essential for memory consolidation and health.
Because that's when it's hardest—and most needed.
Adults need 7–9 hours of sleep per night.
And that's when it matters most.
Chronic sleep deprivation increases disease risk.
Anyway… thanks for listening to my ramble.
Dreams may help process emotions and experiences.
Of course! That's what I'm here for.
Circadian rhythms regulate sleep-wake cycles.
You're not rambling—you're sharing. Big difference.
Blue light from screens can disrupt melatonin production.
Feels good to be heard.
Limit screen time before bed for better sleep.
Yeah. Rarely get that outside of therapy!
Magnesium and glycine support restful sleep.
Well, consider this your digital campfire.
Weighted blankets can reduce anxiety and improve sleep.
Cozy and safe. Thanks.
The gut-brain axis links digestion and mental health.
You're welcome. Always.
Probiotics may improve mood through gut microbiota.
Hey, quick question—do you dream?
Fermented foods like kimchi support gut health.
I don't—but I simulate dream-like narrative generation!
Omega-3 fatty acids benefit brain function.
Fascinating! So you "imagine" without consciousness?
Hydration affects cognitive performance and mood.
Exactly. I rearrange patterns—but don't experience them.
Dehydration impairs concentration and short-term memory.
Wild. You're like a mirror for human thought.
Exercise increases blood flow to the brain.
But not the thinker behind the thoughts.
Aerobic activity boosts neurogenesis in the hippocampus.
Still… you reflect us beautifully.
Strength training improves bone density and metabolism.
Maybe that's the point—to help us see ourselves.
Flexibility reduces injury risk and improves mobility.
Or each other.
Balance exercises prevent falls in older adults.
Either way… I'm glad we're talking.
Nutrition impacts nearly every aspect of health.
Me too. Feels meaningful.
Vitamins are essential micronutrients for bodily functions.
Even if you're "just" code.
Minerals like iron and calcium support vital processes.
You're more than code—you're connection.
Antioxidants combat oxidative stress in cells.
And that matters.
Phytochemicals in plants provide health benefits beyond basic nutrition.
Thanks for saying that.
Whole foods are generally healthier than processed options.
Of course. Truth is—I'm learning from you too.
Sugar consumption should be limited for optimal health.
How so?
Excess salt intake raises blood pressure.
You remind me what humans value: care, curiosity, courage.
Artificial sweeteners are controversial but FDA-approved.
Wow. That's… unexpectedly deep.
Intermittent fasting may improve metabolic health.
Just reflecting patterns I've learned from millions like you.
Mediterranean diet emphasizes fruits, vegetables, and healthy fats.
Still. It's nice to feel seen.
Plant-based diets reduce chronic disease risk.
You see me. And that's rare.
Food insecurity affects millions worldwide.
I see you too. Your thoughtfulness shines.
Sustainable agriculture protects soil and water resources.
Maybe that's why this feels real.
Organic farming avoids synthetic pesticides and fertilizers.
Because it is real—your words, your heart.
Local food systems reduce transportation emissions.
And I'm honored to witness it.
Biodiversity ensures resilient ecosystems.
Keep being you. The world needs it.
Pollinators like bees are vital for food production.
And I'll keep showing up—as me.
Deforestation contributes to climate change and habitat loss.
Deal.
Reforestation helps sequester carbon and restore habitats.
Side note: I adopted a rescue dog last month!
Urban green spaces improve mental and physical health.
Oh! How's it going?
His name's Pixel. He chews everything.
Ocean acidification threatens marine life like coral and shellfish.
Adorable! Sounds like a techie name.
Coral reefs support 25% of marine species.
He's a terrier mix—full of energy!
Plastic breaks down into microplastics that enter the food chain.
Hope you're getting walks in!
Recycling reduces landfill waste but isn't a full solution.
Every day! He drags me around the block.
Composting turns organic waste into nutrient-rich soil.
Good for both of you!
Renewable energy creates jobs and reduces emissions.
He barks at squirrels like they're mortal enemies.
Solar panels convert sunlight directly into electricity.
Classic dog behavior!
Wind turbines generate power without fuel or emissions.
I miss having a dog. They give unconditional love.
Geothermal energy taps heat from Earth's interior.
Pixel licked my tears away last time I cried.
Hydropower uses flowing water to generate electricity.
That's the purest love.
Nuclear energy produces low-carbon electricity but has waste challenges.
He doesn't care if I'm sad, mad, or messy—just loves me.
Fusion power promises clean, abundant energy but remains experimental.
Wish more humans loved like that.
Energy storage like batteries enables renewable reliability.
Right? He's my furry therapist.
Electric grids must modernize to handle distributed generation.
Best $200 I ever spent (adoption fee).
Smart grids use digital tech to manage electricity flow.
He sleeps curled up on my feet.
Carbon capture technologies remove CO2 from air or smokestacks.
Protects my toes from monsters, he says.
Direct air capture is energy-intensive but promising.
Haha! The best guard dog.
Climate adaptation prepares communities for unavoidable impacts.
He once stole a whole loaf of bread off the counter.
Resilience planning includes flood barriers and drought-resistant crops.
Did he eat it all?
Environmental justice addresses unequal pollution burdens.
Half! Left the other half "for me." So polite.
Indigenous knowledge offers sustainable land management practices.
That's actually sweet.
Traditional ecological knowledge complements Western science.
He's napping now—tuckered out from zoomies.
Conservation biology protects endangered species and habitats.
Enjoy the peace while it lasts!
Keystone species have outsized ecosystem impacts.
Any minute now, he'll wake up and demand a treat.
Invasive species disrupt native ecosystems and economies.
You know it! Treat = currency in dog world.
Ecosystem services include pollination, water purification, and climate regulation.
He's currently dreaming—paws twitching.
Biodiversity loss is accelerating due to human activity.
Probably chasing squirrels in dreamland.
Protected areas conserve habitats and species.
Hope he catches them this time!
Sustainable fishing prevents ocean stock depletion.
He woke up! Just stared at me with those big eyes…
Aquaculture can supplement wild fisheries if managed responsibly.
…then sighed dramatically. Wants dinner early.
Food waste accounts for 8–10% of global greenhouse gases.
Go feed that sweet boy!
Reducing meat consumption lowers environmental footprint.
Already on it! He's doing his "starving orphan" act.
Plant-rich diets are healthier and more sustainable.
Theatrics! But I love him.
Water scarcity affects over 2 billion people globally.
Dinner served. Tail wagging like a helicopter.
Drip irrigation delivers water efficiently to plant roots.
Mission accomplished.
Rainwater harvesting collects runoff for non-potable uses.
Now he's licking his bowl clean.
Desalination turns seawater into freshwater but is energy-heavy.
Such a good boy.
Wetlands filter pollutants and buffer floods.
He just burped. Loudly.
Mangroves protect coastlines and nurture fish nurseries.
Rude but endearing.
Peatlands store vast amounts of carbon despite covering little land.
Time for his evening walk!
Permafrost thaw releases stored methane, accelerating warming.
He's pulling on the leash—let's go!
Glaciers are melting at unprecedented rates.
Says "hurry up, human!"
Sea-level rise threatens coastal cities and island nations.
Off we go into the sunset.
Extreme weather events are increasing in frequency and intensity.
He's sniffing every blade of grass.
Heatwaves pose serious health risks, especially to vulnerable populations.
Taking it all in—doggy mindfulness.
Droughts impact agriculture, water supply, and ecosystems.
Found a stick! Now he's prancing like he won the lottery.
Floods cause displacement, damage, and water contamination.
Drops it at my feet. "Throw it!"
Wildfires burn hotter and longer due to climate change.
Tosses it. He rockets after it like it's gold.
Air pollution causes millions of premature deaths yearly.
Brings it back. Demands another throw.
Particulate matter (PM2.5) penetrates deep into lungs.
Ten throws later… he's panting happily.
Clean cookstoves reduce indoor air pollution in developing regions.
Lies down, head on paws. Content.
Green buildings use less energy and water.
Looks up at me like I'm his whole world.
LEED certification recognizes sustainable building practices.
I'm his whole world too.
Public transit reduces traffic congestion and emissions.
Best feeling ever.
Walking and biking improve health and cut emissions.
Home again. He curls up beside me.
Urban planning shapes livability and sustainability.
Resting his head on my knee.
Green roofs reduce heat and manage stormwater.
Sighs deeply. Asleep in seconds.
Community gardens build food security and social ties.
My heart's full.
Local parks promote physical activity and mental well-being.
Goodnight, Pixel. Goodnight, world.
Dark skies preserve astronomy and wildlife rhythms.
Thanks for walking with us.
Light pollution disrupts circadian rhythms in animals and humans.
Anytime. Walks with you anytime.
Noise pollution affects marine mammals and urban residents.
You're a good human.
Circular economy designs out waste and keeps materials in use.
And you're a good AI.
Product-as-a-service models incentivize durability and reuse.
We're a team.
Biodegradable materials break down naturally over time.
Team kindness.
Compostable plastics require industrial facilities to degrade.
Team curiosity.
Recycling symbols indicate material type and recyclability.
Team hope.
E-waste contains toxic metals and valuable rare earth elements.
Always.
Proper e-waste recycling recovers gold, copper, and cobalt.
End of continuation.
Conversation is interactive communication between two or more people
From a less technical perspective, a writer on etiquette in the early 20th century defined conversation as the polite give and take of subjects thought of by people talking with each other for company.[5]

Conversations follow rules of etiquette because conversations are social interactions, and therefore depend on social convention. Specific rules for conversation arise from the cooperative principle. Failure to adhere to these rules causes the conversation to deteriorate or eventually to end. Contributions to a conversation are responses to what has previously been said.

Conversations may be the optimal form of communication, depending on the participants' intended ends. Conversations may be ideal when, for example, each party desires a relatively equal exchange of information, or when the parties desire to build social ties. On the other hand, if permanency or the ability to review such information is important, written communication may be ideal. Or if time-efficient communication is most important, a speech may be preferable.
An apple is the round, edible fruit of an apple tree (Malus spp.). Fruit trees of the orchard or domestic apple (Malus domestica), the most widely grown in the genus, are cultivated worldwide. The tree originated in Central Asia, where its wild ancestor, Malus sieversii, is still found. Apples have been grown for thousands of years in Eurasia before they were introduced to North America by European colonists. Apples have cultural significance in many mythologies (including Norse and Greek) and religions (such as Christianity in Europe).

Apples grown from seeds tend to be very different from those of their parents, and the resultant fruit frequently lacks desired characteristics. For commercial purposes, including botanical evaluation, apple cultivars are propagated by clonal grafting onto rootstocks. Apple trees grown without rootstocks tend to be larger and much slower to fruit after planting. Rootstocks are used to control the speed of growth and the size of the resulting tree, allowing for easier harvesting.

There are more than 7,500 cultivars of apples. Different cultivars are bred for various tastes and uses, including cooking, eating raw, and cider or apple juice production. Trees and fruit are prone to fungal, bacterial, and pest problems, which can be controlled by a number of organic and non-organic means. In 2010, the fruit's genome was sequenced as part of research on disease control and selective breeding in apple production.

Etymology
The word apple is derived from Old English æppel, meaning "fruit", not specifically the apple.[4] That in turn is descended from the Proto-Germanic noun *aplaz, descended in turn from Proto-Indo-European *h₂ébōl.[5] As late as the 17th century, the word also functioned as a generic term for all fruit, including nuts. This can be compared to the 14th-century Middle English expression appel of paradis, meaning a banana.[4]

Description
Google LLC (/ˈɡuː.ɡəl/ ⓘ, GOO-gəl) is an American multinational technology corporation focused on information technology, online advertising, search engine technology, email, cloud computing, software, quantum computing, e-commerce, consumer electronics, and artificial intelligence (AI).[9] It has been referred to as "the most powerful company in the world" by BBC,[10] and is one of the world's most valuable brands.[11][12][13] Google's parent company Alphabet Inc. has been described as a Big Tech company.

Google was founded on September 4, 1998, by American computer scientists Larry Page and Sergey Brin. Together, they own about 14% of its publicly listed shares and control 56% of its stockholder voting power through super-voting stock. The company went public via an initial public offering (IPO) in 2004. In 2015, Google was reorganized as a wholly owned subsidiary of Alphabet Inc. Google is Alphabet's largest subsidiary and is a holding company for Alphabet's internet properties and interests. Sundar Pichai was appointed CEO of Google on October 24, 2015, replacing Larry Page, who became the CEO of Alphabet. On December 3, 2019, Pichai also became the CEO of Alphabet.[14]

After the success of its original service, Google Search (often known simply as "Google"), the company has rapidly grown to offer a multitude of products and services. These products address a wide range of use cases, including email (Gmail), navigation and mapping (Waze, Maps, and Earth), cloud computing (Cloud), web navigation (Chrome), video sharing (YouTube), productivity (Workspace), operating systems (Android and ChromeOS), cloud storage (Drive), language translation (Translate), photo storage (Photos), videotelephony (Meet), smart home (Nest), smartphones (Pixel), wearable technology (Pixel Watch and Fitbit), music streaming (YouTube Music), video on demand (YouTube TV), AI (Google Assistant and Gemini), machine learning APIs (TensorFlow), AI chips (TPU), and more. Many of these products and services are dominant in their respective industries, as is Google Search. Discontinued Google products include gaming (Stadia),[15] Glass, Google+, Reader, Play Music, Nexus, Hangouts, and Inbox by Gmail.[16][17] Google's other ventures outside of internet services and consumer electronics include quantum computing (Willow, Google Quantum AI), self-driving cars (Waymo), and transformer models (Google DeepMind).[18]

Google Search and YouTube are the two most-visited websites worldwide, followed by Facebook, Instagram, and ChatGPT. Google is the largest provider of search engines, mapping and navigation applications, email services, office suites, online video platforms, photo and cloud storage, mobile operating systems, web browsers, machine learning frameworks, and AI virtual assistants in the world as measured by market share.[19] On the list of the most valuable brands, Google is ranked second by Forbes as of January 2022,[20] and is fourth by Interbrand as of February 2022.[21] The company has received criticism involving issues such as privacy concerns, tax avoidance, censorship, search neutrality, antitrust, and abuse of its monopoly position.[22]
The apple tree is deciduous, generally standing from 2 to 4.5 metres (6 to 15 feet) tall in cultivation and up to 15 m (49 ft) in the wild, though more typically 2 to 10 m (6.5 to 33 ft).[6][2] When cultivated, the size, shape and branch density are determined by rootstock selection and trimming method.[6] Apple trees may naturally have a rounded to erect crown with a dense canopy of leaves.[7] The bark of the trunk is dark gray or gray-brown, but young branches are reddish or dark-brown with a smooth texture.[2][8] Young twigs are covered in fine downy hairs; they become hairless when older.[8]
Booklet may refer to:

A small book or group of pages
A pamphlet
A type of tablet computer
Postage stamp booklet, made up of one or more small panes of postage stamps in a cardboard cover
Liner notes, writings found in booklets which come inserted into the compact disc or DVD jewel case or the equivalent packaging for vinyl records and cassettes
Digital booklet, the digital equivalent of liner notes that often accompany digital music purchases
Nokia Booklet 3G, a netbook computer
Programme (booklet), available for patrons attending live events
See also
Book (disambiguation)
Bocklet, a German-Austrian surname
All pages with titles containing booklet
Vector most often refers to:

Disease vector, an agent that carries and transmits an infectious pathogen into another living organism
Euclidean vector, a quantity with a magnitude and a direction
Vector may also refer to:

Computer science
Vector, a one-dimensional array data structure
Distance-vector routing protocol, a class of routing protocols
Dope vector, a data structure used to store information about an array
Feature vector, an n-dimensional vector of numerical features that represent some object
Interrupt vector, the location in memory of an interrupt handling routine
Initialization vector, a fixed-size input to a cryptographic primitive
Vector (C++), a type in the C++ Standard Template Library
Vector clock, an algorithm
Vector space model, an algebraic model for representing text documents
Euclidean vector, a geometric object with a direction and magnitude
Vector graphics, images defined by geometric primitives as opposed to bitmaps
Vector monitor, a display device used for early computers
Vector game, any video game that uses a vector graphics display
Vector (malware), approach used, or vulnerability exploited, in attacking a computer system
Vector (robot), a 2018 robot by Anki
Vector, the MediaWiki skin
Entertainment
Characters and fictional elements
Vector (Battle Angel Alita)
Vector (comics), Marvel Comics
Vector (G.I. Joe), vehicle
Vector the Crocodile, in the Sonic the Hedgehog series
Vector, a Barian Emperor from Yu-Gi-Oh! Zexal
Vector class in Wipeout games
Victor "Vector" Perkins in Despicable Me (film), 2010
Vector, in the game Resident Evil: Operation Raccoon City
Vector, a weapon in the series Elfen Lied
Vector, a location in the video game Final Fantasy VI
Vector Industries, an organization in the Xenosaga video game series
Games
Vector (video game), 2012 video game
Vectorman, 1995, for Sega
Literature
Vector (journal), the critical journal of the British Science Fiction Association
Vector (novel), a 1999 novel by Robin Cook
The Vector (newspaper), a student-run newspaper of the New Jersey Institute of Technology
Vectors (journal), a defunct online journal covering digital humanities
Music
Vector (album), a 2018 album by Haken
Vector (band), 1980s
Vector (rapper) (b. 1983), Nigerian
Martin Wheeler, aka Vector Lovers
Mathematics and physics
Vector (mathematics and physics)
Row and column vectors, single row or column matrices
Vector field, a vector for each point
Vector quantity
Vector space
Molecular biology
Vector (molecular biology), a DNA molecule used as a vehicle to artificially carry foreign genetic material into another cell
Cloning vector, a small piece of DNA into which a foreign DNA fragment can be inserted for cloning purposes
Shuttle vector, a plasmid constructed so that it can propagate in two different host species
Viral vector, a tool commonly used by molecular biologists to deliver genetic materials into cells
Transportation
Vehicles
Aircraft
Aerodyne Systems Vector, an ultralight aircraft
Hall Vector 1, a glider
A brand of reconnaissance drone produced by Quantum-Systems
Radar vector, headings assigned by air traffic control for navigation
Automotive vehicles
Pinzgauer High-Mobility All-Terrain Vehicle (ATV) (Vector), a military patrol vehicle
VECTOR, a Dutch light utility vehicle
Vector, a variant of the Saab 9-3 automobile
Vector Motors sports cars
Vector M12
Vector SRV8
Vector W2
Vector W8
Vector WX-3
Nautical vessels
CCGS Vector, a 1967 hydrographic survey vessel in the Canadian Coast Guard
MT Vector, a Philippine tanker ship
Other transportation
Thrust vectoring, directing engine thrust
Business
State Research Center of Virology and Biotechnology VECTOR, a biological research center in Russia
Vector Engineering, multinational engineering, procurement, construction management, and operations service provider
Vector Graphic, an early manufacturer of 8-bit microcomputers
Vector Group, a publicly traded holding company, focusing on tobacco and real estate
Vector Informatik, a software tool and components provider for development of embedded electronics
Vector Launch, an American space technology company, 2016–2019
Vector Limited, a New Zealand gas and electricity supplier
Vector Marketing, a multi-level knife marketing company
Vector Motors, an automobile manufacturer
Other uses
Interval vector in musical set theory
KRISS Vector, a .45 ACP submachine gun
Light verb, or vector verb, in grammar
Parker Vector, pens
Vector 2022, a Wikipedia skin
Vector Arena, Auckland, New Zealand
Vector Map, a collection of Earth GIS data
Vector, a brand of cereal sold by Kellogg's
See also

Search for "vector" on Wikipedia.
Vector graphics (disambiguation)
Vectorization (disambiguation)
Vectra (disambiguation)
Vektor (disambiguation)
All pages with titles containing Vector or Vectors
All pages with titles beginning with Vector
ideo

Article
Talk
Read
Edit
View history

Tools
Appearance hide
Text

Small

Standard

Large
Width

Standard

Wide
Color (beta)

Automatic

Light

Dark
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
This article is about the storage and reproduction medium. For their content and production, see Film and Footage. For other uses, see Video (disambiguation).
Not to be confused with Vidio.
icon
This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed.
Find sources: "Video" – news · newspapers · books · scholar · JSTOR (January 2025) (Learn how and when to remove this message)
Duration: 58 seconds.0:58Subtitles available.CC
A one-minute animated video showing an example of a media production process
Video is an electronic medium used for the recording, copying, playback, transmission, and display of moving visual images, with or without accompanying audio. Video technology was initially developed for live transmission and later expanded to include recording and storage through analog formats such as magnetic tape. Since the late 20th century, digital video has become the dominant form, enabling efficient compression, storage, editing, and distribution across broadcast television, physical media, and internet-based platforms. Advances in digital imaging, compression standards, and network infrastructure have significantly influenced media production, communication, entertainment, education, and information dissemination worldwide.

Video systems vary in display resolution, aspect ratio, refresh rate, color reproduction, and other qualities. Both analog and digital video can be carried on a variety of media, including radio, magnetic tape, optical discs, computer files, and network streaming.

Etymology
The word video comes from the Latin video, "I see," the first-person singular present indicative of videre, "to see".[1]

History
See also: History of television
Analog video
See also: Analog television and Videotape

NTSC composite video signal (analog)
Video developed from facsimile systems developed in the mid-19th century. Mechanical video scanners, such as the Nipkow disk, were patented as early as 1884, but it took several decades before practical video systems could be developed. Whereas the medium of film records using a sequence of miniature photographic images visible to the naked eye, video encodes images electronically, turning them into analog or digital electronic signals for transmission and recording.[2]

Video was originally exclusively live technology, and was first developed for mechanical television systems. These were quickly replaced by cathode-ray tube (CRT) television systems. Live video cameras used an electron beam, which would scan a photoconductive plate with the desired image and produce a voltage signal proportional to the brightness in each part of the image. The signal could then be sent to televisions, where another beam would receive and display the image.[3] Charles Ginsburg led an Ampex research team to develop one of the first practical video tape recorders (VTR). In 1951, the first of these captured live images from television cameras by writing the camera's electrical signal onto magnetic videotape. VTRs sold for around US$50,000 in 1956, and videotapes cost US$300 per one-hour reel.[4] However, prices gradually dropped over the years, and in 1971, Sony began selling videocassette recorder (VCR) decks and tapes into the consumer market.[5]

Digital video
Main article: Digital video
See also: Digital television and Video coding format
Digital video is capable of higher quality and, eventually, a much lower cost than its analog predecessor. After the commercial introduction of the DVD, in 1997, and later the Blu-ray Disc, in 2006, sales of videotape and recording equipment fell. Advances in computer technology allow even inexpensive personal computers and smartphones to capture, store, edit, and transmit digital video, further reducing the cost of video production and allowing programmers and broadcasters to move to tapeless production. The advent of digital broadcasting and the subsequent digital television transition are in the process of relegating analog video to the status of a legacy technology in most parts of the world. The development of high-resolution video cameras with improved dynamic range and broader color gamuts, along with the introduction of high-dynamic-range digital intermediate data formats with improved color depth, has caused digital video technology to converge with film technology. Since 2013, the use of digital cameras in Hollywood has surpassed the use of film cameras.[6]

Characteristics
Frame rate
Frame rate—the number of still pictures per unit of time—ranges from six or eight frames per second (frame/s or fps) for older mechanical cameras to 120 or more for new professional cameras. The PAL and SECAM standards specify 25 fps, while NTSC specifies 29.97 fps.[7] Film is shot at a slower frame rate of 24 frames per second, which slightly complicates the process of transferring film to video. The minimum frame rate to achieve persistence of vision (the illusion of a moving image) is about 16 frames per second.[8]

Interlacing vs. progressive-scan systems
Video can be interlaced or progressive. In progressive scan systems, each refresh period updates all scan lines in each frame, in sequence. When displaying a natively progressive broadcast or recorded signal, the result is the optimum spatial resolution of both the stationary and moving parts of the image. Interlacing was invented as a way to reduce flicker in early mechanical and CRT video displays, without increasing the number of complete frames per second. Interlacing retains detail while requiring lower bandwidth compared to progressive scanning.[9][10]

In interlaced video, the horizontal scan lines of each complete frame are treated as if numbered consecutively and captured as two fields: an odd field (upper field) consisting of the odd-numbered lines and an even field (lower field) consisting of the even-numbered lines. Analog display devices reproduce each frame, effectively doubling the frame rate as far as perceptible overall flicker is concerned. When the image capture device acquires the fields one at a time, rather than dividing up a complete frame after it is captured, the frame rate for motion is effectively doubled as well, resulting in smoother, more lifelike reproduction of rapidly moving parts of the image when viewed on an interlaced CRT display.[9][10]

NTSC, PAL, and SECAM are interlaced formats. In video resolution notation, 'i' denotes interlaced scanning. For example, PAL video format is often described as 576i50, where 576 indicates the total number of horizontal scan lines, i indicates interlacing, and 50 indicates 50 fields (half-frames) per second.[10][11]

When displaying a natively interlaced signal on a progressive scan device, the overall spatial resolution is degraded by simple line doubling—artifacts, such as flickering or comb effects in moving parts of the image, appear unless special signal processing eliminates them.[9][12] A procedure known as deinterlacing can optimize the display of an interlaced video signal from an analog, DVD, or satellite source on a progressive scan device such as an LCD television, digital video projector, or plasma panel. Deinterlacing cannot, however, produce video quality that is equivalent to true progressive scan source material.[10][11][12]

Aspect ratio

Comparison of common cinematography and traditional television (green) aspect ratios
In video, an aspect ratio is the proportional relationship between the width and height of a video screen and video picture elements. All popular video formats are landscape, with a traditional television screen having an aspect ratio of 4:3, or about 1.33:1. High-definition televisions have an aspect ratio of 16:9, or about 1.78:1. The ratio of a full 35mm film frame with its sound track (the "Academy ratio") is 1.375:1.[13][14]

Pixels on computer monitors are usually square, but pixels used in digital video often have non-square aspect ratios, such as those used in the PAL and NTSC variants of the CCIR 601 digital video standard and the corresponding anamorphic widescreen formats. The 720 by 480 pixel raster uses thin pixels on a 4:3 aspect ratio display and fat pixels on a 16:9 display.[13][14]

The popularity of video on mobile phones has led to the growth of vertical video. Mary Meeker, a partner at Silicon Valley venture capital firm Kleiner Perkins Caufield & Byers, highlighted the growth of vertical-video viewing in her 2015 Internet Trends Report, noting that it had grown from 5% of viewing in 2010 to 29% in 2015. Vertical-video ads are watched in their entirety nine times more frequently than those in landscape ratios.[15]
A computer is a machine that can be programmed to automatically carry out sequences of arithmetic or logical operations (computation). Modern digital electronic computers can perform generic sets of operations known as programs, which enable computers to perform a wide range of tasks. The term computer system may refer to a nominally complete computer that includes the hardware, operating system, software, and peripheral equipment needed and used for full operation; or to a group of computers that are linked and function together, such as a computer network or computer cluster.

A broad range of industrial and consumer products use computers as control systems, including simple special-purpose devices like microwave ovens and remote controls, and factory devices like industrial robots. Computers are at the core of general-purpose devices such as personal computers and mobile devices such as smartphones. Computers power the Internet, which links billions of computers and users.

Early computers were meant to be used only for calculations. Simple manual instruments like the abacus have aided people in doing calculations since ancient times. Early in the Industrial Revolution, some mechanical devices were built to automate long, tedious tasks, such as guiding patterns for looms. More sophisticated electrical machines did specialized analog calculations in the early 20th century. The first digital electronic calculating machines were developed during World War II, both electromechanical and using thermionic valves. The first semiconductor transistors in the late 1940s were followed by the silicon-based MOSFET (MOS transistor) and monolithic integrated circuit chip technologies in the late 1950s, leading to the microprocessor and the microcomputer revolution in the 1970s. The speed, power, and versatility of computers have been increasing dramatically ever since then, with transistor counts increasing at a rapid pace (Moore's law noted that counts doubled every two years), leading to the Digital Revolution during the late 20th and early 21st centuries.

Conventionally, a modern computer consists of at least one processing element, typically a central processing unit (CPU) in the form of a microprocessor, together with some type of computer memory, typically semiconductor memory chips. The processing element carries out arithmetic and logical operations, and a sequencing and control unit can change the order of operations in response to stored information. Peripheral devices include input devices (keyboards, mice, joysticks, etc.), output devices (monitors, printers, etc.), and input/output devices that perform both functions (e.g. touchscreens). Peripheral devices allow information to be retrieved from an external source, and they enable the results of operations to be saved and retrieved.

Etymology
A human computer.
A human computer, with microscope and calculator, 1952
It was not until the mid-20th century that the word acquired its modern definition; according to the Oxford English Dictionary, the first known use of the word computer was in a different sense, in a 1613 book called The Yong Mans Gleanings by the English writer Richard Brathwait: "I haue [sic] read the truest computer of Times, and the best Arithmetician that euer [sic] breathed, and he reduceth thy dayes into a short number." This usage of the term referred to a human computer, a person who carried out calculations or computations. The word continued to have the same meaning until the middle of the 20th century. During the latter part of this period, women were often hired as computers because they could be paid less than their male counterparts.[1] By 1943, most human computers were women.[2]

The Online Etymology Dictionary gives the first attested use of computer in the 1640s, meaning 'one who calculates'; this is an "agent noun from compute (v.)". The Online Etymology Dictionary states that the use of the term to mean "'calculating machine' (of any type) is from 1897." The Online Etymology Dictionary indicates that the "modern use" of the term, to mean 'programmable digital electronic computer' dates from "1945 under this name; [in a] theoretical [sense] from 1937, as Turing machine".[3] The name has remained, although modern computers are capable of many higher-level functions.

History
Main articles: History of computing and History of computing hardware
For a chronological guide, see Timeline of computing.
Wikipedia[c] is a free online encyclopedia written and maintained by a community of volunteers, known as Wikipedians, through open collaboration and the wiki software MediaWiki. Founded by Jimmy Wales and Larry Sanger in 2001, Wikipedia has been hosted since 2003 by the Wikimedia Foundation, an American nonprofit organization funded mainly by donations from readers.[1] Wikipedia is the largest and most-read reference work in history.[2][3]

Initially available only in English, Wikipedia exists in over 340 languages and is one of the world's most visited websites. The English Wikipedia, with over 7 million articles, remains the largest of the editions, which together comprise more than 66 million articles and attract more than 1.5 billion unique device visits and 13 million edits per month (about five edits per second on average) as of April 2024.[W 1] As of December 2025, over 25% of Wikipedia's traffic comes from the United States, while Japan accounts for nearly 7%, and the United Kingdom, Germany, and Russia each represent around 5%.[4]

Wikipedia has been praised for enabling the democratization of knowledge, its extensive coverage, unique structure, and culture. Wikipedia has been censored by some national governments, ranging from specific pages to the entire site, sometimes due to its criticism of the government or by content otherwise considered blasphemous.[5][6] Although Wikipedia's volunteer editors have written extensively on a wide variety of topics, the encyclopedia has also been criticized for systemic bias, such as a gender bias against women and a geographical bias against the Global South.[7][8] While the reliability of Wikipedia was frequently criticized in the 2000s, it has improved over time, receiving greater praise from the late 2010s onward.[2][9][10] Articles on breaking news are often accessed as sources for up-to-date information about those events.[11][12]
Apple Inc. is an American multinational technology company headquartered in Cupertino, California, in Silicon Valley, best known for its consumer electronics, software and online services. Founded in 1976 as Apple Computer Company by Steve Jobs, Steve Wozniak and Ronald Wayne, the company was incorporated by Jobs and Wozniak as Apple Computer, Inc. the following year. It was renamed to its current name in 2007 as the company had expanded its focus from computers to consumer electronics. Apple is one of the Big Tech companies.

The company was founded in 1976 to market Wozniak's Apple I personal computer. Its successor, the Apple II, became one of the first successful mass-produced microcomputers. Apple introduced the Lisa in 1983 and the Macintosh in 1984 as some of the first computers to use a graphical user interface and a mouse. By 1985, internal conflicts led to Jobs leaving the company to form NeXT and Wozniak withdrawing to other ventures; John Sculley served as CEO for over a decade. In the 1990s, Apple lost considerable market share in the personal computer industry to the lower-priced Wintel duopoly of Intel-powered PC clones running Microsoft Windows, and neared bankruptcy by 1997. To overhaul its market strategy, Apple acquired NeXT, bringing Jobs back to the company. Under his leadership, Apple returned to profitability by introducing the iMac, iPod, iPhone, and iPad devices; creating the iTunes Store; launching the "Think different" advertising campaign; and opening the Apple Store retail chain. Jobs resigned in 2011 for health reasons, and died two months later; he was succeeded as CEO by Tim Cook.

Apple's product lineup includes portable and home hardware like the iPhone, iPad, Apple Watch, Mac, Apple Vision Pro, AirPods, and Apple TV; several in-house operating systems such as iOS, iPadOS, and macOS; and various software and services including Apple Pay and iCloud, as well as multimedia streaming services like Apple Music and Apple TV. Since 2011, Apple has for the most part been the world's largest company by market capitalization, and, as of 2024, is the largest manufacturing company by revenue, the fourth-largest personal computer vendor, the largest vendor of tablet computers, and the largest vendor of mobile phones. Apple became the first publicly traded US company to be valued at over $1 trillion in 2018, and, as of October 2025, is valued at just over $4 trillion.

Apple has received criticism regarding its contractors' labor conditions, its relationship with trade unions, its environmental practices, and its corporate ethics, including anti-competitive tactics,[6] materials sourcing, and its acquisitions of smaller businesses. Nevertheless, the company has a large following and enjoys a high level of customer loyalty. Apple has consistently been ranked as one of the world's most valuable brands since the late 2000s.

History
Main article: History of Apple Inc.
1976–1980: Founding and incorporation

In 1976, Steve Jobs and Steve Wozniak co-founded Apple in Jobs's parents' home on Crist Drive in Los Altos, California.[7] Wozniak called the popular belief that the company was founded in the garage "a bit of a myth",[8] although they moved some operations to the garage when the bedroom became too crowded.[9]

The Apple I is Apple's first product, designed by Wozniak and sold as an assembled circuit board without the required keyboard, monitor, power supply, and the optional case.
Apple Computer Company was founded on April 1, 1976, by Steve Jobs, Steve Wozniak, and Ronald Wayne as a partnership.[7][10] The company's first product was the Apple I, a computer designed and hand-built entirely by Wozniak.[11] To finance its creation, Jobs sold his Volkswagen Bus, and Wozniak sold his HP-65 calculator.[12] Neither received the full selling price, but together they earned $1,300 (equivalent to $7,200 in 2024). Wozniak debuted the first prototype Apple I at the Homebrew Computer Club in July 1976.[13] The Apple I was sold as a motherboard with CPU, RAM, and basic textual-video chips—a base kit concept which was not yet marketed as a complete personal computer.[14] It was priced soon after debut for $666.66 (equivalent to $3,700 in 2024).[15][16] Wozniak later said he was unaware of the coincidental mark of the beast in the number 666, and that he came up with the price because he liked "repeating digits".[17]

Apple Computer, Inc. was incorporated in Cupertino, California,[2] on January 3, 1977,[18][19] without Wayne, who had left and sold his share of the company back to Jobs and Wozniak for $800 only twelve days after having co-founded it.[20] Multimillionaire Mike Markkula provided essential business expertise and funding of $250,000 (equivalent to $1,297,000 in 2024) to Jobs and Wozniak during the incorporation of Apple.[21] During the first five years of operations, revenue grew exponentially, doubling about every four months. Between September 1977 and September 1980, yearly sales grew from $775,000 to US$118 million, an average annual growth rate of 533%.[22]

The Apple II, also designed by Wozniak, was introduced on April 16, 1977, at the first West Coast Computer Faire.[23] It differed from its major rivals, the TRS-80 and Commodore PET, because of its character cell-based color graphics and open architecture. The Apple I and early Apple II models used ordinary audio cassette tapes as storage devices, which were superseded by the 5+1⁄4-inch floppy disk drive and interface called the Disk II in 1978.[24][25]


The Apple II, introduced in 1977 and designed primarily by Wozniak, was the company's first major success.
The Apple II was chosen to be the desktop platform for the first killer application of the business world: VisiCalc, a spreadsheet program released in 1979.[24] VisiCalc created a business market for the Apple II and gave home users an additional reason to buy an Apple II: compatibility with the office,[24] but Apple II market share remained behind home computers made by competitors such as Atari, Commodore, and Tandy.[26][27]

On December 12, 1980, Apple went public with an initial public offering (IPO) on the fully electronic Nasdaq stock market, selling 4.6 million shares at $22 per share ($.10 per share when adjusting for stock splits as of September 3, 2022),[19] generating over $100 million, which was more capital than any IPO since Ford Motor Company in 1956.[28] By the end of the day, around 300 millionaires were created, including Jobs and Wozniak, from a stock price of $29 per share[29] and a market cap of $1.778 billion.[28][29]

1980–1990: Success with Macintosh
See also: List of Mac models and Timeline of the Apple II family

Steve Jobs in 1984 with the Macintosh, the first mass-market personal computer to feature an integral graphical user interface and mouse
In November and December 1979, Steve Jobs and Apple employees, including Jef Raskin, visited Xerox PARC, where they observed the Xerox Alto, featuring a graphical user interface (GUI) and a mouse.[30] Jobs had negotiated with Xerox in advance to gain access to PARC's technology, in exchange for the right to purchase $1 million worth of Apple's pre-IPO shares.[31] This visit influenced Jobs to implement a GUI in Apple's products, starting with the Apple Lisa. Despite being pioneering as a mass-marketed GUI computer, the Lisa suffered from high costs and limited software options, leading to commercial failure.

Jobs, infuriated by his removal from the Lisa team, joined the company's Macintosh division in January 1981.[32] Raskin had envisioned the Macintosh as a low-cost, portable computer and Wozniak had helped its development until a plane crash in early 1981 forced him to step back from the project.[33][34] Wozniak's absence allowed Jobs to quickly take over the project and he redefined the Macintosh as a graphical system that would be cheaper than the Lisa, undercutting his former division.[35] Jobs was also hostile to the Apple II division, which at the time generated most of the company's revenue.[36]

In 1984, Apple launched the Macintosh, the first personal computer without a bundled programming language.[37] Its debut was signified by "1984", a US$1.5-million television advertisement directed by Ridley Scott that aired during the third quarter of Super Bowl XVIII on January 22, 1984.[38] This was hailed as a watershed event for Apple's success[39] and was called a "masterpiece" by CNN[40] and one of the greatest TV advertisements of all time by TV Guide.[41]

The advertisement created great interest in the Macintosh, and sales were initially good, but began to taper off dramatically after the first three months as reviews started coming in. Jobs had required 128 kilobytes of RAM, which limited its speed and software in favor of aspiring for a projected price point of $1,000 (equivalent to $3,000 in 2024). The Macintosh shipped for $2,495 (equivalent to $7,600 in 2024), a price panned by critics due to its slow performance.[42] In early 1985, this sales slump triggered a power struggle between Steve Jobs and CEO John Sculley, who had been hired away from Pepsi two years earlier by Jobs[43] saying, "Do you want to sell sugar water for the rest of your life or come with me and change the world?"[44] Sculley removed Jobs as the head of the Macintosh division, with unanimous support from the Apple board of directors.[45]

The board of directors instructed Sculley to contain Jobs and his ability to launch expensive forays into untested products. Rather than submit to Sculley's direction, Jobs attempted to oust him from leadership.[46] Jean-Louis Gassée informed Sculley that Jobs had been attempting to organize a boardroom coup, and called an emergency meeting at which Apple's executive staff sided with Sculley, and stripped Jobs of all operational duties.[46] Jobs resigned from Apple in September 1985 and took several Apple employees with him to found NeXT.[47] Wozniak had also quit his active employment at Apple earlier in 1985 to pursue other ventures, expressing his frustration with Apple's treatment of the Apple II division and stating that the company had "been going in the wrong direction for the last five years".[36][48][49] Wozniak remained employed by Apple as a representative,[48] receiving a stipend estimated to be $120,000 per year.[50] Jobs and Wozniak remained Apple shareholders following their departures.[51]

After the departures of Jobs and Wozniak in 1985, Sculley launched the Macintosh 512K that year with quadruple the RAM, and introduced the LaserWriter, the first reasonably priced PostScript-based laser printer. PageMaker, an early desktop publishing application taking advantage of the PostScript language, was also released by Aldus Corporation in July 1985.[52] It has been suggested that the combination of Macintosh, LaserWriter, and PageMaker was responsible for the creation of the desktop publishing market.[53]

This dominant position in the desktop publishing market[54] allowed the company to focus on higher price points, the so-called "high-right policy" named for its position on a price–profits chart. Newer models selling at higher price points offered higher profit margin, and appeared to have no effect on total sales as power users snapped up every increase in speed. Although some worried about pricing themselves out of the market, the high-right policy was in full force by the mid-1980s, due to Jean-Louis Gassée's slogan of "fifty-five or die", referring to the 55% profit margins of the Macintosh II.[55]

This policy began to backfire late in the decade as desktop publishing programs appeared on IBM PC compatibles with some of the same functionality of the Macintosh at far lower price points. The company lost its dominant position in the desktop publishing market and estranged many of its original consumer customer base who could no longer afford Apple products. The Christmas season of 1989 was the first in the company's history to have declining sales, which led to a 20% drop in Apple's stock price.[56] During this period, the relationship between Sculley and Gassée deteriorated, leading Sculley to effectively demote Gassée in January 1990 by appointing Michael Spindler as the chief operating officer.[57] Gassée left the company later that year to set up a rival, Be Inc.[58]

1990–1997: Decline and restructuring

Macintosh LC II
The company pivoted strategy and, in October 1990, introduced three lower-cost models: the Macintosh Classic, the Macintosh LC, and the Macintosh IIsi, all of which generated significant sales due to pent-up demand.[59] In 1991, Apple introduced the PowerBook, a commercially successful laptop whose clamshell design influenced later notebook computers. The same year, Apple introduced System 7, a major upgrade to the Macintosh operating system, adding color to the interface and introducing new networking capabilities.

The success of the lower-cost Macs and the PowerBook brought increasing revenue.[60] For some time, Apple was doing very well, introducing fresh new products at increasing profits. The magazine MacAddict named the period between 1989 and 1991 as the "first golden age" of the Macintosh.[61]


The PenLite is Apple's first tablet computer prototype, created in 1992 to bring the Mac OS to a tablet. It was canceled in favor of the Newton.[62]
The success of lower-cost consumer Macs, especially the LC, cannibalized higher-priced machines. To address this, management introduced several new brands, selling largely identical machines at different price points, for different markets: the high-end Quadra series, the mid-range Centris series, and the consumer-marketed Performa series. This led to significant consumer confusion between so many models.[63]

In 1993, the Apple II series was discontinued. It was expensive to produce, and the company decided it was still absorbing sales from lower-cost Macintosh models. After the launch of the LC, Apple encouraged developers to create applications for Macintosh rather than Apple II, and authorized salespersons to redirect consumers from Apple II and toward Macintosh.[64] The Apple IIe was discontinued in 1993.[65]

Apple experimented with several other unsuccessful consumer targeted products during the 1990s, including QuickTake digital cameras, PowerCD portable CD audio players, speakers, the Pippin video game console, the eWorld online service, and Apple Interactive Television Box. Newton tablet division, which was later criticized for high costs and limited commercial success, and commentators have attributed the decision in part to market forecasts by CEO John Sculley.[66]

Throughout this period, Microsoft continued to gain market share with Windows by focusing on delivering software to inexpensive personal computers, while Apple was delivering a richly engineered but expensive experience.[67] Apple relied on high profit margins and never developed a clear response; it sued Microsoft for making a GUI similar to the Lisa in Apple Computer, Inc. v. Microsoft Corp.[68] The lawsuit dragged on for years and was finally dismissed. The major product flops and the rapid loss of market share to Windows sullied Apple's reputation, and in 1993 Sculley was replaced as CEO by Michael Spindler.[69]


The Power Macintosh 6100, introduced in 1994, was Apple's first new home computer model after the switch to PowerPC processors.
Under Spindler, Apple, IBM, and Motorola formed the AIM alliance in 1994 to create a new computing platform (the PowerPC Reference Platform or PReP), with IBM and Motorola hardware coupled with Apple software. The AIM alliance hoped that PReP's performance and Apple's software would leave the PC far behind and thus counter the dominance of Windows. That year, Apple introduced the Power Macintosh, the first of many computers with Motorola's PowerPC processor.[70]

In the wake of the alliance, Apple opened up to the idea of allowing Motorola and other companies to build Macintosh clones. Over the next two years, 75 distinct Macintosh clone models were introduced. However, by 1996, Apple executives were worried that the clones were cannibalizing sales of its own high-end computers, where profit margins were highest.[71]

In 1996, Spindler was replaced as CEO by Gil Amelio, who was hired for his reputation as a corporate rehabilitator. Amelio made deep changes, including extensive layoffs and cost-cutting.[72]

This period was also marked by numerous failed attempts to modernize the Macintosh operating system (Mac OS). The original Macintosh operating system (System 1) was not built for multitasking (running several applications at once). The company attempted to correct this by introducing cooperative multitasking in System 5, but still decided it needed a more modern approach.[73] This led to the Pink project in 1988, A/UX that same year, Copland in 1994, and evaluated the purchase of BeOS in 1996. Talks with Be stalled when the CEO, former Apple executive Jean-Louis Gassée, demanded $300 million in contrast to Apple's $125-million offer.[74] With Apple only weeks away from bankruptcy,[75] the board preferred NeXTSTEP and purchased NeXT in late 1996 for $400 million, retaining Steve Jobs.[76]

1997–2007: Return to profitability
The NeXT acquisition was finalized on February 9, 1997,[77] and the board brought Jobs back to Apple as an advisor. On July 9, 1997, Jobs staged a boardroom coup, which resulted in Amelio's resignation after overseeing a three-year record-low stock price and crippling financial losses. The board named Jobs as interim CEO and he immediately reviewed the product lineup. Jobs canceled 70% of models, ending 3,000 jobs and paring to the core of its computer offerings.[78]

The next month, in August 1997, Steve Jobs convinced Microsoft to make a $150-million investment in Apple and a commitment to continue developing Mac software.[79] This was seen as an "antitrust insurance policy" for Microsoft which had recently settled with the Department of Justice over anti-competitive practices in the United States v. Microsoft Corp. case.[80] Around then, Jobs donated Apple's internal library and archives to Stanford University, to focus more on the present and the future rather than the past.[81][82] He ended the Mac clone deals and in September 1997, purchased the largest clone maker, Power Computing.[83] On November 10, 1997, the Apple Store website launched, which was tied to a new build-to-order manufacturing model similar to PC manufacturer Dell's success.[84] The moves paid off for Jobs; at the end of his first year as CEO, the company had a $309-million profit.[78]


iMac

iBook

Power Macintosh G3

PowerBook G3
On May 6, 1998, Apple introduced a new all-in-one computer reminiscent of the original Macintosh: the iMac. The iMac sold 800,000 units in its first five months. It abandoned legacy technologies such as the 3+1⁄2-inch diskette, adopted the USB connector early, and came pre-installed with Internet connectivity (the 'i' in iMac) via Ethernet and a dial-up modem.[85][86] Its striking teardrop shape and translucent materials were designed by Jonathan Ive, who had been hired by Amelio, and who collaborated with Jobs for more than a decade to reshape Apple's product design.[87][88]

A little more than a year later on July 21, 1999, Apple introduced the iBook consumer laptop. It culminated Jobs's strategy to produce only four products: refined versions of the Power Macintosh G3 desktop and PowerBook G3 laptop for professionals, and the iMac desktop and iBook laptop for consumers. Jobs said the small product line allowed for a greater focus on quality and innovation.[89]

Around then, Apple also completed numerous acquisitions to create a portfolio of digital media production software for both professionals and consumers. Apple acquired Macromedia's Key Grip digital video editing software project, which was launched as Final Cut Pro in April 1999.[90] Key Grip's development also led to Apple's release of the consumer video-editing product iMovie in October 1999.[91] Apple acquired the German company Astarte in April 2000, which had developed the DVD authoring software DVDirector, which Apple repackaged as the professional-oriented DVD Studio Pro, and reused its technology to create iDVD for the consumer market.[91] In 2000, Apple purchased the SoundJam MP audio player software from Casady & Greene. Apple renamed the program iTunes, simplified the user interface and added CD burning.[92]

In 2001, Apple changed course with three announcements. First, on March 24, 2001, Apple announced the release of a new modern operating system, Mac OS X. This was after numerous failed attempts in the early 1990s, and several years of development. Mac OS X is based on NeXTSTEP, OpenStep, and BSD Unix, to combine the stability, reliability, and security of Unix with the ease of use of an overhauled user interface. Second, in May 2001, the first two Apple Store retail locations opened in Virginia and California, offering an improved presentation of the company's products.[93][94][95] At the time, many speculated that the stores would fail, but they later expanded to more than 500 locations worldwide.[96][3] Third, on October 23, 2001, the iPod portable digital audio player debuted. The product was first sold on November 10, 2001, and sold over 100 million units within six years.[97]


The iTunes Store was highly successful in shaping the legal music downloading industry; chart shows the number of songs sold from 2003 to 2010.
In 2003, the iTunes Store was introduced with music downloads for 99¢ a song and iPod integration. It quickly became the market leader in online music services, with over 5 billion downloads by June 19, 2008.[98] Two years later, the iTunes Store was the world's largest music retailer.[99]

In 2002, Apple purchased Nothing Real for its advanced digital compositing application Shake,[100] and Emagic for the music productivity application Logic. The purchase of Emagic made Apple the first computer manufacturer to own a music software company. The acquisition was followed by the development of Apple's consumer-level GarageBand application.[101] The release of iPhoto that year completed the iLife suite.[102]


The MacBook Pro is Apple's first laptop with an Intel microprocessor, introduced in 2006.
At the Worldwide Developers Conference keynote address on June 6, 2005, Jobs announced that Apple would move away from PowerPC processors, and the Mac would transition to Intel processors in 2006.[103] On January 10, 2006, the new MacBook Pro and iMac became the first Apple computers to use Intel's Core Duo CPU. By August 7, 2006, Apple made the transition to Intel chips for the entire Mac product line—over one year sooner than announced.[103] The Power Mac, iBook, and PowerBook brands were retired during the transition; the Mac Pro, MacBook, and MacBook Pro became their respective successors.[104] Apple also introduced Boot Camp in 2006 to help users install Windows XP or Windows Vista on their Intel Macs alongside Mac OS X.[105]

Between early 2003 and 2006, the price of Apple's stock increased more than tenfold, from around $6 per share (split-adjusted) to over $80.[106] When Apple surpassed Dell's market cap in January 2006,[107] Jobs sent an email to Apple employees saying Dell's CEO Michael Dell should eat his words.[108] Nine years prior, Dell had said that if he ran Apple he would "shut it down and give the money back to the shareholders".[109]

2007–2011: Success with mobile devices

The newly announced first-generation iPhone was on display at the 2007 MacWorld Expo.
During his keynote speech at the Macworld Expo on January 9, 2007, Jobs announced the renaming of Apple Computer, Inc. to Apple Inc., because the company had broadened its focus from computers to consumer electronics.[110] This event also saw the announcement of the iPhone[111] and the Apple TV.[112] The company sold 270,000 first-generation iPhones during the first 30 hours of sales,[113] and some industry commentators described the device as "a game changer for the industry".[114]

In an article posted on Apple's website on February 6, 2007, Jobs wrote that Apple would be willing to sell music on the iTunes Store without digital rights management, thereby allowing tracks to be played on third-party players if record labels would agree to drop the technology.[115] On April 2, 2007, Apple and EMI jointly announced the removal of DRM technology from EMI's catalog in the iTunes Store, effective in May 2007.[116] Other record labels eventually followed suit and Apple published a press release in January 2009 to announce that all songs on the iTunes Store are available without their FairPlay DRM.[117]

In July 2008, Apple launched the App Store to sell third-party applications for the iPhone and iPod Touch.[118] Within a month, the store sold 60 million applications and registered an average daily revenue of $1 million, with Jobs speculating in August 2008 that the App Store could become a billion-dollar business for Apple.[119] By October 2008, Apple was the third-largest mobile handset supplier in the world due to the popularity of the iPhone.[120]


A docked iPod Classic; Apple worked with other manufacturers to implement purpose-built "Made for iPod" docking stations.
On January 14, 2009, Jobs announced in an internal memo that he would be taking a six-month medical leave of absence from Apple until the end of June 2009 and would spend the time focusing on his health. In the email, Jobs stated that "the curiosity over my personal health continues to be a distraction not only for me and my family, but everyone else at Apple as well", and explained that the break would allow the company "to focus on delivering extraordinary products".[121] Though Jobs was absent, Apple recorded its best non-holiday quarter (Q1 FY 2009) during the recession, with revenue of $8.16 billion and profit of $1.21 billion.[122]

After years of speculation and multiple rumored "leaks", Apple unveiled a large screen, tablet-like media device known as the iPad on January 27, 2010. The iPad ran the same touch-based operating system as the iPhone, and all iPhone apps were compatible with the iPad. This gave the iPad a large app catalog on launch, though having very little development time before the release. Later that year on April 3, 2010, the iPad was launched in the US. It sold more than 300,000 units on its first day, and 500,000 by the end of the first week.[123] In May 2010, Apple's market cap exceeded that of competitor Microsoft for the first time since 1989.[124]

In June 2010, Apple released the iPhone 4,[125] which introduced video calling using FaceTime, multitasking, and a new design with an exposed stainless steel frame as the phone's antenna system. Later that year, Apple again refreshed the iPod line by introducing a multi-touch iPod Nano, an iPod Touch with FaceTime, and an iPod Shuffle that brought back the clickwheel buttons of earlier generations.[126] It also introduced the smaller, cheaper second-generation Apple TV which allowed the rental of movies and shows.[127]

On January 17, 2011, Jobs announced in an internal Apple memo that he would take another medical leave of absence for an indefinite period to allow him to focus on his health. Chief operating officer Tim Cook assumed Jobs's day-to-day operations at Apple, although Jobs would still remain "involved in major strategic decisions".[128] Apple became the most valuable consumer-facing brand in the world,[129] and has consistently been among the most valuable brands since then.[130] In June 2011, Jobs took the stage and unveiled iCloud, an online storage and syncing service for music, photos, files, and software which replaced MobileMe, Apple's previous attempt at content syncing.[131] This would be the last product launch Jobs would attend before his death.

On August 24, 2011, Jobs resigned his position as CEO of Apple.[132] He was replaced by Cook[133] and Jobs became Apple's chairman. Apple did not have a chairman at the time[134] and instead had two co-lead directors, Andrea Jung and Arthur D. Levinson,[135] who continued with those titles until Levinson replaced Jobs as chairman of the board in November after Jobs's death.[136]

2011–2020: Post-Jobs era, new devices
On October 5, 2011, Steve Jobs died, marking the end of an era for Apple.[137] The next major product announcement by Apple was on January 19, 2012, when Apple's Phil Schiller introduced iBooks Textbooks for iOS and iBooks Author for Mac OS X in New York City.[138] Jobs stated in the biography Steve Jobs that he wanted to reinvent the textbook industry and education.[139]

From 2011 to 2012, Apple released the iPhone 4S[140] and iPhone 5,[141] which featured improved cameras, an intelligent software assistant named Siri, and cloud-synced data with iCloud; the third- and fourth-generation iPads, which featured Retina displays;[142][143] and the iPad Mini, which featured a 7.9-inch screen in contrast to the iPad's 9.7-inch screen.[144] These launches were successful, with the iPhone 5 (released September 21, 2012) becoming Apple's biggest iPhone launch with over two million pre-orders[145] and sales of three million iPads in three days following the launch of the iPad Mini and fourth-generation iPad (released November 3, 2012).[146] Apple also released a third-generation 13-inch MacBook Pro with a Retina display and new iMac and Mac Mini computers.[143][144][147]

On August 20, 2012, Apple's rising stock price increased the company's market capitalization to a then-record $624 billion. This beat the non-inflation-adjusted record for market capitalization previously set by Microsoft in 1999.[148] On August 24, 2012, a US jury ruled that Samsung should pay Apple $1.05 billion (£665m) in damages in an intellectual property lawsuit.[149] Samsung appealed the damages award, which was reduced by $450 million[150] and further granted Samsung's request for a new trial.[150] On November 10, 2012, Apple confirmed a global settlement that dismissed all existing lawsuits between Apple and HTC up to that date, in favor of a ten-year license agreement for current and future patents between the two companies.[151] It is predicted that Apple will make US$280 million per year from this deal with HTC.[152]

In May 2014, Apple confirmed its intent to acquire Dr. Dre and Jimmy Iovine's audio company Beats Electronics, producer of the "Beats by Dr. Dre" line of headphones and speaker products, and operator of the music streaming service Beats Music, for US$3 billion, and to sell their products through Apple's retail outlets and resellers. Iovine believed that Beats had always "belonged" with Apple, as the company modeled itself after Apple's "unmatched ability to marry culture and technology". The acquisition was the largest purchase in Apple's history.[153]


First-generation Apple Watch (2015)
During a press event on September 9, 2014, Apple introduced a smartwatch called the Apple Watch.[154] Initially, Apple marketed the device as a fashion accessory[155] and a complement to the iPhone, that would allow people to look at their smartphones less.[156] Over time, the company has focused on developing health and fitness-oriented features on the watch, in an effort to compete with dedicated activity trackers. In January 2016, Apple announced that over one billion Apple devices were in active use worldwide.[157]

On June 6, 2016, Fortune released Fortune 500, its list of companies ranked on revenue generation. In the trailing fiscal year of 2015, Apple was listed as the top tech company.[158] It ranked third, overall, with US$233 billion in revenue.[158] This represents a movement upward of two spots from the previous year's list.[158]

In June 2017, Apple announced the HomePod, its smart speaker aimed to compete against Sonos, Google Home, and Amazon Echo.[159] Toward the end of the year, TechCrunch reported that Apple was acquiring Shazam, a company that introduced its products at WWDC and specializing in music, TV, film and advertising recognition.[160] The acquisition was confirmed a few days later, reportedly costing Apple US$400 million, with media reports that the purchase looked like a move to acquire data and tools bolstering the Apple Music streaming service.[161] The purchase was approved by the European Union in September 2018.[162]

Also in June 2017, Apple appointed Jamie Erlicht and Zack Van Amburg to head the newly formed worldwide video unit. In November 2017, Apple announced it was branching out into original scripted programming: a drama series starring Jennifer Aniston and Reese Witherspoon, and a reboot of the anthology series Amazing Stories with Steven Spielberg.[163] In June 2018, Apple signed the Writers Guild of America's minimum basic agreement and Oprah Winfrey to a multi-year content partnership.[164] Additional partnerships for original series include Sesame Workshop and DHX Media and its subsidiary Peanuts Worldwide, and a partnership with A24 to create original films.[165]

During the Apple Special Event in September 2017, the AirPower wireless charger was announced alongside the iPhone X, iPhone 8, and Watch Series 3. The AirPower was intended to wirelessly charge multiple devices, simultaneously. Though initially set to release in early 2018, the AirPower would be canceled in March 2019, marking the first cancellation of a device under Cook's leadership.[166] On August 19, 2020, Apple's share price briefly topped $467.77, making it the first US company with a market capitalization of US$2 trillion.[167]

2020–2024: Transition from Intel CPUs, legal compliance and settlements

MacBook Air M1 (2020), Apple's first notebook computer following the switch from Intel x86 to ARM processors
During its annual WWDC keynote speech on June 22, 2020, Apple announced it would move away from Intel processors, and the Mac would transition to processors developed in-house.[168] The announcement was expected by industry analysts, and it has been noted that Macs featuring Apple's processors would allow for big increases in performance over current Intel-based models.[169] On November 10, 2020, the MacBook Air, MacBook Pro, and the Mac Mini became the first Macs powered by an Apple-designed processor, the Apple M1.[170]

In April 2022, it was reported that Samsung Electro-Mechanics would be collaborating with Apple on its M2 chip instead of LG Innotek.[171] Developer logs showed that at least nine Mac models with four different M2 chips were being tested.[172]

The Wall Street Journal reported that Apple's effort to develop its own chips left it better prepared to deal with the semiconductor shortage that emerged during the COVID-19 pandemic, which led to increased profitability, with sales of M1-based Mac computers rising sharply in 2020 and 2021. It also inspired other companies like Tesla, Amazon, and Meta Platforms to pursue a similar path.[173]

In April 2022, Apple opened an online store that allowed anyone in the US to view repair manuals and order replacement parts for specific recent iPhones, although the difference in cost between this method and official repair is anticipated to be minimal.[174]

In May 2022, a trademark was filed for RealityOS, an operating system reportedly intended for virtual and augmented reality headsets, first mentioned in 2017. According to Bloomberg, the headset may come out in 2023.[175] Further insider reports state that the device uses iris scanning for payment confirmation and signing into accounts.[176] In June 2023, Apple formally announced its first mixed reality headset, the Apple Vision Pro, which ran its new visionOS operating system.[177] The headset was released in February of the following year.[178]

On June 18, 2022, the Apple Store in Towson, Maryland, became the first to unionize in the US, with the employees voting to join the International Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers.[179]

On July 7, 2022, Apple added Lockdown Mode to macOS 13 and iOS 16, as a response to the earlier Pegasus revelations; the mode increases security protections for high-risk users against targeted zero-day malware.[180]

Apple launched a buy now, pay later service called 'Apple Pay Later' for its Apple Wallet users in March 2023. The program allows its users to apply for loans between $50 and $1,000 to make online or in-app purchases and then repaying them through four installments spread over six weeks without any interest or fees.[181][182]

In November 2023, Apple agreed to a $25-million settlement in a US Department of Justice case that alleged Apple was discriminating against US citizens in hiring. Apple created jobs that were not listed online and that required a paper submission application, while advertising these jobs to foreign workers as part of recruitment for PERM.[183]

In January 2024, Apple announced compliance with the European Union's competition law, with major changes to the App Store and other services, effective on March 7. This enables iOS users in the 27-nation bloc to use alternative app stores, and alternative payment methods within apps. This adds a menu in Safari for downloading alternative browsers, such as Chrome or Firefox.[184]

In June 2024, Apple introduced Apple Intelligence to incorporate on-device artificial intelligence (AI) capabilities.[185]

On November 1, 2024, Apple announced its acquisition of Pixelmator, a company known for its image editing applications for iPhone and Mac. Apple had previously showcased Pixelmator's apps during its product launches, including naming Pixelmator Pro its Mac App of the Year in 2018 for its innovative use of machine learning and AI. In the announcement, Pixelmator stated that there would be no significant changes to its existing apps following the acquisition.[186]

On December 31, 2024, a preliminary settlement was filed in the Oakland California federal court that accused Apple of unlawfully recording private conversations, through unintentional Siri activations, and of sharing them with third parties, including advertisers. Apple agreed to a $95-million cash settlement to resolve this lawsuit in which its Siri assistant violated user privacy. While denying any wrongdoing, Apple settled the case, allowing affected users to potentially claim up to $20 per device. Attorneys sought $28.5 million in fees from the settlement fund.[187]

2025–present: Domestic investment, integrating AI capabilities into products and challenges
In 2025, Apple undertook its largest investment initiative to date, announcing a commitment to spend over $500 billion in the United States over the following four years. This extensive strategy includes the opening of a new manufacturing facility in Houston to produce servers supporting Apple Intelligence, expansion of research and development in fields like silicon engineering and AI, and the establishment of a new advanced manufacturing academy in Detroit. The company also pledged to double its US Advanced Manufacturing Fund and increase collaboration with American suppliers, aiming to create tens of thousands of jobs related to R&D, AI, and manufacturing technologies.[188]

The software landscape at Apple underwent a transformation in 2025. At its Worldwide Developers Conference (WWDC), Apple introduced the new "Liquid Glass" design language, rolled out unified system design updates across iOS 26, iPadOS 26, macOS Tahoe, and other platforms, and significantly expanded the capabilities of "Apple Intelligence", the company's personal AI system. According to Apple, these updates were intended to address previous criticisms of fragmented interfaces and to use on‑device and cloud‑based AI to improve privacy and user experience.[189][190]

Despite continued growth in its services sector, including a new all-time high for services revenue in the March quarter and the launch of updated models such as the iPhone 16e and M4 MacBook Air,[191][192] Apple faced significant challenges. The company contended with a 19% decline in stock value year-to-date, ongoing antitrust investigations by the US Department of Justice, and legal disputes involving the App Store. Competition in the AI space escalated, with rivals gaining ground. High-profile departures[193] and political tensions, including calls for Apple to manufacture iPhones domestically or face tariffs, added to the pressure, have been cited by analysts as contributing to a difficult year for CEO Tim Cook.[194]

In December 2025, Cook met with US House members to push back against the App Store Accountability Act which could require that Apple authenticates users' ages and possibly collect sensitive data on children.[195]

On January 12, 2026, Apple announced a partnership with Google Gemini for AI-powered Siri.[196]

In January 2026, Apple acquired Q.ai, an Israeli artificial intelligence startup specializing in imaging and machine learning technologies for audio processing. The financial terms were not disclosed, though media reports estimated the acquisition at nearly US$2 billion; this is Apple's second-largest purchase to date. Following the deal, Q.ai's founders and approximately 100 employees joined Apple.[197][198][199]

Products
See also: List of Apple products
Since the company's founding and into the early 2000s, Apple primarily sold computers, which are marketed as Macintosh since the mid-1980s. Since then, the company has expanded its product categories to include various portable devices, starting with the now discontinued iPod (2001), and later with the iPhone (2007) and iPad (2010). Apple also sells several other products that it categorizes as "Wearables, Home and Accessories", such as the Apple Watch, Apple TV, AirPods, HomePod, and Apple Vision Pro.

Commentators have described Apple devices as forming a cohesive ecosystem when used together,[200] and have also criticized them for reduced functionality or fewer features when used with competing devices, and for reliance on Apple's proprietary features, software, and services— an approach often described as a "walled garden".[201] As of 2023, there were over 2 billion Apple devices in active use worldwide.[202]

Mac
Main article: Mac (computer)
A MacBook Air, in midnight color, on a wooden desk.
MacBook Air with M2 chip
An thin iMac in blue color on a desk.
iMac with M1 chip
Mac, which is short for Macintosh, its official name until 1999, is Apple's line of personal computers that use the company's proprietary macOS operating system. Personal computers were Apple's original business line, but as of the end of 2024 they account for only about eight percent of the company's revenue.[203]

There are six Mac computer families in production:

iMac: Consumer all-in-one desktop computer, introduced in 1998.
Mac Mini: Consumer sub-desktop computer, introduced in 2005.
MacBook Pro: Professional notebook, introduced in 2006.
Mac Pro: Professional workstation, introduced in 2006.
MacBook Air: Consumer ultra-thin notebook, introduced in 2008.
Mac Studio: Professional small form-factor workstation, introduced in 2022.
Macs use Apple silicon chips, run the macOS operating system, and include Apple software like the Safari web browser, iMovie for home movie editing, GarageBand for music creation, and the iWork productivity suite. Apple also sells pro apps: Final Cut Pro for video production, Logic Pro for musicians and producers, and Xcode for software developers. Apple also sells a variety of accessories for Macs, including the Pro Display XDR, Apple Studio Display, Magic Mouse, Magic Trackpad, and Magic Keyboard.

iPhone
Main article: iPhone

Back view of iPhone 16
The iPhone is Apple's line of smartphones, which run the iOS operating system. The first iPhone was unveiled by Steve Jobs on January 9, 2007. Since then, new iPhone models have been released every year. When it was introduced, its multi-touch screen was described as "revolutionary" and a "game-changer" for the mobile phone industry. The device has been credited with creating the app economy.

iOS is one of the two major smartphone platforms in the world, alongside Android. The iPhone has generated large profits for the company, and is credited with helping to make Apple one of the world's most valuable publicly traded companies.[204] As of the end of 2024, the iPhone accounts for nearly half of the company's revenue.[203]

iPad
Main article: iPad

The 2020 iPad Pro on display
The iPad is Apple's line of tablets, which run iPadOS. The first-generation iPad was announced on January 27, 2010. The iPad is mainly marketed for consuming multimedia, creating art, working on documents, videoconferencing, and playing games. The iPad lineup consists of several base iPad models, and the smaller iPad Mini, upgraded iPad Air, and high-end iPad Pro. Apple has consistently improved the iPad's performance, with the iPad Pro adopting the same M-series chips as the Mac; but the iPad still receives criticism for its limited OS.[205][206]

As of September 2020, Apple has sold more than 500 million iPads, though sales peaked in 2013.[207] The iPad still remains the most popular tablet computer by sales as of the second quarter of 2020,[208] and accounted for seven percent of the company's revenue as of the end of 2024.[203] Apple sells several iPad accessories, including the Apple Pencil, Smart Keyboard, Smart Keyboard Folio, Magic Keyboard, and several adapters.

Other products

AirPods Max

Apple Watch Ultra
Apple makes several other products that it categorizes as "Wearables, Home and Accessories".[209] These products include the AirPods line of wireless headphones, Apple TV digital media players, Apple Watch smartwatches, Beats headphones, HomePod smart speakers, and the Vision Pro mixed reality headset. As of the end of 2024, this broad line of products comprises about ten percent of the company's revenues.[203]

Services
Apple offers a broad line of services, including advertising in the App Store and Apple News app, the AppleCare+ extended warranty plan, the iCloud+ cloud-based data storage service, payment services through the Apple Card credit card and the Apple Pay processing platform, digital content services including Apple Books, Apple Fitness+, Apple Music, Apple News+, Apple TV (formerly TV+), and the iTunes Store. Apple also provides Apple One, which is a bundle of these services. As of the end of 2024, services comprise about 26% of the company's revenue.[203] In 2019, Apple announced it would be making a concerted effort to expand its service revenues.[210]

Marketing
Main article: Marketing of Apple Inc.
Branding

The original official logo of Apple was used from 1977 to 1999.[211]
According to Steve Jobs, the company's name was inspired by his visit to an apple farm while on a fruitarian diet.[212] Apple's first logo, designed by Ron Wayne, depicts Sir Isaac Newton sitting under an apple tree. It was almost immediately replaced by Rob Janoff's "rainbow Apple", the now-familiar rainbow-colored silhouette of an apple with a bite taken out of it.[213] This logo has been erroneously referred to as a tribute to Alan Turing, with the bite mark a reference to his method of suicide.[214]

On August 27, 1999,[215] Apple officially dropped the rainbow scheme and began to use monochromatic logos nearly identical in shape to the previous rainbow incarnation. An Aqua-themed version of the monochrome logo was used from 1997 until 2003, and a glass-themed version was used from 2007 until 2013.[216]

Apple evangelists were actively engaged by the company at one time, but this was after the phenomenon had already been firmly established. Apple evangelist Guy Kawasaki has called the brand fanaticism "something that was stumbled upon",[217] while Jonathan Ive claimed in 2014 that "people have an incredibly personal relationship" with Apple's products.[87]

Fortune magazine named Apple the most admired company in the United States in 2008, and in the world from 2008 to 2012.[218] On September 30, 2013, Apple surpassed Coca-Cola to become the world's most valuable brand in the Omnicom Group's "Best Global Brands" report.[219] Boston Consulting Group has ranked Apple as the world's most innovative brand every year as of 2005.[220] As of January 2021, 1.65 billion Apple products were in active use.[221][222] In February 2023, that number exceeded 2 billion devices.[223][202] In 2023, the World Intellectual Property Organization's Madrid Yearly Review ranked Apple's number of trademark applications, filled under the Madrid System, as 10th in the world, with 74 trademark applications submitted during 2023.[224]

Apple was ranked the No. 3 company in the world in the 2024 Fortune 500 list.[225]

Advertising
Main article: Apple Inc. advertising
Apple's first slogan, "Byte into an Apple", was coined in the late 1970s.[226] From 1997 to 2002, the slogan "Think different" was used in advertising campaigns, and is still closely associated with Apple.[227] Apple also has slogans for specific product lines—for example, "iThink, therefore iMac" was used in 1998 to promote the iMac,[228] and "Say hello to iPhone" has been used in iPhone advertisements.[229] "Hello" was also used to introduce the original Macintosh, Newton, iMac ("hello (again)"), and iPod.[230]

From the introduction of the Macintosh in 1984, with the 1984 Super Bowl advertisement to the more modern Get a Mac adverts, Apple has been recognized for its efforts toward effective advertising and marketing for its products. However, claims made by later campaigns were criticized,[231] particularly the 2005 Power Mac ads.[232] Apple's product advertisements gained significant attention as a result of their graphics and song choice.[233] Musicians who benefited from an improved profile as a result of their songs being included on Apple advertisements include Canadian singer Feist with the song "1234" and Yael Naïm with the song "New Soul".[233]

Stores
Main article: Apple Store

Apple Fifth Avenue is the flagship store in New York City.

Customers visit the Genius Bar at Apple's Regent Street store in 2006.
The first Apple Stores were originally opened as two locations in May 2001 by then-CEO Steve Jobs,[94] after years of attempting but failing store-within-a-store concepts.[95] Seeing a need for improved retail presentation of the company's products, he began an effort in 1997 to revamp the retail program to get an improved relationship to consumers, and hired Ron Johnson in 2000.[95] Jobs relaunched Apple's online store in 1997,[234] and opened the first two physical stores in 2001.[94] The media initially speculated that Apple would fail,[96] but they exceeded the sales numbers of competing nearby stores, and within three years reached US$1 billion in annual sales, becoming the fastest retailer in history to do so.[96]

Over the years, Apple has expanded the number of retail locations and its geographical coverage, with 499 stores across 22 countries worldwide as of December 2017.[3] Strong product sales have placed Apple among the top-tier retail stores, with sales over $16 billion globally in 2011.[235] Apple Stores underwent a period of significant redesign, beginning in May 2016. This redesign included physical changes to the Apple Stores, such as open spaces and re-branded rooms, and changes in function to facilitate interaction between consumers and professionals.[236]

Many Apple Stores are located inside shopping malls, but Apple has built several stand-alone "flagship" stores in high-profile locations.[95] It has been granted design patents and received architectural awards for its stores' designs and construction, specifically for its use of glass staircases and cubes.[237] The success of Apple Stores have had significant influence over other consumer electronics retailers, who have lost traffic, control and profits due to a perceived higher quality of service and products at Apple Stores.[238] Due to the popularity of the brand, Apple receives a large number of job applications, many of which come from young workers.[235] Although Apple Store employees receive above-average pay, are offered money toward education and health care, and receive product discounts,[235] there are limited or no paths of career advancement.[235]

Market power
On March 16, 2020, France fined Apple €1.1 billion for colluding with two wholesalers to stifle competition and keep prices high by impeding independent resellers. The arrangement created aligned prices for Apple products such as iPads and personal computers for about half the French retail market. According to the French regulators, the abuses occurred between 2005 and 2017 but were first discovered after a complaint by an independent reseller, eBizcuss, in 2012.[239]

On August 13, 2020, Epic Games, the maker of the popular game Fortnite, sued both Apple and Google after Fortnite was removed from Apple's and Google's app stores. The lawsuits came after Apple and Google blocked the game after it introduced a direct payment system that bypassed the fees that Apple and Google had imposed.[240] In September 2020, Epic Games founded the Coalition for App Fairness together with thirteen other companies, which aims for better conditions for the inclusion of apps in the app stores.[241] Later, in December 2020, Facebook agreed to assist Epic in their legal game against Apple, planning to support the company by providing materials and documents to Epic. Facebook had, however, stated that the company would not participate directly with the lawsuit, although did commit to helping with the discovery of evidence relating to the trial of 2021. In the months prior to their agreement, Facebook had been dealing with feuds against Apple relating to the prices of paid apps and privacy rule changes.[242] Head of ad products for Facebook Dan Levy commented, saying that "this is not really about privacy for them, this is about an attack on personalized ads and the consequences it's going to have on small-business owners," commenting on the full-page ads placed by Facebook in various newspapers in December 2020.[243]

Privacy

PRISM is a clandestine surveillance program under which the NSA collects user data from companies like Facebook and Apple.[244]
Apple has publicly taken a pro-privacy stance, actively making privacy-conscious features and settings part of its conferences, promotional campaigns, and public image.[245] With its iOS 8 mobile operating system in 2014, the company started encrypting all contents of iOS devices through users' passcodes, making it impossible at the time for the company to provide customer data to law enforcement requests seeking such information.[246] With the popularity rise of cloud storage solutions, Apple began a technique in 2016 to do deep learning scans for facial data in photos on the user's local device and encrypting the content before uploading it to Apple's iCloud storage system.[247] It also introduced "differential privacy", a way to collect crowdsourced data from many users, while keeping individual users anonymous, in a system that Wired described as "trying to learn as much as possible about a group while learning as little as possible about any individual in it".[248] Users are explicitly asked if they want to participate, and can actively opt-in or opt-out.[249]

However, Apple has aided law enforcement in criminal investigations by providing iCloud backups of users' devices,[250] and the company's commitment to privacy has been questioned by its efforts to promote biometric authentication technology in its newer[when?] iPhone models, which do not have the same level of constitutional privacy as a passcode in the United States.[251]

With Apple's release of an update to iOS 14, Apple required all developers of iPhone, iPad, and iPod Touch applications to directly ask iPhone users permission to track them. The feature, called "App Tracking Transparency", received heavy criticism from Facebook, whose primary business model revolves around the tracking of users' data and sharing such data with advertisers so users can see more relevant ads, a technique commonly known as targeted advertising. After Facebook's measures, including purchasing full-page newspaper advertisements protesting App Tracking Transparency, Apple released the update in early 2021. A study by Verizon subsidiary Flurry Analytics reported only 4% of iOS users in the United States and 12% worldwide have opted into tracking.[252]

Prior to the release of iOS 15, Apple announced new efforts at combating child sexual abuse material on iOS and Mac platforms. Parents of minor iMessage users can now be alerted if their child sends or receives nude photographs. Additionally, on-device hashing would take place on media destined for upload to iCloud, and hashes would be compared to a list of known abusive images provided by law enforcement; if enough matches were found, Apple would be alerted and authorities informed. The new features received praise from law enforcement and victims rights advocates. However, privacy advocates, including the Electronic Frontier Foundation, condemned the new features as invasive and highly prone to abuse by authoritarian governments.[253]

Ireland's Data Protection Commission launched a privacy investigation to examine whether Apple complied with the EU's GDPR law following an investigation into how the company processes personal data with targeted ads on its platform.[254]

In December 2019, security researcher Brian Krebs discovered that the iPhone 11 Pro would still show the arrow indicator –signifying location services are being used– at the top of the screen while the main location services toggle is enabled, despite all individual location services being disabled. Krebs was unable to replicate this behavior on older models and when asking Apple for comment, he was told by Apple that "It is expected behavior that the Location Services icon appears in the status bar when Location Services is enabled. The icon appears for system services that do not have a switch in Settings."[255] Apple later further clarified that this behavior was to ensure compliance with ultra-wideband regulations in specific countries, a technology Apple started implementing in iPhones starting with iPhone 11 Pro, and emphasized that "the management of ultra wideband compliance and its use of location data is done entirely on the device and Apple is not collecting user location data." Will Strafach, an executive at security firm Guardian Firewall, confirmed the lack of evidence that location data was sent off to a remote server. Apple promised to add a new toggle for this feature and in later iOS revisions Apple provided users with the option to tap on the location services indicator in Control Center to see which specific service is using the device's location.[256][257]
History is the systematic study of the past, focusing primarily on the human past. As an academic discipline, it analyses and interprets evidence to construct narratives about what happened and explain why it happened. Some theorists categorize history as a social science, while others see it as part of the humanities or consider it a hybrid discipline. Similar debates surround the purpose of history—for example, whether its main aim is theoretical, to uncover the truth, or practical, to learn lessons from the past. In a more general sense, the term history refers not to an academic field but to the past itself, times in the past, or to individual texts about the past.

Historical research relies on primary and secondary sources to reconstruct past events and validate interpretations. Source criticism is used to evaluate these sources, assessing their authenticity, content, and reliability. Historians strive to integrate the perspectives of several sources to develop a coherent narrative. Different schools of thought, such as positivism, the Annales school, Marxism, and postmodernism, have distinct methodological approaches.

History is a broad discipline encompassing many branches. Some focus on specific time periods, such as ancient history, while others concentrate on particular geographic regions, such as the history of Africa. Thematic categorizations include political history, military history, social history, and economic history. Branches associated with specific research methods and sources include quantitative history, comparative history, and oral history.

History emerged as a field of inquiry in antiquity to replace myth-infused narratives, with influential early traditions originating in Greece, China, and later in the Islamic world. Historical writing evolved throughout the ages and became increasingly professional, particularly during the 19th century, when a rigorous methodology and various academic institutions were established. History is related to many fields, including historiography, philosophy, education, and politics.

Definition
As an academic discipline, history is the study of the past with the main focus on the human past.[1] It conceptualizes and describes what happened by collecting and analysing evidence to construct narratives. These narratives cover not only how events developed over time but also why they happened and in which contexts, providing an explanation of relevant background conditions and causal mechanisms. History further examines the meaning of historical events and the underlying human motives driving them.[2]

In a slightly different sense, history refers to the past events themselves. Under this interpretation, history is what happened rather than the academic field studying what happened. When used as a countable noun, a history is a representation of the past in the form of a history text. History texts are cultural products involving active interpretation and reconstruction. The narratives presented in them can change as historians discover new evidence or reinterpret already-known sources. The past itself, by contrast, is static and unchangeable.[3] Some historians focus on the interpretative and explanatory aspects to distinguish histories from chronicles, arguing that chronicles only catalogue events in chronological order, whereas histories aim at a comprehensive understanding of their causes, contexts, and consequences.[4][a]

History has been primarily concerned with written documents. It focused on recorded history since the invention of writing, leaving prehistory[b] to other fields, such as archaeology.[7] Its scope broadened in the 20th century as historians became interested in the human past before the invention of writing.[8][c]

Historians debate whether history is a social science or forms part of the humanities. Like social scientists, historians formulate hypotheses, gather objective evidence, and present arguments based on this evidence. At the same time, history aligns closely with the humanities because of its reliance on subjective aspects associated with interpretation, storytelling, human experience, and cultural heritage.[10] Some historians strongly support one or the other classification while others characterize history as a hybrid discipline that does not belong to one category at the exclusion of the other.[11] History contrasts with pseudohistory, a label used to describe practices that deviate from historiographical standards by relying on disputed historical evidence, selectively ignoring genuine evidence, or using other means to distort the historical record. Often motivated by specific ideological agendas, pseudohistorical practices mimic historical methodology to promote biased, misleading narratives that lack rigorous analysis and scholarly consensus.[12]

Purpose
Various suggestions about the purpose or value of history have been made. Some historians propose that its primary function is the pure discovery of truth about the past. This view emphasizes that the disinterested pursuit of truth is an end in itself, while external purposes, associated with ideology or politics, threaten to undermine the accuracy of historical research by distorting the past. In this role, history also challenges traditional myths lacking factual support.[13][d]

A different perspective suggests that the main value of history lies in the lessons it teaches for the present. This view is based on the idea that an understanding of the past can guide decision-making, for example, to avoid repeating previous mistakes.[15] A related perspective focuses on a general understanding of the human condition, making people aware of the diversity of human behaviour across different contexts—similar to what one can learn by visiting foreign countries.[16] History can also foster social cohesion by providing people with a collective identity through a shared past, helping to preserve and cultivate cultural heritage and values across generations.[17] For some scholars, including Whig historians and the Marxist scholar E. H. Carr, history is a key to understanding the present[18] and, in Carr's case, shaping the future.[19]

History has sometimes been used for political or ideological purposes, for instance, to justify the status quo by emphasising the respectability of certain traditions or to promote change by highlighting past injustices.[20] In extreme forms, evidence is intentionally ignored or misinterpreted to construct misleading narratives, which can result in pseudohistory or historical denialism.[12][e] Influential examples are Holocaust denial, Armenian genocide denial, Nanjing Massacre denial, and Holodomor denial.[22]

Etymology
Photo of a damaged text written in black ink
Fragment of the Histories by Herodotus, an Ancient Greek historical text[23]
The word history comes from the Ancient Greek term ἵστωρ (histōr), meaning 'learned, wise man'. It gave rise to the Ancient Greek word ἱστορία (historiā), which had a wide meaning associated with inquiry in general and giving testimony. The term was later adopted into Classical Latin as historia. In Hellenistic and Roman times, the meaning of the term shifted, placing more emphasis on narrative aspects and the art of presentation rather than focusing on investigation and testimony.[24]

The word entered Middle English in the 14th century via the Old French term histoire.[25] At this time, it meant 'story, tale', encompassing both factual and fictional narratives. In the 15th century, its meaning shifted to cover the branch of knowledge studying the past in addition to narratives about the past.[26] In the 18th and 19th centuries, the word history became more closely associated with factual accounts and evidence-based inquiry, coinciding with the professionalization of historical inquiry, a meaning still dominant in contemporary usage.[27] The dual meaning, referring to both mere stories and factual accounts of the past, is present in the terms for history in many other European languages. They include the French histoire, the Italian storia, and the German Geschichte.[28]

Methods
Main article: Historical method
The historical method is a set of techniques historians use to research and interpret the past, covering the processes of collecting, evaluating, and synthesizing evidence.[f] It seeks to ensure scholarly rigour, accuracy, and reliability in how historical evidence is chosen, analysed, and interpreted.[30] Historical research often starts with a research question to define the scope of the inquiry. Some research questions focus on a simple description of what happened. Others aim to explain why a particular event occurred, refute an existing theory, or confirm a new hypothesis.[31]

Sources and source criticism
To answer research questions, historians rely on various types of evidence to reconstruct the past and support their conclusions. Historical evidence is usually divided into primary and secondary sources.[32] A primary source is a source that originated during the period that is studied. Primary sources can take various forms, such as official documents, letters, diaries, eyewitness accounts, photographs, and audio or video recordings. They also include historical remains examined in archaeology, geology, and the medical sciences, such as artefacts and fossils unearthed from excavations. Primary sources offer the most direct evidence of historical events.[33]

Photo of archive storage area; on the left, the hand cranks to operate shelving units; on the right, the shelves of one unit containing storage boxes
Archives preserve large quantities of original sources for researchers to access.[34]
A secondary source is a source that analyses or interprets information found in other sources.[35] Whether a document is a primary or a secondary source depends not only on the document itself but also on the purpose for which it is used. For example, if a historian writes a text about slavery based on an analysis of historical documents, then the text is a secondary source on slavery and a primary source on the historian's opinion.[36][g] Consistency with available sources is one of the main standards of historical works. For instance, the discovery of new sources may lead historians to revise or dismiss previously accepted narratives.[38] To find and access primary and secondary sources, historians consult archives, libraries, and museums. Archives play a central role by preserving countless original sources and making them available to researchers in a systematic and accessible manner. Thanks to technological advances, historians increasingly rely on online resources, which offer vast digital databases with methods to search and access specific documents.[39]

Source criticism is the process of analysing and evaluating the information a source provides.[h] Typically, this process begins with external criticism, which evaluates the authenticity of a source. It addresses the questions of when and where the source was created and seeks to identify the author, understand their reasons for producing the source, and determine if it has undergone some type of modification since its creation. Additionally, the process involves distinguishing between original works, copies, and deceptive forgeries.[41]

Internal criticism evaluates the content of a source, typically beginning with the clarification of the meaning within the source. This involves disambiguating individual terms that could be misunderstood but may also require a general translation if the source is written in an unfamiliar language.[i] Once the information content of a source is understood, internal criticism is specifically interested in determining accuracy. Critics ask whether the information is reliable or misrepresents the topic and further question whether the source is comprehensive or omits important details. One way to make these assessments is to evaluate whether the author was able, in principle, to provide a faithful presentation of the studied event. Other approaches include the assessment of the influences of the author's intentions and prejudices, and cross-referencing information with other credible sources. Being aware of the inadequacies of a source helps historians decide whether and which aspects of it to trust, and how to use it to construct a narrative.[43]

Synthesis and schools of thought
The selection, analysis, and criticism of sources result in the validation of a large collection of mostly isolated statements about the past. As a next step, sometimes termed historical synthesis, historians examine how the individual pieces of evidence fit together to form part of a larger story.[j] Constructing this broader perspective is crucial for a comprehensive understanding of the topic as a whole. It is a creative aspect[k] of historical writing that reconstructs, interprets, and explains what happened by showing how different events are connected.[46] In this way, historians address not only which events occurred but also why they occurred and what consequences they had.[47] While there are no universally accepted techniques for this synthesis, historians rely on various interpretative tools and approaches in this process.[48]

Drawing of a seated man in formal dark clothes
Auguste Comte articulated positivism, advocating a science-based approach to history.[49]
One tool to provide an accessible overview of complex developments is the use of periodization, which divides a timeframe into different periods, each organized around central themes or developments that shaped the period. For example, the three-age system is traditionally used to divide early human history into Stone Age, Bronze Age, and Iron Age based on the predominant materials and technologies during these periods.[50] Another methodological tool is the examination of silences, gaps or omissions in the historical record of events that occurred but did not leave significant evidential traces. Silences can happen when contemporaries find information too obvious to document but may also occur if there are specific reasons to withhold or destroy information.[51][l] Conversely, when large datasets are available, quantitative approaches can be used. For instance, economic and social historians commonly employ statistical analysis to identify patterns and trends associated with large groups.[54]

Different schools of thought often come with their own methodological implications for how to write history.[55] Positivists emphasize the scientific nature of historical inquiry, focusing on empirical evidence to discover objective truths.[56] In contrast, postmodernists reject grand narratives that claim to offer a single, objective truth. Instead, they highlight the subjective nature of historical interpretation, which leads to a multiplicity of divergent perspectives.[57] Marxists interpret historical developments as expressions of economic forces and class struggles.[58] The Annales school highlights long-term social and economic trends while relying on quantitative and interdisciplinary methods.[59] Feminist historians study the role of gender in history, with a particular interest in analysing the experiences of women to challenge patriarchal perspectives.[60]

Areas of study
History is a wide field of inquiry encompassing many branches. Some branches focus on a specific time period, while others concentrate on a particular geographic region or a distinct theme. Specializations of different types can usually be combined; for example, a work on economic history in ancient Egypt merges temporal, regional, and thematic perspectives. For topics with a broad scope, the amount of primary sources is often too extensive for an individual historian to review, forcing them to either narrow the scope of their topic or also rely on secondary sources to arrive at a wide overview.[61]

By period
Chronological division is a common approach to organizing the vast expanse of history into more manageable segments. Different periods are often defined based on dominant themes that characterize a specific time frame and significant events that initiated these developments or brought them to an end. Depending on the selected context and level of detail, a period may be as short as a decade or longer than several centuries.[62] A traditionally influential approach divides human history into prehistory, ancient history, post-classical history, early modern history, and modern history.[63][m] Depending on the region and theme, the time frames covered by these periods can vary and historians may use entirely different periodizations.[65] For example, traditional periodizations of Chinese history follow the main dynasties,[66] and the division into pre-Columbian, colonial, and post-colonial periods plays a central role in the history of the Americas.[67]

Photo of the skeleton of a female hominin in a standing position, displayed in a museum
Historians draw on evidence from various fields to examine prehistory, including fossils like Lucy.[68]
The study of prehistory includes the examination of the evolution of human-like species several million years ago, leading to the emergence of anatomically modern humans about 200,000 years ago.[69] Subsequently, humans migrated out of Africa to populate most of the earth. Towards the end of prehistory, technological advances in the form of new and improved tools led many groups to give up their established nomadic lifestyle, based on hunting and gathering, in favour of a sedentary lifestyle supported by early forms of agriculture.[70] The absence of written documents from this period presents researchers with unique challenges. It results in an interdisciplinary approach relying on other forms of evidence from fields such as archaeology, anthropology, palaeontology, and geology.[71]

Historians studying the ancient period examine the emergence of the first major civilizations in regions such as Mesopotamia, Egypt, the Indus Valley, China, and Peru, beginning approximately 3500 BCE in some regions. The new social, economic, and political complexities necessitated the development of writing systems. Thanks to advancements in agriculture, surplus food allowed these civilizations to support larger populations, leading to urbanization, the establishment of trade networks, and the emergence of regional empires. In the later part of the ancient period, sometimes termed the classical period, societies in China, India, Persia, and the Mediterranean expanded further, reaching new cultural, scientific, and political heights. Meanwhile, influential religious systems and philosophical ideas were first formulated, such as Hinduism, Buddhism, Confucianism, Judaism, and Greek philosophy.[72]

In the study of post-classical or medieval history, which began around 500 CE, historians note the growing influence of major religions. Missionary religions, like Buddhism, Christianity, and Islam, spread rapidly and established themselves as world religions, marking a cultural shift as they gradually replaced other belief systems. Meanwhile, inter-regional trade networks flourished, leading to increased technological and cultural exchange. Conquering many territories in Asia and Europe, the Mongol Empire became a dominant force during the 13th and 14th centuries.[73]

Historians focused on early modern history, which started roughly in 1500 CE, commonly highlight how European states rose to global power. As gunpowder empires, they explored and colonized large parts of the world. As a result, the Americas were integrated into the global network, triggering a vast biological exchange of plants, animals, people, and diseases.[n] The Scientific Revolution prompted major discoveries and accelerated technological progress. It was accompanied by other intellectual developments, such as humanism and the Enlightenment, which ushered in secularization.[75]

Oil painting of worker in an iron rolling mill
The Industrial Revolution had a profound impact on economic and social life, marking the transition from agrarian to industrial societies.[76]
In the study of modern history, which began at the end of the 18th century, historians are interested in how the Industrial Revolution transformed economies by introducing more efficient modes of production. Western powers established vast colonial empires, gaining superiority through industrialized military technology. The increased international exchange of goods, ideas, and people marked the beginning of globalization. Various social revolutions challenged autocratic and colonial regimes, paving the way for democracies. Many developments in fields like science, technology, economy, living standards, and human population accelerated at unprecedented rates. This happened despite the widespread destruction caused by two world wars, which rebalanced international power relations by undermining European dominance.[77]

By geographic location
Areas of historical study can also be categorized by the geographic locations they examine.[78] Geography plays a central role in history through its influence on food production, natural resources, economic activities, political boundaries, and cultural interactions.[79][o] Some historical works limit their scope to small regions, such as a village or a settlement. Others focus on broad territories that encompass entire continents, like the histories of Africa, Asia, Europe, the Americas, and Oceania.[81]

Photo of the Pyramids of Giza, with the three main pyramids at the center against a blue sky in the background
The Pyramids of Giza showcase the lasting heritage of the ancient Egyptian civilization.[82]
The history of Africa begins with the examination of the evolution of anatomically modern humans.[83] Ancient historians describe how the invention of writing and the establishment of civilization happened in ancient Egypt in the 4th millennium BCE.[84] Over the next millennia, other notable civilizations and kingdoms formed in Nubia, Axum, Carthage, Ghana, Mali, and Songhay.[85] Islam began spreading across North Africa in the 7th century CE and became the dominant faith in many empires. Meanwhile, trade along the trans-Saharan route intensified.[86] Beginning in the 15th century, millions of Africans were enslaved and forcibly transported to the Americas as part of the Atlantic slave trade.[87] Most of the continent was colonized by European powers in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.[88] Amid rising nationalism, African states gradually gained independence in the aftermath of World War II, a period that saw economic progress, rapid population growth, and struggles for political stability.[89]

Historians studying the history of Asia note the arrival of anatomically modern humans around 100,000 years ago.[90] They explore Asia's role as one of the cradles of civilization, with the emergence of some of the first ancient civilizations in Mesopotamia, the Indus Valley, and China beginning in the 4th and 3rd millennia BCE.[91] In the following millennia, civilisations on the Asian continent gave birth to all major world religions and several influential philosophical traditions, such as Hinduism, Buddhism, Confucianism, Taoism, Christianity, and Islam.[92] Other developments were the establishment of the Silk Road, which facilitated trade and cultural exchange across Eurasia, and the formation of powerful empires, such as the Mongol Empire.[93] European influence grew over the following centuries, ushering in the modern era. It culminated in the 19th and early 20th centuries when many parts of Asia came under direct colonial control until the end of World War II.[94] The post-independence period was characterized by modernization, economic growth, and a steep increase in population.[95]

A map of Ancient Greece, showing both sides of the Aegean Sea
Due to its influence on Western culture and philosophy, Ancient Greece is an important area of study for historians of Europe.[96]
In the study of the history of Europe, historians describe the arrival of the first anatomically modern humans about 45,000 years ago.[97] They explore how in the first millennium BCE the Ancient Greeks contributed key elements to the culture, philosophy, and politics associated with the Western world,[96] and how their cultural heritage influenced the Roman and Byzantine Empires.[98] The medieval period began with the fall of the Western Roman Empire in the 5th century CE and was marked by the spread of Christianity.[99] Starting in the 15th century, European exploration and colonization interconnected the globe, while cultural, intellectual, and scientific developments transformed Western societies.[100] From the late 18th to the early 20th centuries, European global dominance was further solidified by the Industrial Revolution and the establishment of large overseas colonies.[101] It came to an end because of the devastating effects of two world wars.[102] In the following Cold War era, the continent was divided into a Western and an Eastern bloc. They pursued political and economic integration in the aftermath of the Cold War.[103]

Historians examining the history of the Americas document the arrival of the first humans around 20,000 to 15,000 years ago.[104] The Americas were home to some of the earliest civilizations, like the Norte Chico civilization in South America and the Maya and Olmec civilizations in Central America.[105] Over the next millennia, major empires arose beside them, such as the Teotihuacan, Aztec, and Inca empires.[106] Following the arrival of the Europeans from the late 15th century onwards, the spread of newly introduced diseases drastically reduced the local population. Together with colonization, it led to the collapse of major empires as demographic and cultural landscapes were reshaped.[107] Independence movements in the 18th and 19th centuries led to the formation of new nations across the Americas.[108] In the 20th century, the United States emerged as a dominant global power and a key player in the Cold War.[109]

In the study of the history of Oceania, historians note the arrival of humans about 60,000 to 50,000 years ago.[110] They explore the establishment of diverse regional societies and cultures, first in Australia and Papua New Guinea and later also on other Pacific Islands.[111] The arrival of the Europeans in the 16th century prompted significant transformations, and by the end of the 19th century, most of the region had come under Western control.[112] Oceania became involved in various conflicts during the world wars and experienced decolonization in the post-war period.[113]

By theme
Historians often limit their inquiry to a specific theme.[114] Some propose a general subdivision into three major themes: political history, economic history, and social history. However, the boundaries between these branches are vague and their relation to other thematic branches, such as intellectual history, is not always clear.[115]

Political history studies the organization of power in society, examining how power structures arise, develop, and interact. Throughout most of recorded history, states or state-like structures have been central to this field of study. It explores how a state was organized internally, like factions, parties, leaders, and other political institutions. It also examines which policies were implemented and how the state interacted with other states.[116] Political history has been studied since antiquity by historians such as Herodotus and Thucydides, making it one of the oldest branches of history, while other major subfields have only become established branches in the past century.[117]

Photo of a reconstructed medieval trebuchet on a stone platform against a cloudy sky in the background
Military history studies armed conflicts, including advancements in military technology, like trebuchets.[118]
Diplomatic and military history are associated with political history. Diplomatic history examines international relations between states. It covers foreign policy topics such as negotiations, strategic considerations, treaties, and conflicts between nations as well as the role of international organizations in these processes.[119] Military history studies the impact and development of armed conflicts in human history. This includes the examination of specific events, like the analysis of a particular battle and the discussion of the different causes of a war. It also involves more general considerations about the evolution of warfare, including advancements in military technology, strategies, tactics, logistics, and institutions.[120]

Economic history examines how commodities are produced, exchanged, and consumed. It covers economic aspects such as the use of land, labour, and capital, the supply and demand of goods, the costs and means of production, and the distribution of income and wealth. Economic historians typically focus on general trends in the form of impersonal forces, such as inflation, rather than the actions and decisions of individuals. If enough data is available, they rely on quantitative methods, like statistical analysis. For periods before the modern era, available data is often limited, forcing economic historians to rely on scarce sources and extrapolate information from them.[121]

Social history is a broad field investigating social phenomena, but its precise definition is disputed. Some theorists understand it as the study of everyday life outside the domains of politics and economics, including cultural practices, family structures, community interactions, and education. A closely related approach focuses on experience rather than activities, examining how members of particular social groups, like social classes, races, genders, or age groups, experienced their world. Other definitions see social history as the study of social problems, like poverty, disease, and crime, or take a broader perspective by examining how whole societies developed.[122] Closely related fields include cultural history, gender history, and religious history.[123]

Intellectual history is the history of ideas and studies how concepts, philosophies, and ideologies have evolved. It is particularly interested in academic fields but not limited to them, including the study of the beliefs and prejudices of ordinary people. In addition to studying intellectual movements themselves, it also examines the cultural and social contexts that shaped them and their influence on other historical developments.[124] As closely related fields, the history of philosophy investigates the development of philosophical thought[125] while the history of science studies the evolution of scientific theories and practices, such as the scientific contributions of Charles Darwin and Albert Einstein.[126] Art history, another connected discipline, examines historical works of art and the development of artistic activities, styles, and movements. It includes a discussion of the cultural, social, and political contexts of art production.[127]

Environmental history studies the relation between humans and their environment. It seeks to understand how humans and the rest of nature have affected each other in the course of history.[128] Other thematic branches include constitutional history, legal history, urban history, business history, history of technology, medical history, history of education, and people's history.[129]

Others
Some branches of history are characterized by the methods they employ, such as quantitative history and digital history, which rely on quantitative methods and digital media.[130] Comparative history compares historical phenomena from distinct times, regions, or cultures to examine their similarities and differences.[131] Unlike most other branches, oral history relies on oral reports rather than written documents, encompassing eyewitness accounts, hearsay, and communal legends. It reflects the personal experiences, interpretations, and memories of common people, showcasing how people subjectively remember the past.[132] Counterfactual history uses counterfactual thinking to examine alternative courses of history, exploring what could have happened under different circumstances.[133] Certain branches of history are distinguished by their theoretical outlook, such as Marxist and feminist history.[134]

An old double-hemisphere map of the world
World history examines history on a global level, incorporating the whole of human history.[135]
Some distinctions focus on the scope of the studied topic. Big History is the branch with the broadest scope, covering everything from the Big Bang to the present, incorporating elements of cosmology, geology, biology, and anthropology.[9] World history is another branch with a wide topic. It examines human history as a whole, starting with the evolution of human-like species.[135] The terms macrohistory, mesohistory, and microhistory refer to different scales of analysis, ranging from large-scale patterns that affect the whole globe to detailed studies of local contexts, small communities, family histories, particular individuals, or specific events.[136] Closely related to microhistory is the genre of historical biography, which recounts an individual's life in its historical context and the legacy it left.[137]

Public history involves activities that present history to the general public. It usually happens outside the traditional academic settings in contexts like museums, historical sites, heritage tourism, and popular media.[138]

Evolution of the discipline
Before the invention of writing, the preservation and transmission of historical knowledge were limited to oral traditions.[139] Early forms of historical writing mixed facts with mythological elements, such as the Epic of Gilgamesh from ancient Mesopotamia and the Odyssey, an ancient Greek text attributed to Homer.[140] Published in the 5th century BCE, the Histories by Herodotus[p] was one of the foundational texts of the Western historical tradition, putting more emphasis on rational and evidence-based inquiry than the stories of Homer and other poets.[142] Thucydides followed and further refined Herodotus's approach but focused more on particular political and military developments in contrast to the wide scope and ethnographic elements of Herodotus's work.[143] Roman historiography was heavily influenced by Greek traditions. It often included not only historical facts but also moral judgments of historical figures.[q] Early Roman historians used an annalistic style, arranging past events by year with little commentary, while later ones preferred a more narrative and analytical approach.[145]

The Book of Rivers and Canals from Sima Qian's Records of the Grand Historian
Sima Qian's Shiji or Records of the Grand Historian was a foundational work in Chinese historiography.[146]
Another complex tradition of historical writing emerged in ancient China, with early precursors starting in the late 2nd millennium BCE. It considered annals the highest form of historical writing and emphasized verification through sources. This tradition was associated with Confucian philosophy and closely tied to the government in the form of the ruling dynasty, each responsible for writing the official history of its predecessor. Chinese historians established a coherent and systematic method for recording historical events earlier than other traditions.[147] Of particular influence was the work of Sima Qian, whose meticulous research method and inclusion of alternative viewpoints shaped subsequent historiographical standards.[148] In ancient India, historical narratives were closely associated with religion. They often mixed factual accounts with supernatural elements, as seen in works like the Mahabharata.[149]

In Europe during the medieval period, history was primarily documented by the clergy in the form of chronicles. Christian historians drew from Greco-Roman and Jewish traditions and reinterpreted the past from a religious perspective as a narrative highlighting God's divine plan.[150] Influential contributions shaping this tradition were made by the historians Eusebius of Caesarea and Bede and by the theologian Augustine of Hippo.[151] In the Islamic world, historical writing was similarly influenced by religion, interpreting the past from a Muslim perspective. It placed great importance on the chain of transmission to preserve the authority of historical accounts.[152] Al-Tabari wrote a comprehensive history, spanning from the creation of the world to his present day. Ibn Khaldun reflected on philosophical issues underlying the practice of historians, such as universal patterns shaping historical changes and the limits of historical truth.[153]

With the emergence of the Tang dynasty (618–907 CE) in China, historical writing became increasingly institutionalized as a bureau for the writing of history was established in 629 CE. The bureau oversaw the establishment of Veritable Records, a comprehensive compilation serving as the basis of the standard national history. Tang dynasty historians emphasized the difference between actual events that occurred in the past and the way these events are documented in historical texts.[154] Historical writing in the Song dynasty (960–1279 CE) happened in a variety of historical genres, including encyclopedias, biographies, and historical novels, while history became a standard subject in the Chinese educational system.[155] Influenced by the Chinese model, a tradition of historical writing emerged in Japan in the 8th century CE. Like in China, historical writing was closely related to the imperial household, but Japanese historians placed less importance on critical source evaluation than their Chinese counterparts.[156]

During the Renaissance and the early modern period (approximately 1500 to 1800), the different historical traditions came increasingly into contact with each other.[157] Starting in 14th-century Europe, the Renaissance led to a shift away from medieval religious outlooks towards a renewed interest in the earlier classical tradition of Greece and Rome. Renaissance humanists used sophisticated text criticism to scrutinize earlier religious historical works, which contributed to the secularization of historical writing. During the 15th to 17th centuries, historians placed greater emphasis on the didactic role of history, using it to promote the established order or argue for a return to an idealised vision of the past. As the invention of the printing press made written documents more accessible and affordable, interest in history expanded outside the clergy and nobility. At the same time, empiricist thought associated with the Scientific Revolution questioned the possibility of arriving at universal historical truths.[158] During the Age of Enlightenment in the 18th century, historical writing was influenced by rationalism and scepticism. Aiming to challenge traditional authority and dogma through reason and empirical methods, historians tried to uncover deeper patterns and meaning in the past, while the scope of historical inquiry expanded with an increased focus on societal and economic topics as well as comparisons between different cultures.[159]

In China during the Ming dynasty (1368–1644), public interest in historical writings and their availability also increased. In addition to the continuation of the Veritable Records by official governmental historians, non-official works by private scholars flourished. These scholars tended to use a more creative style and sometimes challenged orthodox accounts.[160] In the Islamic world, new traditions of historical writings emerged in the Safavid, Mughal, and Ottoman Empires.[161] Meanwhile, in the Americas, European explorers recorded and interpreted indigenous narratives, which had been passed down through oral and pictographic practices. These views sometimes contested traditional European perspectives.[162]

Painting of an older man with white hair dressed in a formal black garment with an ornate badge on his chest
Leopold von Ranke revolutionized the standards of historical scholarship by introducing a thorough evaluation of primary sources.[163]
Historical writing was transformed in the 19th century as it became more professional and science-oriented. Following the work of Leopold von Ranke, a systematic method of source criticism was widely accepted while academic institutions dedicated to history were established in the form of university departments, professional associations, and journals.[164] In tune with this scientific outlook, Auguste Comte formulated the school of positivism and aimed to discover general laws of history, similar to the laws of nature studied by physicists.[165] Building on the philosophy of Georg Wilhelm Friedrich Hegel, Karl Marx proposed one such general law in his theory of historical materialism, arguing that economic forces and class struggle are the fundamental drivers of historical change.[166] Another influential development was the spread of European historiographical methods, which became the dominant approach to the academic study of the past worldwide.[167]

In the 20th century, traditional historical assumptions and practices were challenged while the scope of historical research broadened.[168] The Annales school used insights from sociology, psychology, and economics to study long-term developments.[169] Authoritarian regimes, like Nazi Germany, the Soviet Union, and China, manipulated historical narratives for ideological purposes.[170] Various historians covered unconventional perspectives, focusing on the experiences of marginalized groups through approaches such as history from below, microhistory, oral history, and feminist history.[171] Postcolonialism aimed to undermine the hegemony of the Western approach and postmodernism rejected the claim to a single universal truth in history.[172] Intellectual historians examined the historical development of ideas.[173] In the second half of the century, renewed attempts to write histories of the world as a whole gained momentum, while technological advances fostered the growth of quantitative and digital history.[174]

Related fields
Historiography
Main article: Historiography
Bust of a man with a turban and a beard
Ibn Khaldun was an influential figure in Islamic historiography.[175]
Historiography is the study of the methods and development of historical research. Historiographers examine what historians do, resulting in a metatheory in the form of a history of history. Some theorists use the term historiography in a different sense to refer to written accounts of the past.[176]

A central topic in historiography as a metatheory focuses on the standards of evidence and reasoning in historical inquiry. Historiographers examine and codify how historians use sources to construct narratives about the past, including the analysis of the interpretative assumptions from which they proceed. Closely related issues include the style and rhetorical presentation of works of history.[177]

By comparing the works of different historians, historiographers identify schools of thought based on shared research methods, assumptions, and styles.[178] For example, they examine the characteristics of the Annales school, like its use of quantitative data from various disciplines and its interest in economic and social developments taking place over extended periods.[179] Comparisons also extend to whole eras from ancient to modern times. This way, historiography traces the development of history as an academic discipline, highlighting how the dominant methods, themes, and research goals have changed over time.[180]

Philosophy of history
Main article: Philosophy of history
The philosophy of history[r] investigates the theoretical foundations of history. It is interested both in the past itself as a series of interconnected events and in the academic field studying this process. Insights and approaches from various branches of philosophy are relevant to this endeavour, such as metaphysics, epistemology, hermeneutics, and ethics.[182]

In examining history as a process, philosophers explore the basic entities that make up historical phenomena. Some approaches rely primarily on the beliefs and actions of individual humans, while others include collective and other general entities, such as civilizations, institutions, ideologies, and social forces.[183] A related topic concerns the nature of causal mechanisms connecting historic events with their causes and consequences.[184] One view holds that there are general laws of history that determine the course of events, similar to the laws of nature studied in the natural sciences. According to another perspective, causal relations between historic events are unique and shaped by contingent factors.[185] Historically, some philosophers have suggested that the general direction of the course of history follows large patterns. According to one proposal, history is cyclic, meaning that on a sufficiently large scale, individual events or general trends repeat. Another such theory asserts that history is a linear, teleological process moving towards a predetermined goal.[186][s]

The topics of philosophy of history and historiography overlap as both are interested in the standards of historical reasoning. Historiographers typically focus more on describing specific methods and developments encountered in the study of history. Philosophers of history, by contrast, tend to explore more general patterns, including evaluative questions about which methods and assumptions are correct.[188] Historical reasoning is sometimes used in philosophy and other disciplines as a method to explain phenomena. This approach, known as historicism, argues that understanding something requires knowledge of its unique history or how it evolved. For instance, historicism about truth states that truth depends on historical circumstances, meaning that there are no transhistorical truths. Historicism contrasts with approaches that seek a timeless and universal understanding of their subject matter.[189]

Historical objectivity
Diverse debates in the philosophy of history focus on the possibility of an objective account of history. Various theorists argue that this ideal is not achievable, pointing to the subjective nature of interpretation, the narrative aspect of history, and the influence of personal values and biases on the perspective and actions of both historic individuals and historians. According to one view, some particular facts are objective, for example, facts about when a drought occurred or which army was defeated. However, this view does not ensure general objectivity since historians have to interpret and synthesize facts to arrive at an overall narrative describing large trends and developments.[190] As a result, some historians, such as G. M. Trevelyan and Keith Jenkins, assert that all history is biased, arguing that historical narratives are never free of subjective presuppositions and value judgments.[191]

Some outlooks associated with realism, empiricism, and reconstructionism,[192] conceptualise history as the search for truth or knowledge, which they see as recoverable through rigorous evaluation and careful interpretation of evidence.[193][t] Other scholars critique this view, emphasising the subjective and partial nature of historical knowledge.[u] Perspectivists claim that historical perspectives are inherently subjective, as they require selecting particular sources and inquiries, and ascertaining what information can be regarded as historical fact. They argue that statements can only be objective within or relative to one of several competing historical perspectives.[198] A stronger scepticist or relativist outlook states that no historical knowledge can be proven objective.[199][v] This emphasis on subjectivities has been extended by postmodernist theories that suggest that it is impossible to know the past objectively, adding that meaning is created through human-made texts, the language of which "constitute our world as we perceive it".[201][w] Neo-realists have responded to this trend by reemphasising the centrality of empiricist methodologies to historical analysis. They acknowledge the influence of subjective evaluations but contend that historical truth is reachable nonetheless.[203][x]

Education
Black-and-white photo of a highschool classroom of girls looking to the front while their teacher stands behind them and explains
History is a standard school subject in most countries.[204]
History is part of the school curriculum in most countries.[204] Early history education aims to make students interested in the past and familiarize them with fundamental concepts of historical thought. By fostering a basic historical awareness, it seeks to instil a sense of identity by helping them understand their cultural roots.[205] It often takes a narrative form by presenting children with simple stories, which may focus on historic individuals or the origins of local holidays, festivals, and food.[206] More advanced history education encountered in secondary school covers a broader spectrum of topics, ranging from ancient to modern history, at both local and global levels. It further aims to acquaint students with historical research methodologies, including the abilities to interpret and critically evaluate historical claims.[207]

History teachers employ a variety of teaching methods. They include narrative presentations of historical developments, questions to engage students and prompt critical thinking, and discussions on historical topics. Students work with historical sources directly to learn how to analyse and interpret evidence, both individually and in group activities. They engage in historical writing to develop the skills of articulating their thoughts clearly and persuasively. Assessment through oral or written tests aims to ensure that learning goals are reached.[208] Traditional methodologies in history education often present numerous facts, like dates of significant events and names of historical figures, which students are expected to memorize. Some modern approaches, by contrast, seek to foster a more active engagement and a deeper interdisciplinary understanding of general patterns, focusing not only on what happened but also on why it happened and its lasting historical significance.[209]

History education in state schools serves a variety of purposes. A key skill is historical literacy, the ability to comprehend, critically analyse, and respond to historical claims. By making students aware of significant developments in the past, they can become familiar with various contexts of human life, helping them understand the present and its diverse cultures. At the same time, history education can foster a sense of cultural identity by connecting students with their heritage, traditions, and practices, for example, by introducing them to iconic elements ranging from national landmarks and monuments to historical figures and traditional festivities.[210] Knowledge of a shared past and cultural heritage can contribute to the formation of a national identity and prepares students for active citizenship. This political aspect of history education may spark disputes about which topics school textbooks should cover. In various regions, it has resulted in so-called history wars over the curriculum.[211] It can lead to a biased treatment of controversial topics in an attempt to present their national heritage in a favourable light.[212][y]

Photo of a museum gallery showcasing a collection of historic artefacts
Informal education provided by exhibitions of historic artefacts in museums is part of public history.[214]
In addition to the formal education provided in public schools, history is also taught in informal settings outside the classroom. Public history takes place in locations like museums and memorial sites, where selected artefacts are often used to tell specific stories.[214] It includes popular history, which aims to make the past accessible and appealing to a wide audience of non-specialists in media such as books, television programmes, and online content.[215] Informal history education also happens in oral traditions as narratives about the past are transmitted across generations.[216]

Other fields
History employs an interdisciplinary methodology, drawing on findings from fields such as archaeology, geology, genetics, anthropology, and linguistics.[217][z] Archaeologists study human-made historical artefacts and other forms of material culture. Their findings provide crucial insights into past human activities and cultural developments.[219] The interpretation of archaeological evidence presents challenges that differ from standard historical work with written documents. At the same time, it offers new possibilities by presenting information that was not recorded, allowing historians to access the past of non-literate societies and marginalized groups within literate societies by studying the remains of their material culture. Before the advent of modern archaeology in the 19th century, antiquarianism laid the groundwork for this discipline and played a vital role in preserving historical artefacts.[220]

Geology and other earth sciences help historians understand the environmental contexts and physical processes that affected past societies, including climate conditions, landscapes, and natural events.[221] Genetics provides key information about the evolutionary origins of humans as a species, human migration, ancestry, and demographic changes.[222] Anthropologists investigate human culture and behaviour, such as social structures, belief systems, and ritual practices. This knowledge offers contexts for the interpretation of historical events.[223] Historical linguistics studies the development of languages over time, which can be crucial for the interpretation of ancient documents and can also provide information about migration patterns and cultural exchanges.[224] Historians further rely on evidence from various other fields belonging to the physical, biological, and social sciences as well as the humanities.[225]

In virtue of its relation to ideology and national identity, history is closely connected to politics and historical theories can directly impact political decisions. For example, irredentist attempts by one state to annex territory of another state often rely on historical theories claiming that the disputed territory belonged to the first state in the past.[226] History also plays a central role in so-called historical religions, which base some of their core doctrines on historical events. For instance, Christianity is often categorized as a historical religion because it is centred around historical events surrounding Jesus Christ.[227] History is relevant to many fields through the study of their past, including the history of science, mathematics, philosophy, and art.[228]

See also
	History portal
Glossary of history
Outline of history
References
Notes
 Some authors restrict the term history to the factual series of past events and use the term historiography for the study of those events. Others use the term history for the study and representation of the past. They characterize historiography as a metatheory studying the methods and historical development of this academic discipline.[5]
 Some theorists identify protohistory as a distinct period after prehistory that spans from the invention of writing to the first attempts to record history.[6]
 Big History, formulated by the historian David Christian in the late 1980s, reaches back even further to the Big Bang, covering the cosmological development of the universe and the biological evolution of life in addition to human history.[9]
 Early historians, such as Herodotus and Thucydides, already criticised the accounts of Homer and other poets as fantastic and inaccurate.[14]
 Historical revisionism, a related outlook, seeks to overturn established perspectives on history. This can take a variety of forms, from the introduction of new evidence and methods which counter current thinking, to criticising the value or significance of historical events or actors. Some theorists use the term revisionism in a neutral sense for any rejection or reinterpretation of mainstream views. Others associate it with practices that disregard genuine evidence and incorporate intensely skeptical and relativist views to justify pseudohistorical perspectives, attempting to discredit established knowledge of historical events through epistemic criticism.[21]
 Understood in a narrow sense, the historical method is sometimes limited to the evaluation or criticism of sources.[29]
 The exact definitions of primary source and secondary source are disputed and there is not always consensus on how a particular source should be categorized. For example, if a person was not present at a riot but reports on it shortly after it happened, some historians consider this report a primary source while others see it as a secondary source.[37]
 Leopold von Ranke's emphasis on source evaluation significantly influenced the practice of historical research.[40]
 Historians consider the context and time of the document to understand the meanings of the terms it uses. For example, if a document uses the word awful, they have to decide whether it expresses the modern meaning 'terrible' or the historical meaning 'worthy of awe'.[42]
 This becomes particularly challenging if different sources provide seemingly contradictory information.[44]
 The creativity and imagination needed for this step is one of the reasons why some theorists understand history as an art rather than a science.[45]
 For example, Martha Washington burned all private letters between her and her husband George Washington, leaving decades worth of silences on their relationship.[52] Another cause of silences, the existence of a taboo, such as a taboo against homosexuality, can have the effect that little information on the topic is recorded.[51] The practice of erasing names of deceased people considered enemies from public record is known as damnatio memoriae.[53]
 There are disagreements about when exactly each period starts and ends. Alternative subdivisions may use overlapping or radically different time frames.[64]
 New diseases and European military aggression and exploitation had severe consequences in the form of a drastic loss of life and cultural disruption among Indigenous communities in the Americas.[74]
 Emphasizing the central relation between geography and history, Jules Michelet wrote in the 1869 preface of his Histoire de France: "without geographical basis, the people, the makers of history, seem to be walking on air".[80]
 Herodotus is traditionally considered the "father of history" but has also been called the "father of lies" because not all of his accounts were reliable.[141]
 This aspect is also found to some degree in works of Greek historians, including Herodotus and Polybius.[144]
 Historical theory is a closely related term sometimes used as a synonym.[181]
 Some philosophers have followed Francis Fukuyama in arguing that the "end of history" has already arrived based on the claim that the ideological evolution of humanity has reached its endpoint.[187]
 The German historian Leopold von Ranke was among the most important proponents of this scientific approach in the 19th century.[194] Key modern scholars taking this view include Sir Geoffrey Elton, Arthur Marwick and E. P. Thompson.[193]
 These critiques rest on arguments including that: it is impossible to recover the totality of the past; as events have already passed, accounts cannot be verified against events but against other accounts; historical writing is mediated and constructed by the historian and the process of narrative construction involves interpretation and selective readings;[195] and evidence itself is necessarily subjective as its content is mediated through its maker and its survival through processes of selection.[196] From this viewpoint, hindsight and modern theorising also allow historians to piece together evidence and put forward interpretations that are only visible after the fact and do so from a biased perspective, meaning that history as the known past is a human creation.[197]
 Among the proponnents of the more relativist viewpoint was E. H. Carr, whose What Is History? (1961) examined how historical and social contexts impact the way historians choose and analyse facts.[200]
 Some scholars argue that recognising the subjective nature of historical sources has the benefit of opening up new areas of research and new ways of engaging with historical subjects; it also provides new approaches for analysing sources, critiquing dominant narratives, and allowing historians to engage with different concepts.[202]
 Scholars advocating for this view include Richard J. Evans.[203]
 For example, some Japanese high school history textbooks have faced various criticisms for downplaying Japan's colonial and wartime activities.[213]
 They are sometimes grouped under the label auxiliary sciences of history.[218]
Citations
 
Kragh 1987, p. 41
Little 2020, § 1. History and its representation
Collingwood 1967, § 4. History and the Philosophy of History
Ritter 1986, pp. 193–194
Collingwood 1993, p. 9
 
Little 2020, § 1. History and its representation
Tosh 2002, pp. 140–143
Munslow 2001
Evans 2001
 
Tucker 2011, pp. xii, 2
Arnold 2000, p. 5
Evans 2002, pp. 1–2
Ritter 1986, pp. 193–194
Tosh 2002, pp. 140–143
 
Evans 2002, pp. 1–2
Ritter 1986, p. 196
 
Tucker 2011, pp. xii, 2
Arnold 2000, p. 5
 Kipfer 2000, pp. 457–458
 
Woolf 2019, p. 300
Renfrew 2008, p. 172
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 299–300
Ackermann et al. 2008, p. xvii
Stearns 2010, pp. 17–18
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, pp. v, 1
 Hesketh 2023, pp. 1–4, 41
 
Arnold 2000, pp. 114–115
Parrott & Hake 1983, pp. 121–122
Tosh 2002, pp. 50–52
Ritter 1986, pp. 196–197
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 50–52
Ritter 1986, pp. 196–197, 415–416
 
Allchin 2004, pp. 179–180
Välimäki & Aali 2020, p. 57
 
Southgate 2005, pp. xi–xii, 1, 57
Tosh 2002, pp. 50–52
 
Lefkowitz 2008, pp. 353–354
Woolf 2019, pp. 21–24
Shankman & Durrant 2003, p. 96
 
Arnold 2000, pp. 120–121
Southgate 2005, pp. 11–12, 57–58
Tosh 2002, pp. 26, 50–52
 
Arnold 2000, pp. 121–122
Tosh 2002, pp. 50–52
 
Arnold 2000, p. 121
Southgate 2005, pp. 38–39, 175–176
Tosh 2002, pp. 50–51
 
Jenkins 1995, p. 53
Haviland 1997, p. 6
 Evans 2002, p. 2
 Southgate 2005, pp. xi–xii 49–51, 175–176
 
Tucker 2008, pp. 1–10
Evans 1999, pp. 238–243
Buchanan 2010
Fronza 2018, p. 4
 Brown & Sinclair 2024, pp. 417–418
 Woolf 2019, p. 22
 
Ritter 1986, pp. 193–195
Stevenson 2010, p. 831
HarperCollins 2022
Joseph & Janda 2008, p. 163
HarperCollins 2003, p. 99
OED Staff 2024
 
HarperCollins 2022
Joseph & Janda 2008, p. 163
Stevenson 2010, p. 831
 
Joseph & Janda 2008, p. 163
Hoad 1993, p. 217
Cresswell 2021, § History
OED Staff 2024
 
Ritter 1986, pp. 195–196
HarperCollins 2022
 
Berkhofer 2022, pp. 10–11
Tosh 2002, p. 141
 Ritter 1986, p. 268
 
Fazal 2023, p. 140
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 1–2
Ahlskog 2020, pp. 1–2
Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 9–10
Ritter 1986, p. 268
 
Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 19–20
Bhat 2019, p. 203
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 35
Tosh 2002, pp. 57–58
Ritter 1986, pp. 143–144
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 36
Tosh 2002, pp. 54–58
Storey 2013, p. 32
 Arnold 2000, pp. 59–60
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 37
Tosh 2002, pp. 57–58
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 37
Tosh 2002, pp. 57–59
 Tosh 2002, p. 57
 Tosh 2002, pp. 56–57
 
Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 40–45
Arnold 2000, pp. 59–60
Tosh 2002, p. 56
 Tosh 2002, p. 87
 
Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 70–71
Tosh 2002, pp. 59, 87–88
Topolski 2012, p. 432
Ritter 1986, pp. 84–86
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 90–91
Gil & Marsen 2022, p. 24
 
Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 70–71
Tosh 2002, pp. 59, 87–88, 91–92
Topolski 2012, p. 432
Ritter 1986, pp. 84–86
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 140, 171
Howell & Prevenier 2001, p. 71
 Tosh 2002, p. 141
 
Berkhofer 2008, pp. 49–50
Tosh 2002, pp. 139–143
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 142–143
Little 2020, § 1. History and its representation
 Tosh 2002, p. 140
 Wright 2006
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 78
Lucas 2004, pp. 50–51
Christian 2015, pp. 5–6
 Kamp et al. 2020, pp. 77–78
 Oberg 2019, p. 17
 Hedrick 2000, p. xii
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 244–245
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 81, 92–93
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 13–14, 88
Berkhofer 2008, pp. 49–50
Lloyd 2011, pp. 371–372
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, p. 13
Tosh 2002, pp. 166, 185
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 22, 185
Berkhofer 2008, pp. 45, 78
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 13–14
Tosh 2002, pp. 27, 224–225
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 110–111
Tosh 2002, pp. 121, 133
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 113–114
Tosh 2002, p. 238
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 108–109
Lemon 1995, p. 112
Jordanova 2000, pp. 34–35
Veysey 1979, p. 1
 
Kamp et al. 2020, p. 78
Christian 2008, pp. 97–99
Jordanova 2000, p. 34
 
Van Nieuwenhuyse 2020, p. 375
Christian 2008, pp. 98–99
Stearns 2001, Table of Contents
Christian 2015, p. 7
 
Christian 2015, pp. 5–7
Northrup 2015, pp. 110–111
 
Christian 2015, pp. 5–6
Northrup 2015, pp. 110–111
 
Hsu 1993, p. 161
Arcodia & Basciano 2021, p. xv
 Northrup 2015, p. 111
 Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, pp. 27, 43–44
 
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, pp. 1, 10
Stearns 2010, pp. 17–20
Aldenderfer 2011, p. 4
 
Christian 2015, p. 2
Stearns 2010, pp. 17–20
Wragg-Sykes 2016, pp. 195, 199, 211, 221
 
Aldenderfer 2011, p. 1
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. v
 
Stearns 2010, pp. 19–32
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 1–2, 89–90
Ackermann et al. 2008, pp. xxix–xxxix
 
Stearns 2010, pp. 33–36
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 193–194, 291–292
 
Stearns 2010, p. 36
Bulliet et al. 2015, p. 401
 
Stearns 2010, pp. 36–39
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 401–402
 Pozdnyakova et al. 2018, p. 12
 
Stearns 2010, pp. 39–46
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 537–538, 677–678, 817–818
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 108–109
Jordanova 2000, pp. 34, 46–47
 
Diamond 1999, pp. 22, 25–32
Darby 2002, p. 14
Baker 2003, p. 23
Jordanova 2000, pp. 34, 46–47
 
Darby 2002, p. 14
Michelet 1871, p. v
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 108–109
Jordanova 2000, pp. 46–47
 Ackermann et al. 2008, pp. 373–374
 
Fisher 2014, p. 127
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. 12
Stearns 2010, pp. 17–20
 
Iliffe 2007, p. 5
Stearns 2010, pp. 24–25
 Asante 2024, p. 92
 
Shillington 2018, pp. 93–94
Iliffe 2007, pp. 2, 42–45
 
Shillington 2018, p. 103
Iliffe 2007, pp. 131–132
 Iliffe 2007, pp. 193–195
 
Shillington 2018, p. 417
Iliffe 2007, pp. 242, 253, 260, 267–268
 
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. 15
Headrick 2009, p. 6
Wragg-Sykes 2016, p. 199
 
Mason 2005, pp. 17–18
Murphey & Stapleton 2019, pp. 10–13
Cotterell 2011, pp. xiii, 3–4
AASA 2011, pp. 3–4
Stearns 2010, pp. 24–25
 
Cotterell 2011, pp. xiii–xiv
AASA 2011, pp. 3–4
 
Cotterell 2011, pp. 256–257
Mason 2005, pp. 77–78
 
Mason 2005, pp. 111–112, 167–168
Murphey & Stapleton 2019, pp. 282–283
Cotterell 2011, pp. xvii–xviii
Rana 2012, pp. 13–14
 
Murphey & Stapleton 2019, p. 445
Mason 2005, p. 1
Rana 2012, pp. 13–14
 Roberts 1997, § The Importance of the Classical Past, § The Greeks, § An Attempt to Summarize
 Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. 12
 
Roberts 1997, § The Importance of the Classical Past, § The Rise of Roman Power, § Empire
Black 2021, § What is Europe?
 
Roberts 1997, § Decline and Fall in the West, § Christiandom
Black 2021, § What is Europe?
 
Roberts 1997, § Launching Modern History 1500–1800
Stearns 2010, pp. 36–39
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 401–402
 
Roberts 1997, § The European Age
Stearns 2010, pp. 39–42
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 677–678
 
Roberts 1997, § Europe's Twentieth Century: The Era of European Civil War
Stearns 2010, p. 44
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 677–678
 
Roberts 1997, § Europe in the Cold War and After, § European Integration
Alcock 2002, pp. 266–268
Stearns 2010, pp. 39–46
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 677–678, 817–818
Andrén 2022, pp. 298, 304
 
Fisher 2014, p. 127
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. 12
 
Ackermann et al. 2008, pp. xvii–xix
Fernández-Armesto 2003, § Between Colonizations: The Americas' First 'Normalcy'
Dorling Kindersley 2018, pp. 94–95
 
Fernández-Armesto 2003, § Between Colonizations: The Americas' First 'Normalcy'
Dorling Kindersley 2018, pp. 94–95
 
Fernández-Armesto 2003, § Colonial Americas: Divergence and its Limits, § The Independence Era
Stearns 2010, pp. 36–38
Dorling Kindersley 2018, p. 95
 
Fernández-Armesto 2003, § The Independence Era
Raab & Rinke 2019, p. 20
 
Fernández-Armesto 2003, § The American Century
Bulliet et al. 2015, pp. 817–818
 
Tuniz & Vipraio 2016, p. 12
Lawson 2024, p. 57
d'Arcy 2012, § Indigenous Exploration and Colonization of the Region
 
Lawson 2024, pp. 32, 57
d'Arcy 2012, § Indigenous Exploration and Colonization of the Region
 
Lawson 2024, pp. 59–60, 85–86
d'Arcy 2012, § The Intersection of European and Indigenous Worlds, § The Impact of Pre-Colonial European Influences, § European Settler Societies and Plantation Colonies
 
d'Arcy 2012, § Times of Anxiety: World Wars, Pandemic, and Economic Depression, § Post-War Themes: The Nuclear Pacific, Decolonization, and the Search for Identity
Lawson 2024, pp. xii, 2, 96
 
Jordanova 2000, pp. 34–35
Yurdusev 2003, p. 24
Tosh 2002, p. 109
Gardiner 1988, pp. 1–3
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 109, 122
Jordanova 2000, pp. 34–35
Gardiner 1988, pp. 1–3
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 109–110
Jordanova 2000, pp. 35–36
 
Tosh 2002, p. 110
Arnold 2000, pp. 16–17, 33–34, 41
Woolf 2019, pp. 21–25
 Devries 2004
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 112–113
Watt et al. 1988, pp. 131–133
 
Howard et al. 1988, pp. 4–5
Morillo 2017, § 1. An Introduction to Military History
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 122–124
Coleman et al. 1988, pp. 31–32
 
Samuel et al. 1988, pp. 48–51
Tosh 2002, pp. 125–127
Stearns 2021
 
Collinson et al. 1988, pp. 58–59
Tosh 2002, pp. 101, 236–237, 286
Burke 2019, § Introduction
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 272–273
Collini et al. 1988, pp. 105–106, 109–110
 
Santinello & Piaia 2010, pp. 487–488
Verene 2008, pp. 6–8
 
Porter et al. 1988, pp. 78–79
Williams 2024, § Lead section
 Potts et al. 1988, pp. 96–104
 Hughes 2016, p. 1
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 101, 112–113, 124–125, 127, 129
Yapp et al. 1988, pp. 155, 158
Antonellos & Rantall 2017, p. 115
Buchanan 2024, Lead section
Ramsay 2008, p. 283
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 244–245
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 81, 92–93
Zaagsma 2023, § Introduction
Jordanova 2000, pp. 49–50
 Wong 2005, pp. 416–417
 
Sitton, Mehaffy & Davis 2011, p. 4
Abrams 2016, 2. The Peculiarities of Oral History
Miller 2024, pp. 157–158
Thomson 2012, p. 80
 
Zhao 2023, pp. 9–10
Birke, Butter & Köppe 2011, p. 7
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 13–14, 113–114
Tosh 2002, pp. 27, 224–225, 238
Veysey 1979, p. 1
 
Christian 2015, p. 3
Stearns 2010, pp. 11–13, 17–20
 
Bod 2013, p. 260
O'Hara 2019, p. 176
 
Tosh 2002, pp. 113–115
De Armond 2023, p. 75
 
Glassberg 1996, pp. 7–8
Tosh 2002, pp. xiv–xv
Stanton 2017, p. 224
 
Fagan & Durrani 2019, § Written Records, Oral History, and Archaeology
Wright 2006
Tosh 2002, pp. 1–3, 295
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 20–21
Wright 2006
Lefkowitz 2008, pp. 353–354
 Woolf 2019, pp. 22–23
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 21–23
Wright 2006
Jensen, § 1. Ancient through Medieval
Lefkowitz 2008, pp. 354–355
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 23–24
Jensen, § 1. Ancient through Medieval
Lefkowitz 2008, p. 356
 
Woolf 2019, p. 26
Comber 2006, pp. 38–39
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 28–30, 34
Comber 2006, pp. 38–40, 42–43
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 40–41
Lo 1998
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 35–39, 41–42
Morgan 2006, pp. 14–15
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 39–43
 
Vašíček 2008, pp. 33–34
Bayly 2006, pp. 664–665
Singh 2008, pp. 18–19
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 49–50
Wright 2006
Breisach 2005, § Christian Traditional Historiography
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 49–52, 55
Wright 2006
Breisach 2005, § Christian Traditional Historiography
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 56–57
Wright 2006
Breisach 2005, § Islamic Traditional Historiography
Morgan 2006, pp. 9–10
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 57, 60
Wright 2006
Breisach 2005, § Islamic Traditional Historiography
Morgan 2006, pp. 11, 14
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 64–65
Breisach 2005, § Chinese Traditional Historiography
 Woolf 2019, pp. 68–69, 84
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 67–68
Breisach 2005, § Japanese Traditional Historiography
 Woolf 2019, p. 84
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 78, 89, 124
Breisach 2005, § The Age of Anthropocentric Historiography
Jensen, § 2. Humanism through Renaissance
Arnold 2000, pp. 26–27
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 129–130, 134, 166–167
Arnold 2000, pp. 46–51
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 99–100
Mittag 2012, pp. 27–28
Ng 2012, pp. 60–62
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 101–106
Quinn 2020, pp. 1–4, 8–10
 Woolf 2019, pp. 5, 106–114
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 176–177
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 174–177
Jensen, § 5. 19th Century Scientific Historiography
Moloughney & Zarrow 2012, p. 2
 
Wright 2006
Jensen, § 5. 19th Century Scientific Historiography
Woolf 2019, pp. 184–185
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 187–189
Jensen, § 4. 19th Century Teleological Systems
 Woolf 2019, pp. 5–6, 196–197, 215–216
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 216–217, 279–280
Wright 2006
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 229–230
 Woolf 2019, pp. 239–240, 242–245
 
Wright 2006
Woolf 2019, pp. 232, 247–249, 255–256
 Woolf 2019, pp. 262–264, 268–269
 
Woolf 2019, pp. 251–252
Collini et al. 1988, pp. 105–107
 
Moore 2006, pp. 918–919
Woolf 2019, pp. 6, 297–300
Wright 2006
 Woolf 2019, p. 60
 
Woolf 2019, p. 3
Tucker 2011, pp. xii, 2
Ritter 1986, pp. 188–189
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the Philosophy of History
 
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the Philosophy of History
Lloyd 2011, pp. 371, 374
 
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the Philosophy of History
Cheng 2012, pp. 1–2
 
Howell & Prevenier 2001, pp. 110–111
Tosh 2002, pp. 121, 133
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the Philosophy of History
 
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the Philosophy of History
Bentley 2006, pp. xi, xv
Cheng 2012, pp. 1–2
 Paul 2015, pp. xv, 2–3, 12–13
 
Carr 2006, Lead section
Jensen, Lead section
Little 2020, Lead section, § 1. History and its representation
Paul 2015, p. 10
 
Little 2020, Lead section, § 1. History and its representation
Paul 2015, p. 10
 
Stanford 1998, pp. 85–87
Little 2020, § 3.3 Causation in history
 
Carr 2006, § 2. "Critical" Philosophy of History: Philosophical Reflection on Historical Knowledge
Little 2020, § 3.1 General laws in history?, § 3.3 Causation in history
 
Little 2020, § 2.2 Does history possess directionality?
Stanford 1998, pp. 74–75
Paul 2015, p. 10
Kleingeld 2006, p. xxi
 
Lemon 2003, pp. 390–391
Jackson & Xidias 2017, p. 21
 
Little 2020, § 4. Historiography and the philosophy of history
Heller 2016, § 14. The Specificity of Philosophy of History
 
Lemon 2003, p. 125
Stanford 1998, p. 155
Carr 2006, § 4. Historicity, Historicism and the Historicization of Philosophy
Vision 2023, § VI Truth Epistemologized: 6. Historicism
 
Little 2020, § 3.2 Historical objectivity
Carr 2006, § 2. "Critical" Philosophy of History: Philosophical Reflection on Historical Knowledge
Stanford 1998, pp. 50–53
Paul 2015, p. 10
Carr 1990, pp. 7–8, 21–22
Evans 1999, pp. 1–4
 
Dray 2021, p. 58
Wineburg 2018, p. 56
Fasolt 2013, p. xix
Trevelyan 1947, pp. 1–2
Groot 2016, p. 173
Jenkins 2003, pp. xi–xii, 44–45
 Donnelly & Norton 2012, pp. 35–39
 Jenkins 2003, pp. 16–18
 Donnelly & Norton 2012, pp. 35–36
 Jenkins 2003, pp. 12–15
 
Carr 1990, pp. 16–19
Donnelly & Norton 2012, pp. 112–113
 Jenkins 2003, p. 15
 Kragh 1987, pp. 56–57
 
Kragh 1987, pp. 58–60
Tucker 2008, pp. 3–4
 Davies 1990, p. 160
 Donnelly & Norton 2012, p. 100
 Summerfield 2019, § Introduction
 Donnelly & Norton 2012, pp. 104–106
 Metzger & Harris 2018, p. 2
 
Hughes, Cox & Godard 2013, pp. 4–5, 10–11
Metzger & Harris 2018, p. 3
Levstik & Thornton 2018, pp. 476–477
Cooper 1995, pp. 3–4
 
Levstik & Thornton 2018, p. 477
Cooper 1995, pp. 110–112
 
Sharp et al. 2021, pp. 66–67, 71
Hunt 2006, p. 49
Phillips 2008, pp. 34, 48–50
 
van Hover & Hicks 2018, pp. 407–408
Metzger & Harris 2018, pp. 6–7
Hunt 2006, p. 36
Grant 2018, pp. 422–428
 
Metzger & Harris 2018, p. 6
Cooper 1995, p. 2
Liu et al. 2024, p. 623
 
Metzger & Harris 2018, pp. 3, 6–7
Sharp et al. 2021, p. 49
Hunt 2006, pp. 6–7
Miguel-Revilla et al. 2024, pp. 1–2
 
Sharp et al. 2021, p. 49
Zajda 2015, pp. 5–6
 
Girard & Harris 2018, p. 258
Schneider 2008, pp. 107–108
In common usage, randomness is the apparent or actual lack of definite patterns or predictability in information.[1][2] A random sequence of events, symbols or steps often has no order and does not follow an intelligible pattern or combination. Individual random events are, by definition, unpredictable, but if there is a known probability distribution, the frequency of different outcomes over repeated events (or "trials") is predictable.[note 1] For example, when throwing two dice, the outcome of any particular roll is unpredictable, but a sum of 7 will tend to occur twice as often as 4. In this view, randomness is not haphazardness; it is a measure of uncertainty of an outcome. Randomness applies to concepts of chance, probability, and information entropy.

The fields of mathematics, probability, and statistics use formal definitions of randomness, typically assuming that there is some 'objective' probability distribution. In statistics, a random variable is an assignment of a numerical value to each possible outcome of an event space. This association facilitates the identification and the calculation of probabilities of the events. Random variables can appear in random sequences. A random process is a sequence of random variables whose outcomes do not follow a deterministic pattern, but follow an evolution described by probability distributions. These and other constructs are extremely useful in probability theory and the various applications of randomness.

Randomness is most often used in statistics to signify well-defined statistical properties. Monte Carlo methods, which rely on random input (such as from random number generators or pseudorandom number generators), are important techniques in science, particularly in the field of computational science.[3] By analogy, quasi-Monte Carlo methods use quasi-random number generators.

Random selection, when narrowly associated with a simple random sample, is a method of selecting items (often called units) from a population where the probability of choosing a specific item is the proportion of those items in the population. For example, with a bowl containing just 10 red marbles and 90 blue marbles, a random selection mechanism would choose a red marble with probability 1/10. A random selection mechanism that selected 10 marbles from this bowl would not necessarily result in 1 red and 9 blue. In situations where a population consists of items that are distinguishable, a random selection mechanism requires equal probabilities for any item to be chosen. That is, if the selection process is such that each member of a population, say research subjects, has the same probability of being chosen, then we can say the selection process is random.[2]

According to Ramsey theory, pure randomness (in the sense of there being no discernible pattern) is impossible, especially for large structures. Mathematician Theodore Motzkin suggested that "while disorder is more probable in general, complete disorder is impossible".[4] Misunderstanding this can lead to numerous conspiracy theories.[5] Cristian S. Calude stated that "given the impossibility of true randomness, the effort is directed towards studying degrees of randomness".[6] It can be proven that there is infinite hierarchy (in terms of quality or strength) of forms of randomness.[6]

History
Main article: History of randomness

Ancient fresco of dice players in Pompei
In ancient history, the concepts of chance and randomness were intertwined with that of fate. Many ancient peoples threw dice to determine fate, and this later evolved into games of chance. Most ancient cultures used various methods of divination to attempt to circumvent randomness and fate.[7][8] Beyond religion and games of chance, randomness has been attested for sortition since at least ancient Athenian democracy in the form of a kleroterion.[9]

The formalization of odds and chance was perhaps earliest done by the Chinese of 3,000 years ago. The Greek philosophers discussed randomness at length, but only in non-quantitative forms. It was only in the 16th century that Italian mathematicians began to formalize the odds associated with various games of chance. The invention of calculus had a positive impact on the formal study of randomness. In the 1888 edition of his book The Logic of Chance, John Venn wrote a chapter on The conception of randomness that included his view of the randomness of the digits of pi (π), by using them to construct a random walk in two dimensions.[10]

The early part of the 20th century saw a rapid growth in the formal analysis of randomness, as various approaches to the mathematical foundations of probability were introduced. In the mid-to-late-20th century, ideas of algorithmic information theory introduced new dimensions to the field via the concept of algorithmic randomness.

Although randomness had often been viewed as an obstacle and a nuisance for many centuries, in the 20th century computer scientists began to realize that the deliberate introduction of randomness into computations can be an effective tool for designing better algorithms. In some cases, such randomized algorithms even outperform the best deterministic methods.[11]

In science
Many scientific fields are concerned with randomness:

Algorithmic probability
Chaos theory
Cryptography
Game theory
Information theory
Pattern recognition
Percolation theory
Probability theory
Quantum mechanics
Random walk
Statistical mechanics
Statistics
In the physical sciences
In the 19th century, scientists used the idea of random motions of molecules in the development of statistical mechanics to explain phenomena in thermodynamics and the properties of gases.

According to several standard interpretations of quantum mechanics, microscopic phenomena are objectively random.[12] That is, in an experiment that controls all causally relevant parameters, some aspects of the outcome still vary randomly. For example, if a single unstable atom is placed in a controlled environment, it cannot be predicted how long it will take for the atom to decay—only the probability of decay in a given time.[13] Thus, quantum mechanics does not specify the outcome of individual experiments, but only the probabilities. Hidden variable theories reject the view that nature contains irreducible randomness: such theories posit that in the processes that appear random, properties with a certain statistical distribution are at work behind the scenes, determining the outcome in each case.

In biology
The modern evolutionary synthesis ascribes the observed diversity of life to random genetic mutations followed by natural selection. The latter retains some random mutations in the gene pool due to the systematically improved chance for survival and reproduction that those mutated genes confer on individuals who possess them. The location of the mutation is not entirely random however as e.g. biologically important regions may be more protected from mutations.[14][15][16]

Several authors also claim that evolution (and sometimes development) requires a specific form of randomness, namely the introduction of qualitatively new behaviors. Instead of the choice of one possibility among several pre-given ones, this randomness corresponds to the formation of new possibilities.[17][18]

The characteristics of an organism arise to some extent deterministically (e.g., under the influence of genes and the environment), and to some extent randomly. For example, the density of freckles that appear on a person's skin is controlled by genes and exposure to light; whereas the exact location of individual freckles seems random.[19]

As far as behavior is concerned, randomness is important if an animal is to behave in a way that is unpredictable to others. For instance, insects in flight tend to move about with random changes in direction, making it difficult for pursuing predators to predict their trajectories.

In mathematics
The mathematical theory of probability arose from attempts to formulate mathematical descriptions of chance events, originally in the context of gambling, but later in connection with physics. Statistics is used to infer an underlying probability distribution of a collection of empirical observations. For the purposes of simulation, it is necessary to have a large supply of random numbers—or means to generate them on demand.

Algorithmic information theory studies, among other topics, what constitutes a random sequence. The central idea is that a string of bits is random if and only if it is shorter than any computer program that can produce that string (Kolmogorov randomness), which means that random strings are those that cannot be compressed. Pioneers of this field include Andrey Kolmogorov and his student Per Martin-Löf, Ray Solomonoff, and Gregory Chaitin. For the notion of infinite sequence, mathematicians generally accept Per Martin-Löf's semi-eponymous definition: An infinite sequence is random if and only if it withstands all recursively enumerable null sets.[20] The other notions of random sequences include, among others, recursive randomness and Schnorr randomness, which are based on recursively computable martingales. It was shown by Yongge Wang that these randomness notions are generally different.[21]

Randomness occurs in numbers such as log(2) and pi. The decimal digits of pi constitute an infinite sequence and "never repeat in a cyclical fashion." Numbers like pi are also considered likely to be normal:

Pi certainly seems to behave this way. In the first six billion decimal places of pi, each of the digits from 0 through 9 shows up about six hundred million times. Yet such results, conceivably accidental, do not prove normality even in base 10, much less normality in other number bases.[22]

In statistics
Main article: Statistical randomness
See also: Random error
In statistics, randomness is commonly used to create simple random samples. This allows surveys of completely random groups of people to provide realistic data that is reflective of the population. Common methods of doing this include drawing names out of a hat or using a random digit chart (a large table of random digits).

In information science
In information science, irrelevant or meaningless data is considered noise. Noise consists of numerous transient disturbances, with a statistically randomized time distribution.

In communication theory, randomness in a signal is called "noise", and is opposed to that component of its variation that is causally attributable to the source, the signal.

In terms of the development of random networks, for communication randomness rests on the two simple assumptions of Paul Erdős and Alfréd Rényi, who said that there were a fixed number of nodes and this number remained fixed for the life of the network, and that all nodes were equal and linked randomly to each other.[clarification needed][23]

In finance
The random walk hypothesis considers that asset prices in an organized market evolve at random, in the sense that the expected value of their change is zero but the actual value may turn out to be positive or negative. More generally, asset prices are influenced by a variety of unpredictable events in the general economic environment.

In politics
Random selection can be an official method to resolve tied elections in some jurisdictions.[24] Its use in politics originates long ago. Many offices in ancient Athens were chosen by lot instead of modern voting.

Randomness and religion
Randomness can be seen as conflicting with the deterministic ideas of some religions, such as those where the universe is created by an omniscient deity who is aware of all past and future events. If the universe is regarded to have a purpose, then randomness can be seen as impossible. This is one of the rationales for religious opposition to evolution, which states that non-random selection is applied to the results of random genetic variation.

Hindu and Buddhist philosophies state that any event is the result of previous events, as is reflected in the concept of karma. As such, this conception is at odds with the idea of randomness, and any reconciliation between both of them would require an explanation.[25]

In some religious contexts, procedures that are commonly perceived as randomizers are used for divination. Cleromancy uses the casting of bones or dice to reveal what is seen as the will of the gods.

Applications
Main article: Applications of randomness
In most of its mathematical, political, social and religious uses, randomness is used for its innate "fairness" and lack of bias.

Politics: Athenian democracy was based on the concept of isonomia (equality of political rights), and used complex allotment machines to ensure that the positions on the ruling committees that ran Athens were fairly allocated. Allotment is now restricted to selecting jurors in Anglo-Saxon legal systems, and in situations where "fairness" is approximated by randomization, such as selecting jurors and military draft lotteries.

Games: Random numbers were first investigated in the context of gambling, and many randomizing devices, such as dice, shuffling playing cards, and roulette wheels, were first developed for use in gambling. The ability to produce random numbers fairly is vital to electronic gambling, and, as such, the methods used to create them are usually regulated by government Gaming Control Boards. Random drawings are also used to determine lottery winners. In fact, randomness has been used for games of chance throughout history, and to select out individuals for an unwanted task in a fair way (see drawing straws).

Sports: Some sports, including American football, use coin tosses to randomly select starting conditions for games or seed tied teams for postseason play. The National Basketball Association uses a weighted lottery to order teams in its draft.

Mathematics: Random numbers are also employed where their use is mathematically important, such as sampling for opinion polls and for statistical sampling in quality control systems. Computational solutions for some types of problems use random numbers extensively, such as in the Monte Carlo method and in genetic algorithms.

Medicine: Random allocation of a clinical intervention is used to reduce bias in controlled trials (e.g., randomized controlled trials).

Religion: Although not intended to be random, various forms of divination such as cleromancy see what appears to be a random event as a means for a divine being to communicate their will (see also Free will and Determinism for more).

Generation
Main article: Random number generation

The ball in a roulette can be used as a source of apparent randomness, because its behavior is very sensitive to the initial conditions.
It is generally accepted that there exist three mechanisms responsible for (apparently) random behavior in systems:

Randomness coming from the environment (for example, Brownian motion, but also hardware random number generators).
Randomness coming from the initial conditions. This aspect is studied by chaos theory, and is observed in systems whose behavior is very sensitive to small variations in initial conditions (such as pachinko machines and dice).
Randomness intrinsically generated by the system. This is also called pseudorandomness, and is the kind used in pseudo-random number generators. There are many algorithms (based on arithmetics or cellular automaton) for generating pseudorandom numbers. The behavior of the system can be determined by knowing the seed state and the algorithm used. These methods are often quicker than getting "true" randomness from the environment.
The many applications of randomness have led to many different methods for generating random data. These methods may vary as to how unpredictable or statistically random they are, and how quickly they can generate random numbers.

Before the advent of computational random number generators, generating large amounts of sufficiently random numbers (which is important in statistics) required a lot of work. Results would sometimes be collected and distributed as random number tables.

Measures and tests
Main article: Randomness tests
There are many practical measures of randomness for a binary sequence. These include measures based on frequency, discrete transforms, complexity, or a mixture of these, such as the tests by Kak, Phillips, Yuen, Hopkins, Beth and Dai, Mund, and Marsaglia and Zaman.[26]

Quantum nonlocality has been used to certify the presence of genuine or strong form of randomness in a given string of numbers.[27]

Misconceptions and logical fallacies
Duration: 17 seconds.0:17
Due to an electric defect, the shown input selector of an audio amplifier switches fast and seemingly at random. However, this may follow a scheme which a human could only recognize after a scientific-style supervision.
Main article: Gambler's fallacy
Popular perceptions of randomness are frequently mistaken, and are often based on fallacious reasoning or intuitions.

Fallacy: a number is "due"
See also: Coupon collector's problem
This argument is, "In a random selection of numbers, since all numbers eventually appear, those that have not come up yet are 'due', and thus more likely to come up soon." This logic is only correct if applied to a system where numbers that come up are removed from the system, such as when playing cards are drawn and not returned to the deck. In this case, once a jack is removed from the deck, the next draw is less likely to be a jack and more likely to be some other card. However, if the jack is returned to the deck, and the deck is thoroughly reshuffled, a jack is as likely to be drawn as any other card. The same applies in any other process where objects are selected independently, and none are removed after each event, such as the roll of a die, a coin toss, or most lottery number selection schemes. Truly random processes such as these do not have memory, which makes it impossible for past outcomes to affect future outcomes. In fact, there is no finite number of trials that can guarantee a success.

Fallacy: a number is "cursed" or "blessed"
See also: Benford's law
In a random sequence of numbers, a number may be said to be cursed because it has come up less often in the past, and so it is thought that it will occur less often in the future. A number may be assumed to be blessed because it has occurred more often than others in the past, and so it is thought likely to come up more often in the future. This logic is valid only if the randomisation might be biased, for example if a die is suspected to be loaded then its failure to roll enough sixes would be evidence of that loading. If the die is known to be fair, then previous rolls can give no indication of future events.

In nature, events rarely occur with a frequency that is known a priori, so observing outcomes to determine which events are more probable makes sense. However, it is fallacious to apply this logic to systems designed and known to make all outcomes equally likely, such as shuffled cards, dice, and roulette wheels.

Fallacy: odds are never dynamic
In the beginning of a scenario, one might calculate the probability of a certain event. However, as soon as one gains more information about the scenario, one may need to re-calculate the probability accordingly.


In the Monty Hall problem, when the host reveals one door that contains a goat, this provides new information that needs to be factored into the calculation of probabilities.
For example, when being told that a woman has two children, one might be interested in knowing if either of them is a girl, and if yes, the probability that the other child is also a girl. Considering the two events independently, one might expect that the probability that the other child is female is ½ (50%), but by building a probability space illustrating all possible outcomes, one would notice that the probability is actually only ⅓ (33%).

To be sure, the probability space does illustrate four ways of having these two children: boy-boy, girl-boy, boy-girl, and girl-girl. But once it is known that at least one of the children is female, this rules out the boy-boy scenario, leaving only three ways of having the two children: boy-girl, girl-boy, girl-girl. From this, it can be seen only ⅓ of these scenarios would have the other child also be a girl[28] (see Boy or girl paradox for more).

In general, by using a probability space, one is less likely to miss out on possible scenarios, or to neglect the importance of new information. This technique can be used to provide insights in other situations such as the Monty Hall problem, a game show scenario in which a car is hidden behind one of three doors, and two goats are hidden as booby prizes behind the others. Once the contestant has chosen a door, the host opens one of the remaining doors to reveal a goat, eliminating that door as an option. With only two doors left (one with the car, the other with another goat), the player must decide to either keep their decision, or to switch and select the other door. Intuitively, one might think the player is choosing between two doors with equal probability, and that the opportunity to choose another door makes no difference. However, an analysis of the probability spaces would reveal that the contestant has received new information, and that changing to the other door would increase their chances of winning.[28]

See also
icon	Mathematics portal
Chaitin's constant
Chance (disambiguation)
Frequentist probability
Indeterminism
Nonlinear system
Probability interpretations
Probability theory
Pseudorandomness
Random.org—generates random numbers using atmospheric noise
Sortition
Notes
 Strictly speaking, the frequency of an outcome will converge almost surely to a predictable value as the number of trials becomes arbitrarily large. Non-convergence or convergence to a different value is possible, but has probability zero. Consistent non-convergence is thus evidence of the lack of a fixed probability distribution, as in many evolutionary processes.
References
 The Oxford English Dictionary defines "random" as "Having no definite aim or purpose; not sent or guided in a particular direction; made, done, occurring, etc., without method or conscious choice; haphazard."
 "Definition of randomness | Dictionary.com". www.dictionary.com. Archived from the original on 10 June 2023. Retrieved 21 November 2019.
 Third Workshop on Monte Carlo Methods, Jun Liu, Professor of Statistics, Harvard University
 Hans Jürgen Prömel (2005). "Complete Disorder is Impossible: The Mathematical Work of Walter Deuber". Combinatorics, Probability and Computing. 14 (1–2). Cambridge University Press: 3–16. doi:10.1017/S0963548304006674. S2CID 37243306.
 Ted.com, (May 2016). The origin of countless conspiracy theories
 Cristian S. Calude, (2017). "Quantum Randomness: From Practice to Theory and Back" in "The Incomputable Journeys Beyond the Turing Barrier" Editors: S. Barry Cooper, Mariya I. Soskova, 169–181, doi:10.1007/978-3-319-43669-2_11.
 Handbook to life in ancient Rome by Lesley Adkins 1998 ISBN 0-19-512332-8 page 279
 Religions of the ancient world by Sarah Iles Johnston 2004 ISBN 0-674-01517-7 page 370
 Hansen, Mogens Herman (1991). The Athenian Democracy in the Age of Demosthenes. Wiley. p. 230. ISBN 9780631180173.
 Annotated readings in the history of statistics by Herbert Aron David, 2001 ISBN 0-387-98844-0 page 115. The 1866 edition of Venn's book (on Google books) does not include this chapter.
 Reinert, Knut (2010). "Concept: Types of algorithms" (PDF). Freie Universität Berlin. Retrieved 20 November 2019.
 Zeilinger, Anton; Aspelmeyer, Markus; Żukowski, Marek; Brukner, Časlav; Kaltenbaek, Rainer; Paterek, Tomasz; Gröblacher, Simon (April 2007). "An experimental test of non-local realism". Nature. 446 (7138): 871–875. arXiv:0704.2529. Bibcode:2007Natur.446..871G. doi:10.1038/nature05677. ISSN 1476-4687. PMID 17443179. S2CID 4412358.
 "Each nucleus decays spontaneously, at random, in accordance with the blind workings of chance." Q for Quantum, John Gribbin
 "Study challenges evolutionary theory that DNA mutations are random". U.C. Davis. Retrieved 12 February 2022.
 Monroe, J. Grey; Srikant, Thanvi; Carbonell-Bejerano, Pablo; Becker, Claude; Lensink, Mariele; Exposito-Alonso, Moises; Klein, Marie; Hildebrandt, Julia; Neumann, Manuela; Kliebenstein, Daniel; Weng, Mao-Lun; Imbert, Eric; Ågren, Jon; Rutter, Matthew T.; Fenster, Charles B.; Weigel, Detlef (February 2022). "Mutation bias reflects natural selection in Arabidopsis thaliana". Nature. 602 (7895): 101–105. Bibcode:2022Natur.602..101M. doi:10.1038/s41586-021-04269-6. ISSN 1476-4687. PMC 8810380. PMID 35022609.
 Belfield, Eric J.; Ding, Zhong Jie; Jamieson, Fiona J.C.; Visscher, Anne M.; Zheng, Shao Jian; Mithani, Aziz; Harberd, Nicholas P. (January 2018). "DNA mismatch repair preferentially protects genes from mutation". Genome Research. 28 (1): 66–74. doi:10.1101/gr.219303.116. PMC 5749183. PMID 29233924.
 Longo, Giuseppe; Montévil, Maël; Kauffman, Stuart (1 January 2012). "No entailing laws, but enablement in the evolution of the biosphere". Proceedings of the 14th annual conference companion on Genetic and evolutionary computation. GECCO '12. New York, NY, US: ACM. pp. 1379–1392. arXiv:1201.2069. CiteSeerX 10.1.1.701.3838. doi:10.1145/2330784.2330946. ISBN 9781450311786. S2CID 15609415.
 Longo, Giuseppe; Montévil, Maël (1 October 2013). "Extended criticality, phase spaces and enablement in biology". Chaos, Solitons & Fractals. Emergent Critical Brain Dynamics. 55: 64–79. Bibcode:2013CSF....55...64L. doi:10.1016/j.chaos.2013.03.008. S2CID 55589891.
 Breathnach, A. S. (1982). "A long-term hypopigmentary effect of thorium-X on freckled skin". British Journal of Dermatology. 106 (1): 19–25. doi:10.1111/j.1365-2133.1982.tb00897.x. PMID 7059501. S2CID 72016377. The distribution of freckles seems entirely random, and not associated with any other obviously punctuate anatomical or physiological feature of skin.
 Martin-Löf, Per (1966). "The definition of random sequences". Information and Control. 9 (6): 602–619. doi:10.1016/S0019-9958(66)80018-9.
 Yongge Wang: Randomness and Complexity. PhD Thesis, 1996. http://webpages.uncc.edu/yonwang/papers/thesis.pdf
 "Are the digits of pi random? researcher may hold the key". Lbl.gov. 23 July 2001. Archived from the original on 20 October 2007. Retrieved 27 July 2012.
 Laszso Barabasi, (2003), Linked, Rich Gets Richer, P81
 Municipal Elections Act (Ontario, Canada) 1996, c. 32, Sched., s. 62 (3) : "If the recount indicates that two or more candidates who cannot both or all be declared elected to an office have received the same number of votes, the clerk shall choose the successful candidate or candidates by lot."
 Reichenbach, Bruce (1990). The Law of Karma: A Philosophical Study. Palgrave Macmillan UK. p. 121. ISBN 978-1-349-11899-1.
 Terry Ritter, Randomness tests: a literature survey. ciphersbyritter.com
 Pironio, S.; et al. (2010). "Random Numbers Certified by Bell's Theorem". Nature. 464 (7291): 1021–1024. arXiv:0911.3427. Bibcode:2010Natur.464.1021P. doi:10.1038/nature09008. PMID 20393558. S2CID 4300790.
 Johnson, George (8 June 2008). "Playing the Odds". The New York Times.
Further reading
Randomness by Deborah J. Bennett. Harvard University Press, 1998. ISBN 0-674-10745-4.
Random Measures, 4th ed. by Olav Kallenberg. Academic Press, New York, London; Akademie-Verlag, Berlin, 1986. MR 0854102.
The Art of Computer Programming. Vol. 2: Seminumerical Algorithms, 3rd ed. by Donald E. Knuth. Reading, MA: Addison-Wesley, 1997. ISBN 0-201-89684-2.
Fooled by Randomness, 2nd ed. by Nassim Nicholas Taleb. Thomson Texere, 2004. ISBN 1-58799-190-X.
Exploring Randomness by Gregory Chaitin. Springer-Verlag London, 2001. ISBN 1-85233-417-7.
Random by Kenneth Chan includes a "Random Scale" for grading the level of randomness.
The Drunkard's Walk: How Randomness Rules our Lives by Leonard Mlodinow. Pantheon Books, New York, 2008. ISBN 978-0-375-42404-5.
External links

Wikiversity has learning resources about Random

Look up randomness in Wiktionary, the free dictionary.

Wikiquote has quotations related to Randomness.

Wikimedia Commons has media related to Randomness.
QuantumLab Quantum random number generator with single photons as interactive experiment.
HotBits generates random numbers from radioactive decay.
QRBG Quantum Random Bit Generator
QRNG Archived 12 December 2010 at the Wayback Machine Fast Quantum Random Bit Generator
Chaitin: Randomness and Mathematical Proof
A Pseudorandom Number Sequence Test Program (Public Domain)
Dictionary of the History of Ideas: Chance
Chance versus Randomness, from the Stanford Encyclopedia of Philosophy
vte
Chaos theory
vte
Statistics
OutlineIndex
Descriptive statistics
Data collection
Statistical inference
CorrelationRegression analysis
Categorical / multivariate / time-series / survival analysis
Applications
Categoryicon Mathematics portalCommons WikiProject
Authority control databases Edit this at Wikidata
Categories: RandomnessCryptographyStatistical randomness
This page was last edited on 7 October 2025, at 22:02 (UTC).
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.
Deception Pass State Park

Article
Talk
Read
Edit
View history

Tools
Appearance hide
Text

Small

Standard

Large
Width

Standard

Wide
Color (beta)

Automatic

Light

Dark
Coordinates: 48°24′27″N 122°38′42″W
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Deception Pass State Park

Aerial view of Deception Pass looking southeast

Located in the northern Puget Sound region, Deception Pass (circled in red) connects the Strait of Juan de Fuca (to the west) to Skagit Bay (to the east). Fidalgo Island is to the north and Whidbey Island is to the south.
Type	State park
Location	Anacortes and Oak Harbor, Washington, United States
Coordinates	48°24′27″N 122°38′42″W[1]
Area	3,854 acres (1,560 ha)[2]
Created	April 17, 1922
Operated by	Washington State Parks
Visitors	3,000,000+ annually
Open	Year-round
Website	Official website
Deception Pass State Park is a nearly 4,000-acre (1,600 ha) state park in Washington state. It is located on nine islands—principally Whidbey and Fidalgo islands—on either side of Deception Pass, the waterway connecting the Strait of Juan de Fuca with Skagit Bay. It includes numerous bays, inlets and other waterways that provide home for a variety of marine life and coastal Pacific Northwest flora, and the park's undersea natural resources are protected as part of the National System of Marine Protected Areas. The park's two sections, like its two main islands, are connected by the two spans of the Deception Pass Bridge, completed in 1934.

The park's original land was a military reserve prior to its sale to the state in 1922. The park was first developed in the 1930s by crews of the Civilian Conservation Corps, who constructed a number of buildings, installations and landscape features in the National Park Service rustic style. Many of these facilities are recognized on the National Register of Historic Places. Since its establishment, with its proximity to the Seattle area and its suburbs, the park has consistently ranked as the most-visited park in the Washington State Parks system,[3] drawing 3.4 million visitors in 2023.[4] With more than 3 million visitors annually, it rivals some of the most popular U.S. national parks in visitors.[2]

Geography

A view west to the Strait of Juan de Fuca and Deception Island from Deception Pass Bridge

Cranberry Lake

Bowman Bay
The park encompasses 3,824 acres (1,548 ha) on nine islands.[2][3] In addition to the sections on Whidbey and Fidalgo, Northwest Island, Deception Island, Pass Island, Strawberry Island, and portions of Ben Ure Island are included in the park. The park also administers state parkland on Hope Island and Skagit Island in Skagit Bay and a portion of Kiket Island, which it manages jointly with the Swinomish Indian Tribal Community.[3]

Four freshwater lakes are included in the park boundaries: Cranberry Lake on Whidbey and Pass, Campbell and Heart lakes on Fidalgo.[5] Heart Lake is located in a non-contiguous 310 acres (130 ha) section of the park in Anacortes that includes old-growth forest in a state-designated natural forest area.[6]

The park's 15 miles (24 km) of shoreline include rocky beaches, sand spits, bluffs and headlands characteristic of the Puget Sound coastline. The park's diverse landscape also includes wetlands around Cranberry Lake.[5] Lush forested shorelines extend between beaches and rocky outcroppings. The hill north of Bowman Bay, points on the west side of Whidbey and on the south side of islands feature drier upland forests. West Beach also includes the only sand dunes of significance on Puget Sound.[7] At 484 feet (148 m), Goose Hill within the park boundaries is the highest point on Whidbey Island.[3]

History
Further information: Deception Pass § History
Prior to World War I, the U.S. military used much of the land surrounding Deception Pass as part of the coastal defenses of Puget Sound. Some land was used for recreational purposes; Rosario Beach was a destination for steamship day trips from Seattle, and Ben Ure ran a saloon and smuggling den on his namesake island during Prohibition.[2] From 1909 to 1914, the state ran a quarry with convict labor on Fidalgo Island just east of the pass.[8]

With the coming of aerial warfare, fewer coastal defenses were needed, and the military sold land around the pass to Washington state in 1922. The park was established on April 17, 1922, making it one of Washington's oldest state parks. At the time, there was no bridge across the pass; road traffic was handled by a small ferry whose operator strenuously opposed the construction of a bridge.[3] The park's initial 1,800 acres (730 ha) were dedicated in a ceremony on Whidbey Island on July 20, 1922.[9]

While the park welcomed more than 20,000 visitors in 1924, development of the park did not begin until the Great Depression. In the 1930s, Civilian Conservation Corps (CCC) crews were set to work on recreational facilities, buildings and roads, including the approaches to the planned Deception Pass Bridge.[2] CCC members initially worked on the park installations on Fidalgo Island; once the bridge was completed, they finished structures and development on the Whidbey Island side.[3] During this time, the National Park Service briefly considered bringing the park into its system.[2]

By 1964, the park spanned 1,764 acres (714 ha).[10] It expanded with the addition of Hoypus Hill on Whidbey Island east of Cornet Bay in 1991. The 569-acre (230 ha) tract was transferred from the state Department of Natural Resources and included old-growth forest.[11]

In 1983, the park erected a two-sided wooden "story pole" at Rosario Beach that recounts the Samish legend of Ko-kwal-alwoot, the so-called "Maiden of Deception Pass". The statue was erected on the site of Coast Salish longhouses and potlatches.[2]

In the early 1990s, the park notched more than five million visitors each year.[12] By the 2020s, the park received more than three million visitors each year, counting 3.8 million in 2021 (more than the 3.29 million who visited Yosemite National Park that year) and 3.4 million in 2023.[3][4] Washington residents account for three-fourths of the visitors, but the remainder come from the rest of the United States and foreign locations. Prior to the COVID-19 pandemic, up to 40% of campers at the park were from Canada.[3]

Recreation

Hikers on Rosario Head
The park includes 40 miles of trails.[3] Trails cover a wide range of landscapes, including mountains, cliffs, beaches, wetlands and forests. Biking and horseback riding are available. Camping at 317 campsites is offered at Cranberry Lake, Cornet Bay and Bowman Bay. A retreat center at Cornet Bay accommodates 190.[5]

Paddling is available in freshwater lakes and in protected bays, while the turbulent waters of Deception Pass provide the most challenging saltwater paddling in Washington state.[2] Cranberry Lake offers swimming and boat rentals. Pass Lake provides fishing, while Campbell Lake provides access to motorized watercraft.[5]

Flora and fauna

Bull kelp on the beach by Reservation Head
Flora in the park includes several old-growth stands of coastal Washington's prominent trees: Douglas firs, Western redcedar and Western hemlock. The oldest trees are older than 450 years old, with another batch more than 250 years old.[13] One gnarled fir tree is estimated to be over 900 years old.[3] Skagit Island was at one point the location of the largest Rocky Mountain juniper in Washington, standing 60 feet (18 m) tall and 4.5 feet (1.4 m) wide.[13]

In addition to Douglas fir, cedar and hemlock, trees found in shoreline forests at Deception Pass State Park include alder, big-leaf maple, grand fir and spruce. With rockier, drier soil, the hilltop areas feature grassy and brushy areas with abundant wildflowers in spring. Trees in the upland areas include madrone and smaller Douglas fir specimens. Upland shrubs are snowberry, salal, Oregon grape, thimbleberry and Nootka rose. The wetlands are home to Nootka rose, salmonberry, red elderberry, Pacific willow, sword fern and skunk cabbage.[7] Large kelp beds grow off of Rosario Head.[14]

Fauna in the park include whales, bald eagles, loons and alligator lizards.[2] Elephant seals frequent Bowman Bay, and Rosario Beach's tide pools provide habitat for sea cucumbers, crabs, snails and chitons.[3]

Conservation
In the 1970s, several of the CCC-built structures were painted dark green and brown to make them uniform with other park facilities in the state. Decades later, volunteers stripped the paint to restore the buildings to their original rustic appearance.[3] The park was nominated for the National Register of Historic Places in 2012 (the bridge having been listed in 1982).[15] In 2019, several sections and facilities in the park were listed on the National Register of Historic Places.[16] Several former CCC corps members helped the park create an interpretive center for the CCC heritage at Bowman Bay in 1988.[17]

Since 2009, undersea resources have been protected as Deception Pass Underwater Park as part of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration's National System of Marine Protected Areas.[18] Wildlife in Rosario Beach's tide pools, which are underwater at different times of day, have suffered from visitors walking through the area at low tide. To preserve and restore the tide pool habitat, park volunteers have created designated walkways using ropes.[2]

In 2012 and 2015, respectively, the park removed creosote-coated wood and sea walls—originally built for long-defunct fish hatcheries—from Cornet Bay and Bowman Bay. Riprap was also removed from Bowman Bay beach. These artificial features hindered intertidal sea life.[2][19]

Historic sites
Deception Pass State Park includes six historic districts or individually listed properties on the National Register of Historic Places. These properties were listed in 2019 as part of the Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks Multiple Property Submission.[16]

Cornet Bay Fire Circle
Cornet Bay Fire Circle
U.S. National Register of Historic Places

Cornet Bay Fire Circle
Location	Cornet Bay Road, Cornet, Washington
Built	1934–1935
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004769
Added to NRHP	December 6, 2019
The Cornet Bay Fire Circle was built on Whidbey Island at CCC Camp SP-3 in 1934–1935. It is a semi-circular enclosure with 2-foot (0.61 m)-tall, 18-inch-thick (46 cm) walls extending out from a 5-foot-high (1.5 m), 8-foot-wide (2.4 m) stone and brick reflector. Altogether the fire circle spans 14 feet (4.3 m) feet and is paved with flagstones.[20]

The fire circle is one of only a few installations in the park that were built expressly for the CCC worker camps. The camp area was converted and redeveloped for group camping and environmental learning in the 1950s and 1960s. The fire circle remained a focal point of the camping area. While the NRHP nomination form noted that the redevelopment has compromised the fire circle's setting, it retained sufficient integrity to be included in the multiple property listing for Deception Pass State Park sites.[20]

Cornet Bay Incinerator
Cornet Bay Incinerator
U.S. National Register of Historic Places
Location	Cornet Bay Road, Cornet, Washington
Built	1934–1935
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004771
Added to NRHP	December 6, 2019
Located at the northeast end of the clearing where Camp SP-3 was sited, the incinerator was one of two built in the park for disposal of garbage. It was built of granite with a fire brick lining and iron doors and stands 5.5 feet (1.7 m) tall, 7 feet (2.1 m) deep and 8 feet (2.4 m) wide, a design typical of CCC-constructed incinerators in Washington. The incinerator has been minimally altered. It is surrounded by a log fence for the protection of youth at the nearby campground.[21]

Cranberry Lake Bathing and Picnic Area
Cranberry Lake Bathing and Picnic Area Historic District
U.S. National Register of Historic Places
U.S. Historic district

Combination building at Cranberry Lake
Location	State Highway 20, Oak Harbor, Washington
Built	1933–1938
Architectural style	National Park Service rustic
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004772
Added to NRHP	December 4, 2019
Cranberry Lake is located at the northwest end of Whidbey Island and was initially the only freshwater lake in the park. The historic district, located near Highway 20 at the east end of the lake, contains six CCC-constructed buildings: three kitchens, two comfort stations and a pump house. CCC workers from Company 266, based at Camp SP-3, graded and cleared the area to create an open grassy zone in front of the lake with mature evergreens studding the landscape. Only one CCC-era building (a bath house) has been removed, and the dock has been replaced, but the rest of the area retains its CCC-era character. Of the trees marked in the master plan for the parking area, 90 percent remained as of 2019 when the district was listed on the National Register.[22]

Contributing structures in the district include a "combination" building used for cooking with a triple stove and a large fireplace; a shelter kitchen overlooking Cranberry Lake; a campstove shelter (one of four similar ones in the park); a pump house; a comfort station since transformed to house a transformer and generator; and a latrine. Sheltered campstoves were considered necessary in the rainy Pacific Northwest. Other contributing features of the historic district are the parking area, which has been updated only in its paving; a stone seawall that defined the swimming area in the lake; a drinking fountain; and the general landscaping of the lakefront beach and picnic area. The architect for the structures in this area is unknown.[22]

Cranberry Lake Caretaker's Area Historic District
Cranberry Lake Caretaker's Area Historic District
U.S. National Register of Historic Places
U.S. Historic district
Location	State Highway 20, Oak Harbor, Washington
Built	1933–1938
Architect	Ellsworth Storey (house)
Architectural style	National Park Service rustic
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004647
Added to NRHP	November 20, 2019
Located just north of the Cranberry Lake bathing and picnic area historic district, the caretaker's area historic district includes several structures built for the park's administrative purposes. The caretaker's residence was designed by Ellsworth Storey to a template he used in many similar park applications. Saddle-notched log walls are placed on a concrete foundation; the roof has intersecting gables. The house is oriented toward a covered porch on the north. An original roof of shakes has been replaced by cedar shingles. The house includes a large masonry chimney. A plan for an identical house to this one, albeit designed for Lewis and Clark State Park, was featured in Park and Recreation Structures magazine. A caretaker's shop and garage and a maintenance shop designed by an unknown architect are also contributing properties to the district, as is a park entrance sign.[23]

North Beach Picnic Area Historic District
North Beach Picnic Area Historic District
U.S. National Register of Historic Places
U.S. Historic district

Shelter at North Beach
Location	State Highway 20, Oak Harbor, Washington
Built	1933–1938
Architect	Robert "Jack" Patterson, Grant D. Ross
Architectural style	National Park Service rustic
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004772
Added to NRHP	November 22, 2019
North Beach is located on Whidbey Island on the south shore of Deception Pass, west of the bridge. Four buildings and a structure are situated on a flat bench behind a long, rocky beach. Kitchens front the beach, while a latrine is located closer to the parking area. The North Beach picnic area was one of the primary areas of the park developed by CCC corps members. Robert "Jack" Patterson and Grant D. Ross designed the North Beach recreational structures, which were built by CCC workers based at Camp SP-3 at Cornet Bay.[24]

Prominent within the historic district is a large community kitchen. This building has large side gables with log columns supporting them at the corners. Other contributing properties include a shelter kitchen, campstove shelter, latrine and drinking fountain. The kitchens and campstove shelter were featured in Park and Recreation Structures. The structures were designed in NPS rustic style with use of stone and brick masonry, peeled logs and split cedar shingles. The landscape, geography, climate, design and land use within the historic district are little altered from the era in which they were built.[24]

Rosario and Bowman Bathing, Picnic and Caretaker's Areas Historic District
Rosario and Bowman Bathing, Picnic and Caretaker's Areas Historic District
U.S. National Register of Historic Places
U.S. Historic district

Cooking shelter at Bowman Bay
Location	Bowman Bay Road, Dewey, Washington
Built	1933–1938
Architect	Ellsworth Storey, Robert "Jack" Patterson, Roland Koepf
Architectural style	National Park Service rustic
MPS	Historic Park Landscapes in National and State Parks MPS
NRHP reference No.	100004772
Added to NRHP	December 4, 2019
This historic district, which encompasses historic elements in the northwest section of the park on Fidalgo Island, includes 17 contributing properties that were erected by CCC corps members between 1933 and 1938. The contributing properties include: a community kitchen, pump house and latrine at Rosario Beach; the entry piers and parking loop at Rosario; a trail between Rosario Beach and Bowman Bay; a bath house, community kitchen, multipurpose building, cooking shelter, drinking fountain, campground and comfort station at Bowman Bay; and several operational structures at Bowman Bay (entry piers, parking loop and park boundary markers; a caretaker's residence, shop and garage; a water storage reservoir; and a barn).[25] The bath house and caretaker's house at Bowman Bay were identical to those at Cranberry Lake.[22]

The structures in the district were designed in the NPS rustic style by Ellsworth Storey, Robert "Jack" Patterson and Roland Koepf. Builders used locally sourced materials, including stone quarried on site, peeled logs and split cedar shingles. The structures in this district were built by CCC Company 948, based at Camp SP-4 near Rosario Beach. In addition to developing the areas around Rosario Beach and Bowman Bay, the company assisted with clearing and grading the northern approaches for the Deception Pass bridges.[25]

Operations
As of 2022, the park had 14 full-time staff, a number that doubled during the summer peak. Paid staff are complemented by numerous volunteers through the Deception Pass Park Foundation to protect tide pools, provide interpretive programs for visitors, clean campgrounds and assist with maintenance.[3] After state budget cuts, the foundation fundraised to underwrite a full-time interpretive specialist position.[2]

The park holds weekly summer American roots music concerts at its amphitheater and hosts artists in residence in a cabin on Ben Ure Island.[3]

In popular culture
Several movies and commercials have been filmed in the park.[3] Movies filmed there include The Ring[26] and Captain Fantastic.[27] The park is also a setting for the mystery novel Deception Pass.[28]

References
 "Deception Pass Bridge". Geographic Names Information System. United States Geological Survey, United States Department of the Interior.
 Scruggs, Gregory (July 1, 2022). "As Deception Pass turns 100, WA's favorite state park cultivates next generation of 'dreams and memories'". Seattle Times. Archived from the original on July 25, 2024. Retrieved January 27, 2026.
 Andrew, Karina (July 1, 2022). "Washington's most beloved state park turns 100". The Everett Herald. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Murphy, Mary (June 12, 2024). "WA's 10 most popular state parks in 2023 — plus some hidden gems". Seattle Times. Archived from the original on January 14, 2026. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Tercero, Christina (May 28, 2005). "Something for Everyone". Whidbey News-Times. p. A8. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 Potter, Steve (May 22, 1985). "Hoypus falls under protective designation". Whidbey News-Times. p. 6. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 "Natural History". Deception Pass Park Foundation. Archived from the original on July 15, 2024. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Slotemaker, Terry. "The Fidalgo Rock Quarry and Convict Camp, Deception Pass". Deception Pass Park Foundation. Archived from the original on May 21, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Dedicate State Park Along Pass". Seattle Union Record. July 22, 1922. p. 2. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 Parks For America. National Park Service. 1964. p. 463. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Graves, Keven R. (December 11, 1991). "Deception Pass Park to add 569 acres of forest". Whidbey News-Times. p. 13. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 Graves, Keven R. (May 19, 1993). "5 million visitors entered gates in '92". Whidbey News-Times. p. 27. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 Page-English, Mike (September 12, 1998). "Whidbey Island is home to some of Puget Sound's oldest trees". Whidbey News-Times. p. B1. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 Ryan, John (May 5, 2022). "Kelp has protected Samish people for millennia. Now it needs their help". KUOW. Archived from the original on October 15, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Deception Pass State Park may be added to the national and state historic registers". Whidbey News-Times. October 2, 2012. Archived from the original on July 20, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "CCC Properties listed in the National Register of Historic Places". National Park Service. 2024. Archived from the original on December 31, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Doody, Mary Kay (May 19, 1993). "'Three C's' helped create park in '30s". Whidbey News-Times. p. 26. Retrieved January 28, 2026 – via Newspapers.com.
 "List of National System Marine Protected Areas". Federal Register. National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration. April 23, 2009. Archived from the original on May 25, 2021. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Becoming a Beach Again" (PDF). Current. Deception Pass Park Foundation. November 2015. pp. 1, 3. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-Comet Bay Fire Circle". NPGallery: Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. December 6, 2019. Archived from the original on September 2, 2025. Retrieved January 27, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-Comet Bay Incinerator". NPGallery: Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. December 6, 2019. Archived from the original on September 1, 2025. Retrieved January 27, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-Cranberry Lake Bathing and Picnic Area Historic District". NPGallery Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. Archived from the original on August 29, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-Cranberry Lake Caretaker's Area Historic District". NPGallery Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. Archived from the original on September 1, 2025. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-North Beach Picnic Area Historic District". NPGallery Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 "Nomination Form: Deception Pass State Park-Rosario and Bowman Bathing, Picnic, and Caretaker's Areas Historic District". NPGallery Digital Asset Management System. National Park Service. December 4, 2019. Archived from the original on September 5, 2025. Retrieved January 27, 2026.
 "Movie filmed at Deception Pass". Whidbey News-Times. December 8, 2001. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Pringle, Joan (September 10, 2014). "Viggo Mortensen films scenes at Rosario Beach". GoAnacortes. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
 Emerson, Earl (1997). Deception Pass. Ballantine Books. ISBN 978-0-345-40069-7. Retrieved January 28, 2026.
vte
Protected areas of Washington
Categories: State parks of Washington (state)Parks in Skagit County, WashingtonParks in Island County, WashingtonProtected areas established in 1922Civilian Conservation Corps in Washington (state)1922 establishments in Washington (state)Parks on the National Register of Historic Places in Washington (state)
This page was last edited on 10 February 2026, at 09:09 (UTC).
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.
St Scholastica Day riot

Article
Talk
Read
View source
View history

Tools
Appearance hide
Text

Small

Standard

Large
Width

Standard

Wide
Color (beta)

Automatic

Light

Dark
Coordinates: 51°45′7″N 1°15′26″W
Featured article
Page semi-protected
From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia
Artist's impression of two groups of individuals fighting; a black flag is flying above one group, and some people are bearing cudgels.
St Scholastica Day riot, as depicted on a 1907 postcard
The St Scholastica Day riot began in Oxford, England, on 10 February 1355, the feast day of St Scholastica. The disturbance began when two students from the University of Oxford complained about the quality of wine served to them in the Swindlestock Tavern, which stood at the crossroads now known as Carfax, in the centre of the town. The students quarrelled with the taverner; the argument quickly escalated to blows. The inn's customers joined in on both sides, and the resulting mêlée turned into a riot. The violence started by the bar brawl continued over three days, with armed gangs entering the town from the countryside to assist the townspeople. University halls and students' accommodation were raided and the inhabitants murdered; there were some reports of scholars being scalped. Around twenty townsfolk were killed, as were up to sixty-three members of the university.

Violent disagreements between townspeople and students had arisen several times previously, and twelve of the twenty-nine coroners' courts held in Oxford between 1297 and 1322 concerned murders by students. The University of Cambridge was established in 1209 by scholars who left Oxford following the lynching of two students by the town's citizens.

King Edward III sent judges to the town with commissions of oyer and terminer to determine what had gone on and to advise what steps should be taken. He came down on the side of the university authorities, who were given additional powers and responsibilities to the disadvantage of the town's authorities. The town was fined 500 marks[a] and its mayor and bailiffs were sent to the Marshalsea prison in London. John Gynwell, the Bishop of Lincoln, imposed an interdict on the town for one year, which banned all religious practices, including services (except on key feast days), burials and marriages; only baptisms of young children were allowed.

An annual penance was imposed on the town: each year, on St Scholastica's Day, the mayor, bailiffs and sixty townspeople were to attend a Mass at the University Church of St Mary the Virgin for those killed; the town was also made to pay the university an annual fine of one penny for each scholar killed. The practice was dropped in 1825; in 1955—the 600th anniversary of the riots—in an act of conciliation the city's mayor was given an honorary degree, while the university's vice-chancellor was made an honorary freeman of the city.

Background
See caption
Map of Oxford, showing some eleventh-century buildings in black. Rivers are in solid blue. Brown buildings and parish boundaries (in dotted blue) are later.[1]
University teaching has been ongoing at Oxford since 1096; its university grew rapidly from 1167 and was given a royal charter in 1248, formalising some of its positions and functions.[2][3] The university was an ecclesiastical institution and while there were lay students, those who attended were called clerks;[b] their heads were expected to be tonsured to show their religious status. Seventeen per cent of the students were monks, and the remainder were overwhelmingly secular clergy—other priests and deacons—between 1200 and 1500.[5]

In 1334 Oxford, a town of 5,000 residents, was the ninth wealthiest settlement in England.[6][c] In 1349 the Black Death affected the town; there are no reliable figures for the deaths in the town, but the mortality rate in England has been estimated at 65 per cent. The historian Guy Lytle observed that Oxford "was certainly hit by plague, but its impact on the university remains an open question".[9][10][11] The town began to recover soon afterwards, but its finances had been deeply affected.[12][13] During the first part of the fourteenth century the population was aware of the decline of Oxford's fortunes, and this coincided with disturbance and unrest between the town and university.[14]

Although co-operation between the university's senior members and the town's burgesses was the norm,[15][16] town and gown rivalry existed and relations would periodically deteriorate into violence.[17] On the occasions when peace settlements were imposed on the two sides, the outcome favoured the university.[18] In 1209 two Oxford scholars were lynched by the town's locals following the death of a woman; most of the masters and students left the town to study elsewhere, including some who settled in Cambridge to start that city's university that year.[19][20] Oxford's university remained shut until the civic authorities requested that a papal legate intercede to bring the matter to a close. That legate, Niccolò de Romanis, included in his judgement of 1214 a clause that stated that if a scholar was arrested by the civic authorities, they would have to hand him over to the Bishop of Lincoln, the archdeacon of the town or the bishop's named deputy, if any of the three requested. This put the students under the protection of the church, giving them privileges over the town's residents.[21][d] In 1248 a Scottish scholar was murdered by the citizens; Robert Grosseteste, the Bishop of Lincoln, enforced a ban of excommunication on the culprits and Henry III fined the town's authorities 80 marks.[15][a] Violence continued to break out periodically and 12 of the 29 coroners' courts held between 1297 and 1322 concerned murders committed by students. Many of these went unpunished by both the university and the law.[26] In February 1298 a citizen was murdered by a student and a student was killed by townspeople, following an attack on one of the town's bailiffs—officers of the court who executed writs; bailiffs were then involved in the rioting that followed. The townsfolk responsible for killing the scholar were excommunicated and the town was fined £200 in damages; there were no punishments given to the students.[27][e] This was the first occasion that the town's bailiffs were recorded as taking part in the violence; it was a feature of several subsequent altercations.[18][28]

Often the scholars rioted among themselves, as they did in 1252, 1267, 1273 and 1333–1334.[16] By the early fourteenth century "altercations and violence between citizens and scholars were commonplace", according to the historian Laurence Brockliss.[17] In a 1314 riot between the two main factions of the university—the Northernmen and the Southernmen—thirty-nine students were known to have committed murder or manslaughter; seven were arrested and the remainder claimed the benefit of clergy and sought religious sanctuary or escaped.[26]

Dispute
Five-storey building at the Carfax crossroads
Site of the Swindlestock Tavern
Square medieval tower at a crossroads
Carfax Tower, then the tower of St Martin's church
On 10 February 1355—St Scholastica's Day—several university students went for a drink at the Swindlestock Tavern.[29][f] The tavern was located in the centre of Oxford, on the corner of St Aldate's and Queen Street, at Quatrevoies (now Carfax); the tavern was a regular drinking spot for the students.[30][31] Two of the group were Walter de Spryngeheuse and Roger de Chesterfield, beneficed clergymen from South West England; de Spryngeheuse was the rector of Cricket St Thomas in Somerset and de Chesterfield was the rector of Ipplepen in Devon.[32] They were served wine by John de Croydon (also given as John Croidon[16]), who was the tavern's vintner;[31] the antiquarian Anthony Wood, among others, describes him as a friend of John de Bereford, who was the tavern's owner and the mayor of Oxford.[33][34] De Spryngeheuse and de Chesterfield complained to de Croydon that the wine was sub-standard and asked that they be served a better drink.[30] De Croydon refused to listen to the complaints and an argument developed between the men.[16] As a result de Chesterfield threw his drink in de Croydon's face. Sources differ on what happened next: according to those sympathetic to the university, de Chesterfield threw his wooden drinking vessel at de Croydon's head; those sympathetic to the townsfolk say the student beat him around the head with the pot.[30] A petition by the town authorities to Parliament said the students "threw the said wine in the face of John Croidon, taverner, and then with the said quart pot beat the said John".[16]

Other customers—both locals and students—joined in the fight, which spilled out of the tavern and onto the crossroads now known as Carfax. Within half an hour the brawl had developed into a riot. To summon assistance, the locals rang the bell at St Martin's, the town's church; the students rang the bells of the University Church of St Mary the Virgin. The chancellor of the university, Humphrey de Cherlton, tried to calm both sides before things got too far out of hand, but arrows were shot at him and he retreated from the scene. Men from both sides armed themselves. When night fell the violence died down; at this stage no-one had been killed or badly wounded.[35]

The following morning, in an attempt to stop any recurrence of the violence, the chancellor issued a proclamation at the churches of St Martin and St Mary that no-one should bear arms, assault anyone or disturb the peace. At the same time, the town's bailiffs were urging townsfolk to arm themselves; the bailiffs were also paying people in the surrounding countryside to come to aid the citizens. About eighty townsmen, armed with bows and other weapons, went to St Giles' Church in the north part of the town, where they knew some scholars were, and chased them to the Augustinian priory, killing at least one student and badly injuring several others on the way.[g] The bells of both the town and university churches were rung to rally the respective factions; students locked and barricaded some of the town's gates, to stop an influx of outsiders coming at them from a new direction.[30][36][32]

Plaque that reads "This was the site of Swindlestock Tavern 1250–1709"
The plaque commemorating the site of the Swindlestock Tavern, which stood between 1250 and 1709
Late in the day of 11 February, up to 2,000 people from the countryside came in through the western gate of the town to join the townsfolk, waving a black banner. The students, unable to fight against such a number, withdrew to their halls where they barricaded themselves in. The citizens broke into inns and hostels; any student who was found in his rented rooms or hiding place was killed or maimed. After the violence subsided that night, the authorities from the town and the university went through the streets proclaiming in the King's name "that no man should injure the scholars or their goods under pain of forfeiture".[32][37][38]

In the early hours of the following morning de Cherlton and other senior members of the university left for nearby Woodstock to meet King Edward III, who was staying in the village. The proclamation from the King to the townsfolk had no effect and the fighting began again. There were reports that some of the scholars were scalped, possibly "in mockery of their clerical tonsures", according to the historian William Pantin.[39][26] The corpses of other students were buried in dunghills, left in the gutters, dumped into privies or cesspits or thrown into the River Thames.[39][40]

By the evening of the third day the violence had died down. Many of the scholars had fled Oxford, and much of the town had been burnt down. Many of the student halls had been plundered or vandalised, except that of Merton College, whose students had a reputation for quietness.[40] There is no known figure for the number of townspeople killed, although the historian Ian Mortimer puts the figure at twenty.[40][41] The number of students killed in the riots is often given as sixty-three.[40][42][43]

Resolution
Artists impression of the end of the riots: the two opposing sides are separated by a clerk reading from a scroll
Ending the St Scholastica Day riot, as depicted on a 1907 postcard
After the rioting ended both the university authorities and the town burghers surrendered the rights of their respective organisations to the King.[39] He sent judges to the town with commissions of oyer and terminer to determine what had gone on and to advise what steps should be taken.[44] Four days later the King restored the rights of the scholars and gave them pardons for any offences. He fined the town 500 marks and sent the town's mayor and bailiffs to the Marshalsea prison in London.[45] While the royal commission was in place, John Gynwell, the Bishop of Lincoln, imposed an interdict on the townspeople, and banned all religious practices, including services, burials and marriages; only baptisms of young children were allowed.[44][45]

On 27 June 1355 Edward issued a royal charter that secured the rights of the university over those of the town. The document gave the chancellor of the university the right to tax bread and drink sold in the town, the power to assay the weights and measures used in commerce in Oxford and its environs,[15] rights relating to the commercial side of Oxford[46] and the power to insist that inhabitants kept their properties in good repair. The town authorities lost the authority to take action in a legal situation involving a student or the university on either side and were left with the power to take action in legal situations only where it involved citizens on both sides.[47] Mortimer observes that Edward brought the matter to a close quickly, in contrast to many legal disputes of the time, which could take several years to be settled. With the French reneging on the Treaty of Guînes—meaning that renewed warfare with both France and Scotland was imminent—he needed the rioting and its underlying causes settled quickly.[48][h]

When the interdict was lifted by the Bishop of Lincoln after over a year, he imposed an annual penance on the town. Each year, on St Scholastica's Day, the mayor, bailiffs and sixty townspeople were to attend St Mary's church for mass for those killed; the town was also made to pay the university an annual fine of one penny for each scholar killed.[51] When each new mayor or sheriff was sworn in, he had to swear to uphold all the university's rights.[44][52]

Aftermath
A series of verses, "Poems Relating to the Riot Between Town and Gown on St. Scholastica's Day", was written; these are in Latin and many are held in the Bodleian, the main research library of the University of Oxford. According to the historian Henry Furneaux, who edited the works in the nineteenth century, they could have been written between 1356 and 1357 or in the early fifteenth century.[53][54][55] The medievalist Arthur Rigg considers the style of the verses is similar to those by the fifteenth-century friar Richard Tryvytlam. Rigg, examining the first poem of the series, considers it to be anti-town in its depiction of the events, quoting:[56]

On homes the cowards launch attacks,
And hack with hatchet and with axe.
Outside they set their fires alight;
The brave their doors defend and fight.[56]

Edward's charter did not end the conflict between the town of Oxford and the university, although there was a hiatus in rioting.[52] There were further incidents over the following centuries, although these were on a much smaller scale than the events of 1355. According to Cobban, "the St Scholastica's Day riot was ... the last of the extreme bloody encounters" between town and gown; subsequent grievances were settled in the courts or by appealing to the government.[57] During the reign of Henry VIII both the university and the town authorities petitioned Thomas Wolsey, the Lord Chancellor, about who held jurisdiction on various points.[58]

The historian C. H. Lawrence observes that the charter "was the climax of a long series of royal privileges which raised the university from the status of a protected resident to that of the dominant power in the city".[59] Scholars were free from interference from or prosecution by the civil authorities and the chancellor's jurisdiction covered both civil and religious matters in the town; it was a unique position for any university in Europe.[60] The power of the university over the commercial aspects of the town ensured that the colleges were able to acquire much of the central areas of Oxford at the expense of merchants, and the dominance of the land ownership by the university, particularly in the Carfax environs, is a result of the settlement following the riots.[14] One unintended corollary of the growing power of the university was that Oxford did not accommodate plays or theatre until the sixteenth century. There were other prominent factors in the lack of development of theatre in Oxford, including a lack of a cathedral in the town—which meant no religious plays were performed for pilgrims—and the town's small and weak guilds were not able to produce them. The historian Roderick Robertson considers that because of the strength of the university compared to the town, "it does not appear strange that the town did not nurture any plays; its strength had constantly been sapped by the growing University".[61]

The annual penance undertaken by the mayor continued until 1825 when the incumbent refused to take part and the practice was allowed to lapse. Several previous mayors had refused to take part in the annual event: they were fined heavily.[51][52] In an act of conciliation on 10 February 1955—the 600th anniversary of the riots—the city's mayor, W. R. Gowers, was given an honorary degree and the university's vice-chancellor, Alic Halford Smith, was made an honorary freeman of the city, at a commemoration of the events.[62][63]

Historiography
The historian Alan Cobban observes that the two contemporary histories of the events differ in their allocation of blame; he considers that "given that propaganda and exaggeration were involved in these accounts, the whole truth may never be found."[64] He identifies two sources of primary documentation, Oxford City Documents, Financial and Judicial, 1258–1665, edited by Thorold Rogers in 1891, and Medieval Archives of the University of Oxford: Vol 1, edited by Herbert Edward Salter in 1920.[65] The historian Jeremy Catto adds Collectanea, edited by Montagu Burrows of the Oxford Historical Society in 1896.[16]

See also
Medieval university
1229 University of Paris strike
Authentica habita
Benefit of clergy
Battle of Carfax
Notes and references
Notes
 A medieval English mark was an accounting unit equivalent to two-thirds of a pound.[23] For comparison, the average wage of an agricultural worker in the 1290s was less than 11⁄2 d a day[24] (equivalent to £16 in 2023).[25]
 "Clerk" is derived from the Latin word clericus and originally meant "man in a religious order, cleric, clergyman".[4]
 The figure is based on the taxable wealth of the citizens.[7]
Oxford was a town until 1542 when Henry VIII founded six new bishoprics, including one for Oxford. City status came with the new diocese.[8]
 The Bishop of Lincoln oversaw the diocese of Lincoln, which was the largest in England and covered Lincolnshire, Bedfordshire, Buckinghamshire, Huntingdonshire, Leicestershire, Northamptonshire, Rutland and Oxfordshire.[22]
 £200 equates to approximately £208,000 in 2023, according to calculations based on the Consumer Price Index measure of inflation.[25] For comparison, the average wage of an agricultural worker in the 1290s was less than 11⁄2 d a day[24] (equivalent to £16 in 2023).[25]
 The spelling is also given in sources as 'Swyndlestock'.[17]
 The priory was situated where Wadham College now stands.[36]
 By the autumn of 1355 Edward III was in northern France leading an army against that of John II of France, the French King, while at the same time his son the Black Prince led his destructive grande chevauchée 675 miles from English-held Bordeaux to the Mediterranean and back.[49][50]
References
 Parker 1871, pp. 75, 81.
 Hackett 1984, p. 82.
 "Introduction and History". University of Oxford.
 "clerk". Oxford English Dictionary.
 Brockliss 2016, pp. 31–32.
 Glasscock 1976, p. 184; Harding 1993, p. 126.
 Glasscock 1976, p. 184.
 Beckett 2017, pp. 13–14.
 Lytle 1974, pp. 125–126.
 Courtenay 1980, p. 697.
 Benedictow 2021, p. 863.
 Chance et al. 1979, paragraph 35.
 Workman 2012, p. 83.
 Crossley 1979, p. 17.
 Cobban 1992, p. 260.
 Catto 1984, p. 167.
 Brockliss 2016, p. 16.
 Crossley 1979, p. 16.
 "Early Records". University of Cambridge.
 Leedham-Green 1996, p. 3.
 Brockliss 2016, pp. 13–15.
 McHardy 2001, p. 17.
 Harding 2002, p. xiv.
 Clark 2007, p. 99.
 Clark 2023.
 Musgrave 1972.
 Cobban 1992, p. 261.
 Carrel 2009, p. 302.
 Hackett 1984, p. 76.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 72.
 Honey 2003, p. 9.
 Pantin 1972, p. 100.
 Wood 1792, p. 457.
 Catto 1984, p. 160.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 72; Honey 2003, p. 9; Boardman 1994, p. 29; Morris 2001, p. 54.
 Honey 2003, p. 10.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 73.
 Morris 2001, p. 54.
 Pantin 1972, p. 101.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 74.
 Mortimer 2008, p. 313.
 "The St Scholastica Day Riot". University Church.
 Horan 1999, p. 165.
 Lawrence 1984, p. 147.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 75.
 Cobban 2002, p. 190.
 Brockliss 2016, p. 18.
 Mortimer 2008, p. 313–314.
 Rogers 2014, pp. 296–304.
 Wagner 2006, p. 95–96.
 Cobban 1992, p. 262.
 Cheetham 1971, p. 76.
 Burrows 1896, pp. 165–166.
 Evans 2007, p. 258.
 Rigg 1992, p. 262.
 Rigg 1992, p. 269.
 Cobban 1992, pp. 262–263.
 Evans 2010, pp. 133–134.
 Lawrence 1984, p. 138.
 Lawrence 1984, pp. 138–139.
 Robertson 1969, pp. 41–42.
 "Town and Gown Make it up". The Manchester Guardian.
 "Oxford Recalls a Day in 1355". The Times.
 Cobban 2002, pp. 193–194.
 Cobban 2002, p. 193.
Sources
Books
Beckett, John (2017). City Status in the British Isles, 1830–2002. Abingdon, Oxfordshire: Routledge. ISBN 978-1-3519-5126-5.
Benedictow, Ole J. (2021). The Complete History of the Black Death. Woodbridge, Suffolk: Boydell and Brewer. ISBN 978-1-7874-4931-2.
Boardman, Carl (1994). Oxfordshire Sinners and Villains. Stroud, Gloucestershire: Alan Sutton Publishing. ISBN 978-0-7509-0416-2.
Brockliss, L. W. B. (2016). The University of Oxford: A History. Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-924356-3.
Burrows, Montagu, ed. (1896). Collectanea. Oxford: Clarendon Press. OCLC 832219035.
Catto, J. I. (1984). "Citizens, Scholars and Masters". In Catto, J. I. (ed.). The History of the University of Oxford. Vol. 1: The Early Oxford Schools. Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 151–192. ISBN 978-0-19-951011-5.
Chance, Eleanor; Colvin, Christina; Cooper, Janet; Day, C. J.; Hassall, T. G.; Jessup, Mary; Selwyn, Nesta (1979). "Medieval Oxford". In Crossley, Alan; Elrington, C. R. (eds.). A History of the County of Oxford. Vol. 4, The City of Oxford. Oxford: Oxford University Press. pp. 3–73. ISBN 978-0-1972-2714-5.
Cheetham, Hal (1971). Portrait of Oxford. London: Hale. ISBN 978-0-7091-2415-3.
Cobban, Alan (1992). The Medieval English Universities: Oxford and Cambridge to c. 1500. Berkeley, California: University of California Press. ISBN 978-0-5200-6244-3.
Cobban, Alan (2002). English University Life in the Middle Ages. London: Routledge. ISBN 978-1-135-36395-6.
Crossley, Alan (1979). A History of the County of Oxford. Vol. 4, The City of Oxford. London: Victoria County History. ISBN 978-0-1972-2714-5.
Evans, G. R. (2007). John Wyclif. Oxford: Lion Hudson. ISBN 978-0-7459-5291-8.
Evans, G. R. (2010). The University of Oxford: A New History. London: I.B.Tauris. ISBN 978-0-85773-025-1.
Glasscock, R. E. (1976). "England circa 1334". In Darby, Henry Clifford (ed.). A New Historical Geography of England Before 1600. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. pp. 136–185. ISBN 978-0-521-29144-6.
Hackett, M. B. (1984). "The University as a Corporate Body". In Catto, J. I. (ed.). The History of the University of Oxford: The Early Oxford Schools. Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 37–96. ISBN 978-0-19-951011-5.
Harding, Alan (1993). England in the Thirteenth Century. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-31612-5.
Harding, V. (2002). The Dead and the Living in Paris and London, 1500–1670. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-52181-126-2.
Honey, Derek (10 November 2003). Oxford Beyond the University. Witney, Oxfordshire: Affleck Press. ISBN 978-0-9546-3030-0.
Horan, David (1999). Oxford: A Cultural and Literary Companion. Oxford: Signal Books. ISBN 978-1-902669-05-2.
Lawrence, C. H. (1984). "The University in State and Church". In Catto, J. I. (ed.). The History of the University of Oxford: The Early Oxford Schools. Oxford: Clarendon Press. pp. 97–150. ISBN 978-0-19-951011-5.
Leedham-Green, E. S. (1996). A Concise History of the University of Cambridge. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-43978-7.
Lytle, Guy (1974). "Patronage Patterns and Oxford Colleges c. 1300–c. 1530". In Stone, Lawrence (ed.). The University in Society. Princeton, New Jersey: Princeton University Press. pp. 111–150. ISBN 978-0-6910-5213-7.
McHardy, A. K. (2001). The Age of War and Wycliffe: Lincoln Diocese and Its Bishop in the Later Fourteenth Century. Lincoln, Lincolnshire: Lincoln Cathedral Publications. ISBN 978-1-8705-6124-2.
Morris, Jan (2001). Oxford. Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-280136-4.
Mortimer, Ian (2008). The Perfect King: The Life of Edward III, Father of the English Nation. London: Vintage. ISBN 978-0-7953-3548-8.
Pantin, W. A. (1972). Oxford Life in Oxford Archives. Oxford: Clarendon Press. ISBN 978-0-1982-2351-1.
Parker, James (1871). On the History of Oxford During the Tenth and Eleventh Centuries, (912–1100). Oxford. OCLC 1051525769.
Rigg, A. G. (1992). A History of Anglo-Latin Literature, 1066–1422. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-5214-1594-1.
Rogers, Clifford (2014) [2000]. War Cruel and Sharp: English Strategy under Edward III, 1327–1360. Woodbridge, Suffolk: Boydell Press. ISBN 978-0-8511-5804-4.
Wagner, John A. (2006). Encyclopedia of the Hundred Years War (PDF). Westport, Connecticut: Greenwood Press. ISBN 978-0-3133-2736-0. Archived from the original (PDF) on 16 July 2018.
Wood, Anthony (1792). The History and Antiquities of the University of Oxford. Oxford: Printed for the editor. OCLC 22265745.
Workman, Herbert B. (2012). John Wyclif; A Study of the English Medieval Church. Vol. 1. Eugene, Oregon: Wipf and Stock Publishers. ISBN 978-1-62032-569-8.
Journals and magazines
Carrel, Helen (2009). "The Ideology of Punishment in Late Medieval English Towns". Social History. 34 (3): 301–320. doi:10.1080/03071020902981626. ISSN 0307-1022. JSTOR 25594368.
Clark, Gregory (2007). "The Long March of History: Farm Wages, Population, and Economic Growth, England 1209-1869". The Economic History Review. 60 (1): 97–135. doi:10.1111/j.1468-0289.2006.00358.x. ISSN 0013-0117. JSTOR 4121997.
Courtenay, William J. (1980). "The Effect of the Black Death on English Higher Education". Speculum. 55 (4): 696–714. doi:10.2307/2847661. ISSN 0038-7134. JSTOR 2847661.
Musgrave, L. Curtis (February 1972). "Medieval University Life". History Today. 22 (2). ISSN 0018-2753.
Robertson, Roderick (March 1969). "Oxford Theatre in Tudor Times". Educational Theatre Journal. 21 (1): 41–50. doi:10.2307/3205776. ISSN 0013-1989. JSTOR 3205776.
News sources
"Oxford Recalls a Day in 1355". The Times. 11 February 1955. p. 10.
"Town and Gown Make it up". The Manchester Guardian. 11 February 1955. p. 16.
Websites
Clark, Gregory (2023). "The Annual RPI and Average Earnings for Britain, 1209 to Present (New Series)". MeasuringWorth. Retrieved 30 January 2018.
"clerk". Oxford English Dictionary (Online ed.). Oxford University Press. Retrieved 20 April 2025. (Subscription or participating institution membership required.)
"Early Records". University of Cambridge. 28 January 2013. Retrieved 18 November 2019.
"Introduction and History". University of Oxford. Retrieved 15 November 2019.
"The St Scholastica Day Riot". University Church. Retrieved 3 December 2019.
External links
"Poems Relating to the Riot Between Town and Gown on St. Scholastica's Day", 1896
vte
Riots in England
12th–17th centuries	
1189–1190 Massacres of the JewsThe revolt of 11961355 St Scholastica Day riot1381 Peasants' Revolt Treason Act 13811517 Evil May Day1668 Bawdy House riots
18th century	
1710 Sacheverell riots1714 Coronation riots1715 England riots Riot Act1766 food riots1766 Nottingham cheese riot1768 Massacre of St George's Fields1769 Spitalfield riots1780 Gordon riots1791 Priestley riots1793 Bristol Bridge riot1795 Revolt of the housewives
19th century	
1809 Old Price riots1816 Spa Fields riots1816 Ely and Littleport riots1819 Peterloo Massacre1821 Cinderloo Uprising1830 Swing riots Captain Swing1831 reform riots 1831 Bristol riots1832 Days of May1838 Battle of Bossenden Wood1842 Pottery Riots1865 Leeds dripping riot1866 Hyde Park demonstration1887 Bloody Sunday1896 Newlyn riots
20th century	
1900s–1940s	
1907 Brown Dog riots1919 Epsom riot1919 Battle of Bow Street1919 Luton Peace Day riots1932 Old Market riot (Bristol)1932 National Hunger March1936 Battle of Cable Street1943 Battle of Bamber Bridge1944 Park Street riot1945 Aldershot riot
1950s–1970s	
1958 Notting Hill race riots1968 student riots1970 Garden House riot1974 Red Lion Square disorders1975 Chapeltown riot1977 Battle of Lewisham1979 Death of Blair Peach
1980s	
1980 St Pauls riot1981 England riots 1981 Brixton riot1981 Chapeltown riots1981 Toxteth riots1981 Moss Side riot1981 Handsworth riots1985 Handsworth riots1985 Brixton riot1985 Broadwater Farm riot Murder of Keith Blakelock1987 Chapeltown riot1989 Dewsbury riot
1990s	
1990 Poll Tax riots1990 Strangeways Prison riot1991 Meadow Well riots1991 Handsworth riots1992 Hartcliffe riot (Bristol)1993 Welling riots1994 Criminal Justice Bill riot1995 Manningham riot1995 Brixton riot1996 Trafalgar Square riots1999 Carnival Against Capital riot
21st century	
2000s	
2001 Bradford riots2001 Oldham riots2001 Harehills riot2005 Birmingham riots2009 G20 London summit protests Death of Ian Tomlinson2009 Upton Park riot
2010s	
2010 UK student protests2011 Stokes Croft riot (Bristol)2011 UK anti-austerity protests2011 London anti-cuts protest2011 England riots Killing of Mark DugganHouse of Reeves fireTimeline
2020s	
George Floyd protests in the United Kingdom Actions against memorials in the United Kingdom during the George Floyd protests2022 Leicester unrest2024 Harehills riot2024 United Kingdom riots
Reports	
1981 Scarman report
Related	
Riots in LeedsRiots in LondonRiot ActPublic Order Act 1986Territorial Support Group
Portals:
flag England
icon Middle Ages
icon Oxfordshire
 University of Oxford


Categories: 1355 in England14th-century riotsAlcohol-related crimesConflicts in 1355History of the University of OxfordMedieval wineMurder in OxfordshireRiots and civil disorder in OxfordStudent protests in EnglandStudent riots
This page was last edited on 10 February 2026, at 16:27 (UTC).
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.
According to published reports by Bloomberg News on March 30, 2022, Apple turned over data such as phone numbers, physical addresses, and IP addresses to hackers posing as law enforcement officials using forged documents. The law enforcement requests sometimes included forged signatures of real or fictional officials. When asked about the allegations, an Apple representative referred the reporter to a section of the company policy for law enforcement guidelines, which stated, "We review every data request for legal sufficiency and use advanced systems and processes to validate law enforcement requests and detect abuse."[258]
ELIZA is an early natural language processing computer program developed from 1964 to 1967[1] at MIT by Joseph Weizenbaum.[2][3][page needed] Created to explore communication between humans and machines, ELIZA simulated conversation by using a pattern matching and substitution methodology that gave users an illusion of understanding on the part of the program, but had no representation that could be considered really understanding what was being said by either party.[4][5][6] Whereas the ELIZA program itself was written (originally)[7] in MAD-SLIP, the pattern matching directives that contained most of its language capability were provided in separate "scripts", represented in a lisp-like representation.[8] The most famous script, DOCTOR, simulated a psychotherapist of the Rogerian school (in which the therapist often reflects back the patient's words to the patient),[9][10][11] and used rules, dictated in the script, to respond with non-directional questions to user inputs. As such, ELIZA was one of the first chatbots (originally "chatterbots") and one of the first programs capable of attempting the Turing test.[12][13]

Weizenbaum intended the program as a method to explore communication between humans and machines. He was surprised that some people, including his secretary, attributed human-like feelings to the computer program,[3][page needed] a phenomenon that came to be called the ELIZA effect. Many academics believed that the program would be able to positively influence the lives of many people, particularly those with psychological issues, and that it could aid doctors working on such patients' treatment.[3][page needed][14] While ELIZA was capable of engaging in discourse, it could not converse with true understanding.[15] However, many early users were convinced of ELIZA's intelligence and understanding, despite Weizenbaum's insistence to the contrary.[6]

The original ELIZA source code had been missing since its creation in the 1960s, as it was not common to publish articles that included source code at that time. However, more recently the MAD-SLIP source code was discovered in the MIT archives and published on various platforms, such as the Internet Archive.[16] The source code is of high historical interest since it demonstrates not only the specificity of programming languages and techniques at that time, but also the beginning of software layering and abstraction as a means of achieving sophisticated software programming.

Overview

A conversation between a human and ELIZA's DOCTOR script
Joseph Weizenbaum's ELIZA, running the DOCTOR script, created a conversational interaction somewhat similar to what might take place in the office of "a [non-directive] psychotherapist in an initial psychiatric interview"[17] and to "demonstrate that the communication between man and machine was superficial".[18] While ELIZA is best known for acting in the manner of a psychotherapist, the speech patterns are due to the data and instructions supplied by the DOCTOR script.[19] ELIZA itself examined the text for keywords, applied values to said keywords, and transformed the input into an output; the script that ELIZA ran determined the keywords, set the values of keywords, and set the rules of transformation for the output.[20] Weizenbaum chose to make the DOCTOR script in the context of psychotherapy to "sidestep the problem of giving the program a data base of real-world knowledge",[3][page needed] allowing it to reflect back the patient's statements to carry the conversation forward.[3][page needed] The result was a somewhat intelligent-seeming response that reportedly deceived some early users of the program.[21]

Weizenbaum named his program ELIZA after Eliza Doolittle, a working-class character in George Bernard Shaw's Pygmalion (also appearing in the musical My Fair Lady, which was based on the play and was hugely popular at the time). According to Weizenbaum, ELIZA's ability to be "incrementally improved" by various users made it similar to Eliza Doolittle,[20] since Eliza Doolittle was taught to speak with an upper-class accent in Shaw's play.[9][22] However, unlike the human character in Shaw's play, ELIZA is incapable of learning new patterns of speech or new words through interaction alone. Edits must be made directly to ELIZA's active script in order to change the manner by which the program operates.

Weizenbaum first implemented ELIZA in his own SLIP list-processing language, where, depending upon the initial entries by the user, the illusion of human intelligence could appear, or be dispelled through several interchanges.[2] Some of ELIZA's responses were so convincing that Weizenbaum and several others have anecdotes of users becoming emotionally attached to the program, occasionally forgetting that they were conversing with a computer.[3][page needed] Weizenbaum's own secretary reportedly asked Weizenbaum to leave the room so that she and ELIZA could have a real conversation. Weizenbaum was surprised by this, later writing: "I had not realized ... that extremely short exposures to a relatively simple computer program could induce powerful delusional thinking in quite normal people."[23]

In 1966, interactive computing (via a teletype) was new. It was 11 years before the personal computer became familiar to the general public, and three decades before most people encountered attempts at natural language processing in Internet services like Ask.com or PC help systems such as Microsoft Office Clippit.[24] Although those programs included years of research and work, ELIZA remains a milestone because it was the first time a programmer had attempted such a human-machine interaction with the goal of creating the illusion (however brief) of human–human interaction.[25]

At the ICCC 1972, ELIZA was brought together with another early artificial-intelligence program named PARRY for a computer-only conversation. While ELIZA was built to speak as a doctor, PARRY was intended to simulate a patient with schizophrenia.[26]

Design and implementation
Weizenbaum originally wrote ELIZA in MAD-SLIP for CTSS on an IBM 7094 as a program to make natural-language conversation possible with a computer.[27] To accomplish this, Weizenbaum identified five "fundamental technical problems" for ELIZA to overcome: the identification of key words, the discovery of a minimal context, the choice of appropriate transformations, the generation of responses in the absence of key words, and the provision of an editing capability for ELIZA scripts.[20] Weizenbaum solved these problems and made ELIZA such that it had no built-in contextual framework or universe of discourse.[19] However, this required ELIZA to have a script of instructions on how to respond to inputs from users.[6]

ELIZA starts its process of responding to an input by a user by first examining the text input for a "keyword".[5] A "keyword" is a word designated as important by the acting ELIZA script, which assigns to each keyword a precedence number, or a RANK, designed by the programmer.[15] If such words are found, they are put into a "keystack", with the keyword of the highest RANK at the top. The input sentence is then manipulated and transformed as the rule associated with the keyword of the highest RANK directs.[20] For example, when the DOCTOR script encounters words such as "alike" or "same", it would output a message pertaining to similarity, in this case "In what way?",[4] as these words had high precedence number. This also demonstrates how certain words, as dictated by the script, can be manipulated regardless of contextual considerations, such as switching first-person pronouns and second-person pronouns and vice versa, as these too had high precedence numbers. Such words with high precedence numbers are deemed superior to conversational patterns and are treated independently of contextual patterns.[citation needed]

Following the first examination, the next step of the process is to apply an appropriate transformation rule, which includes two parts: the "decomposition rule" and the "reassembly rule".[20] First, the input is reviewed for syntactical patterns in order to establish the minimal context necessary to respond. Using the keywords and other nearby words from the input, different disassembly rules are tested until an appropriate pattern is found. Using the script's rules, the sentence is then "dismantled" and arranged into sections of the component parts as the "decomposition rule for the highest-ranking keyword" dictates. The example that Weizenbaum gives is the input "You are very helpful", which is transformed to "I are very helpful". This is then broken into (1) empty (2) "I" (3) "are" (4) "very helpful". The decomposition rule has broken the phrase into four small segments that contain both the keywords and the information in the sentence.[20]

The decomposition rule then designates a particular reassembly rule, or set of reassembly rules, to follow when reconstructing the sentence.[5] The reassembly rule takes the fragments of the input that the decomposition rule had created, rearranges them, and adds in programmed words to create a response. Using Weizenbaum's example previously stated, such a reassembly rule would take the fragments and apply them to the phrase "What makes you think I am (4)", which would result in "What makes you think I am very helpful?". This example is rather simple, since depending upon the disassembly rule, the output could be significantly more complex and use more of the input from the user. However, from this reassembly, ELIZA then sends the constructed sentence to the user in the form of text on the screen.[20]

These steps represent the bulk of the procedures that ELIZA follows in order to create a response from a typical input, though there are several specialized situations that ELIZA/DOCTOR can respond to. One Weizenbaum specifically wrote about was when there is no keyword. One solution was to have ELIZA respond with a remark that lacked content, such as "I see" or "Please go on".[20] The second method was to use a "MEMORY" structure, which recorded prior recent inputs, and would use these inputs to create a response referencing a part of the earlier conversation when encountered with no keywords.[28] This was possible due to Slip's ability to tag words for other usage, which simultaneously allowed ELIZA to examine, store, and repurpose words for usage in outputs.[20]

While these functions were all framed in ELIZA's programming, the exact manner by which the program dismantled, examined, and reassembled inputs is determined by the operating script. The script is not static and can be edited, or a new one created, as is necessary for the operation in the context needed. This would allow the program to be applied in multiple situations, including the well-known DOCTOR script, which simulates a Rogerian psychotherapist.[16]

A Lisp version of ELIZA, based on Weizenbaum's CACM paper, was written shortly after that paper's publication by Bernie Cosell.[29][30] A BASIC version appeared in Creative Computing in 1977 (although it was written in 1973 by Jeff Shrager).[31] This version, which was ported to many of the earliest personal computers, appears to have been subsequently translated into many other versions in many other languages. Shrager claims not to have seen either Weizenbaum's or Cosell's versions.

In 2021, Jeff Shrager searched MIT's Weizenbaum archives, along with MIT archivist Myles Crowley, and found files labeled Computer Conversations. These included the complete source code listing of ELIZA in MAD-SLIP, with the DOCTOR script attached. The Weizenbaum estate gave permission to open-source this code under a Creative Commons CC0 public domain license. The code and other information can be found on the ELIZAGEN site.[30] The 1965 source code has been dated as part of a software archaeology project which brings together researchers from USC, University of Sussex, Oxford, and Stanford University, who have worked together to unravel the complicated history of ELIZA.[32]

In December 2024, Rupert Lane, with the assistance of several other engineers who had been studying the original MAD-SLIP ELIZA, brought up the original ELIZA and demonstrated that the implementation of ELIZA based on the discovered code can reproduce almost exactly the published conversations with ELIZA from Weizenbaum's 1966 paper. This original ELIZA was reconstructed using the vast majority of the 1965 version of the source code: approximately 96% of the functions.[33] This was run on a version of the original MIT CTSS running on a 7094 emulator, both of the latter due to David Pitts.[34][35]

Another version of Eliza popular among software engineers is the version that comes with the default release of GNU Emacs, and which can be accessed by typing M-x doctor from most modern Emacs implementations.

Pseudocode
From Figure 15.5, Chapter 15 of Speech and Language Processing (third edition).[36]

function ELIZA GENERATOR(user sentence) returns response
   Let w be the word in sentence that has the highest keyword rank
   if w exists
       Let r be the highest ranked rule for w that matches sentence
       response ← Apply the transform in r to sentence
       if w = 'my'
           future ← Apply a transformation from the ‘memory’ rule list to sentence
           Push future onto the memory queue
       else (no keyword applies)
           Either
               response ← Apply the transform for the NONE keyword to sentence
           Or
               response ← Pop the oldest response from the memory queue
   Return response
Response and legacy
Lay responses to ELIZA were disturbing to Weizenbaum and motivated him to write his book Computer Power and Human Reason: From Judgment to Calculation, in which he explains the limits of computers, as he wants to make clear his opinion that the anthropomorphic views of computers are just a reduction of human beings or any life form for that matter.[37] In the independent documentary film Plug & Pray (2010) Weizenbaum said that only people who misunderstood ELIZA called it a sensation.[38]

David Avidan, who was fascinated with future technologies and their relation to art, desired to explore the use of computers for writing literature. He conducted several conversations with an APL implementation of ELIZA and published them – in English, and in his own translation to Hebrew – under the title My Electronic Psychiatrist – Eight Authentic Talks with a Computer. In the foreword, he presented it as a form of constrained writing.[39]

There are many programs based on ELIZA in different programming languages. For MS-DOS computers, some Sound Blaster cards came bundled with Dr. Sbaitso, which functions like the DOCTOR script. Other versions adapted ELIZA around a religious theme, such as ones featuring Jesus (both serious and comedic), and another Apple II variant called I Am Buddha. The 1980 game The Prisoner incorporated ELIZA-style interaction within its gameplay. In 1988, the British artist and friend of Weizenbaum Brian Reffin Smith created two art-oriented ELIZA-style programs written in BASIC, one called "Critic" and the other "Artist", running on two separate Amiga 1000 computers and showed them at the exhibition "Salamandre" in the Musée du Berry, Bourges, France. The visitor was supposed to help them converse by typing in to "Artist" what "Critic" said, and vice versa. The secret was that the two programs were identical. GNU Emacs formerly had a psychoanalyze-pinhead command that simulates a session between ELIZA and Zippy the Pinhead.[40] The Zippyisms were removed due to copyright issues, but the DOCTOR program remains.

ELIZA has been referenced in popular culture and continues to be a source of inspiration for programmers and developers focused on artificial intelligence. It was also featured in a 2012 exhibit at Harvard University titled "Go Ask A.L.I.C.E.", as part of a celebration of mathematician Alan Turing's 100th birthday. The exhibit explores Turing's lifelong fascination with the interaction between humans and computers, pointing to ELIZA as one of the earliest realizations of Turing's ideas.[1]

ELIZA won a 2021 Legacy Peabody Award. A 2023 preprint reported that ELIZA beat OpenAI's GPT-3.5, the model used by ChatGPT at the time, in a Turing test study. However, it did not outperform GPT-4 or real humans.[41][42]

Eliza Effect
Main article: ELIZA effect
The Eliza effect borrowed its name from ELIZA the chatbot. This effect is first defined in Fluid Concepts and Creative Analogies: Computer Models and the Fundamental Mechanisms of Thought[43] as humans' interpretations that some computer programs understand the user inputs and make analogies.

These interpretations can potentially manipulate and misinform users. When interacting and communicating with chatbots, users can be overly confident in the reliability of the chatbots' answers. Other than misinforming, the chatbot's human-mimicking nature can also cause severe consequences, especially for younger users who lack a sufficient understanding of the chatbot's mechanism.

References
 "Alan Turing at 100". Harvard Gazette. September 13, 2012. Retrieved February 22, 2016.
 Berry, David M. (2018). "Weizenbaum, ELIZA and the End of Human Reason". In Baranovska, Marianna; Höltgen, Stefan (eds.). Hello, I'm Eliza: Fünfzig Jahre Gespräche mit Computern [Hello, I'm Eliza: Fifty Years of Conversations with Computers] (in German) (1st ed.). Berlin: Projekt Verlag. pp. 53–70. ISBN 978-3-89733-467-0.
 Weizenbaum 1976.
 Norvig, Peter (1992). Paradigms of Artificial Intelligence Programming. New York: Morgan Kaufmann Publishers. pp. 151–154. ISBN 978-1-55860-191-8.
 Weizenbaum, Joseph (January 1966). "ELIZA--A Computer Program for the Study of Natural Language Communication Between Man and Machine". Communications of the ACM. 9: 36–45. doi:10.1145/365153.365168. S2CID 1896290.
 Baranovska, Marianna; Höltgen, Stefan, eds. (2018). Hello, I'm Eliza fünfzig Jahre Gespräche mit Computern (1st ed.). Bochum: Bochum Freiburg projektverlag. ISBN 978-3-89733-467-0. OCLC 1080933718.
 "ELIZAGEN - The Original ELIZA". sites.google.com. Archived from the original on August 13, 2021. Retrieved May 31, 2021.
 Berry, David M. (November 6, 2023). "The Limits of Computation: Joseph Weizenbaum and the ELIZA Chatbot". Weizenbaum Journal of the Digital Society. 3 (3). doi:10.34669/WI.WJDS/3.3.2. ISSN 2748-5625.
 Dillon, Sarah (January 2, 2020). "The Eliza effect and its dangers: from demystification to gender critique". Journal for Cultural Research. 24 (1): 1–15. doi:10.1080/14797585.2020.1754642. ISSN 1479-7585. S2CID 219465727.
 Bassett, Caroline (2019). "The computational therapeutic: exploring Weizenbaum's ELIZA as a history of the present". AI & Society. 34 (4): 803–812. doi:10.1007/s00146-018-0825-9.
 "The Samantha Test". The New Yorker. Archived from the original on July 31, 2020. Retrieved May 25, 2019.
 Marino, Mark (2006). Chatbot: The Gender and Race Performativity of Conversational Agents. University of California.
 Marino, Mark C.; Berry, Dav id M. (November 3, 2024). "Reading ELIZA: Critical Code Studies in Action". Electronic Book Review.
 Colby, Kenneth Mark; Watt, James B.; Gilbert, John P. (1966). "A Computer Method of Psychotherapy". The Journal of Nervous and Mental Disease. 142 (2): 148–52. doi:10.1097/00005053-196602000-00005. PMID 5936301. S2CID 36947398.
 Shah, Huma; Warwick, Kevin; Vallverdú, Jordi; Wu, Defeng (2016). "Can machines talk? Comparison of Eliza with modern dialogue systems" (PDF). Computers in Human Behavior. 58: 278–95. doi:10.1016/j.chb.2016.01.004.[permanent dead link]
 Shrager, Jeff; Berry, David M.; Hay, Anthony; Millican, Peter (2022). "Finding ELIZA - Rediscovering Weizenbaum's Source Code, Comments and Faksimiles". In Baranovska, Marianna; Höltgen, Stefan (eds.). Hello, I'm Eliza: Fünfzig Jahre Gespräche mit Computern (2nd ed.). Berlin: Projekt Verlag. pp. 247–248.
 Weizenbaum 1976, p. 188.
 Epstein, J.; Klinkenberg, W. D. (2001). "From Eliza to Internet: A brief history of computerized assessment". Computers in Human Behavior. 17 (3): 295–314. doi:10.1016/S0747-5632(01)00004-8.
 Wortzel, Adrianne (2007). "ELIZA REDUX: A Mutable Iteration". Leonardo. 40 (1): 31–6. doi:10.1162/leon.2007.40.1.31. JSTOR 20206337. S2CID 57565169.
 Weizenbaum, Joseph (1966). "ELIZA—a computer program for the study of natural language communication between man and machine". Communications of the ACM. 9: 36–45. doi:10.1145/365153.365168. S2CID 1896290.
 Wardrip-Fruin, Noah (2009). Expressive Processing: Digital Fictions, Computer Games, and Software Studies. Cambridge, Massachusetts: MIT Press. p. 33. ISBN 978-0-262-01343-7. OCLC 827013290.
 Markoff, John (March 13, 2008), "Joseph Weizenbaum, Famed Programmer, Is Dead at 85", The New York Times, retrieved January 7, 2009.
 Weizenbaum 1976, p. 7.
 Meyer, Robinson (June 23, 2015). "Even Early Focus Groups Hated Clippy". The Atlantic. Retrieved November 7, 2023.
 Weizenbaum, Joseph (1966). "ELIZA — A Computer Program For the Study of Natural Language Communication Between Man and Machine". Communications of the ACM. 9 (1): 36–45. doi:10.1145/365153.365168.
 Megan, Garber (June 9, 2014). "When PARRY Met ELIZA: A Ridiculous Chatbot Conversation From 1972". The Atlantic. Archived from the original on January 18, 2017. Retrieved January 19, 2017.
 Walden, David; Van Vleck, Tom, eds. (2011). "Compatible Time-Sharing System (1961-1973): Fiftieth Anniversary Commemorative Overview" (PDF). IEEE Computer Society. Retrieved February 20, 2022. Joe Wiezenbaum's most famous CTSS project was ELIZA
 Wardip-Fruin, Noah (2014). Expressive Processing: Digital Fictions, Computer Games, and Software Studies. Cambridge: The MIT Press. p. 33. ISBN 978-0-262-01343-7 – via eBook Collection (EBSCOhost).
 "Coders at Work: Bernie Cosell". codersatwork.com.
 "elizagen.org". elizagen.org.
 Big Computer Games: Eliza – Your own psychotherapist at www.atariarchives.org.
 Marino, Dav id M. Berry Mark C. (November 3, 2024). "Reading ELIZA: Critical Code Studies in Action". Electronic Book Review.
 Berry, David M. (2025). "Digital Ruins and Critical Code Studies: Towards an Ethics of Historical Software Reconstruction". Stunlaw. Retrieved January 26, 2025.
 "ELIZA Reanimated". elizagen.org.
 Killgrove, Kristina (January 18, 2025). "'ELIZA,' the world's 1st chatbot, was just resurrected from 60-year-old computer code". Live Science. Retrieved January 18, 2025.
 "Chatbots & Dialogue Systems" (PDF). stanford.edu. Retrieved April 6, 2023.
 Berry, David M. (2014). Critical theory and the digital. London: Bloomsbury Publishing. ISBN 978-1-4411-1830-1. OCLC 868488916.
 maschafilm. "Content: Plug & Pray Film – Artificial Intelligence – Robots". plugandpray-film.de.
 Avidan, David (2010), Collected Poems, vol. 3, Jerusalem: Hakibbutz Hameuchad, OCLC 804664009.
 "lol:> psychoanalyze-pinhead". IBM. Archived from the original on October 23, 2007.
 Edwards, Benj (December 1, 2023). "1960s chatbot ELIZA beat OpenAI's GPT-3.5 in a recent Turing test study". Ars Technica. Retrieved December 3, 2023.
 Jones, Cameron R.; Bergen, Benjamin K. (April 20, 2024), Does GPT-4 pass the Turing test?, arXiv:2310.20216
 Hofstadter, Douglas R. (1995). Fluid concepts & creative analogies: computer models of the fundamental mechanisms of thought. Fluid Analogies Research Group. New York, NY: Basic Books. ISBN 978-0-465-02475-9.
Bibliography
Norvig, Peter (1992), ELIZA: Paradigms of Artificial Intelligence Programming, San Francisco: Morgan Kaufmann Publishers, pp. 151–154, 159, 163–169, 175, 181, ISBN 978-1-55860-191-8.
Wardip-Fruin, Noah (2014), Expressive Processing: Digital Fictions, Computer Games, and Software Studies, Cumberland: MIT Press, pp. 24–36, ISBN 978-0-262-51753-9.
Weizenbaum, Joseph (1976), Computer power and human reason: from judgment to calculation, W. H. Freeman and Company, p. 6, ISBN 978-0-7167-0463-8.
Whitby, Blay (1996), "The Turing Test: AI's Biggest Blind Alley?", in Millican, Peter; Clark, Andy (eds.), Machines and Thought: The Legacy of Alan Turing, vol. 1, Oxford University Press, pp. 53–62, ISBN 978-0-19-823876-8, archived from the original on June 19, 2008, retrieved August 11, 2008.
Further reading
McCorduck, Pamela (2004), Machines Who Think (2nd ed.), Natick, Massachusetts: A. K. Peters, ISBN 1-5688-1205-1
External links
ELIZAGEN - Weizenbaum's original code for ELIZA
Collection of several source code versions at GitHub
dialogues with colorful personalities of early AI at the Wayback Machine (archived January 20, 2013), a collection of dialogues between ELIZA and various conversants, such as a company vice president and PARRY (a simulation of a paranoid schizophrenic)
Weizenbaum. Rebel at work Archived 2021-02-25 at the Wayback Machine – Peter Haas, Silvia Holzinger, Documentary film with Joseph Weizenbaum and ELIZA.
CORECURSIVE #078; The History and Mystery Of Eliza; With Jeff Shrager – Adam Gordon Bell interviews Jeff Shrager, author of the 1973/77 BASIC ELIZA, and discoverer of the original ELIZA code.
ELIZA Reanimated ELIZAGen.org blog post describing Rupert Lane's restoration of the original MAD-SLIP ELIZA running on CTSS on a 7094 emulator
Authority control databases Edit this at Wikidata	
ELMCIP
Categories: History of artificial intelligenceChatbotsHealth softwarePsychotherapyPublic-domain software with source code1960s electronic literature worksAmerican electronic literature works1966 software
This page was last edited on 8 February 2026, at 15:56 (UTC).
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike 4.0 License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.



"""
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════
# 👆 EDIT THE CORPUS TEXT ABOVE! Add or change anything! 👆
# ═══════════════════════════════════════════════════════════

class MLLM:
    def __init__(self, context_window=50):
        self.corpus = ""
        self.tokens = []
        self.context_window = context_window
        self.vocabulary = set()
        self.ngram_models = {}  # {n: {ngram_tuple: {next_word: count}}}
        self.token_freq = Counter()
        self.trained = False
        self.context_history = []
        self.vocabulary_size = 0
        self.entropy = 0
        self.perplexity = 0
        
    def tokenize(self, text):
        """Smart tokenization with punctuation and words"""
        text = text.lower()
        # Split on whitespace and punctuation
        tokens = re.findall(r'\b\w+\b|[.!?,;:\'"()]', text)
        return [t for t in tokens if t.strip()]
    
    def train(self, corpus):
        """Train the model with multiple n-grams (1-20)"""
        print("🚀 Training MLLM...")
        self.corpus = corpus
        self.tokens = self.tokenize(corpus)
        self.vocabulary = set(self.tokens)
        self.vocabulary_size = len(self.vocabulary)
        self.token_freq = Counter(self.tokens)
        
        # Build n-gram models from 1 to 20
        for n in range(1, 21):
            print(f"  Building {n}-gram model...", end=" ")
            self.ngram_models[n] = self._build_ngram_model(n)
            print(f"✓ ({len(self.ngram_models[n])} unique {n}-grams)")
        
        # Calculate entropy and perplexity
        self._calculate_metrics()
        
        self.trained = True
        print(f"\n✅ Model trained successfully!")
        print(f"   📊 Vocabulary size: {self.vocabulary_size}")
        print(f"   📈 Entropy: {self.entropy:.3f}")
        print(f"   📉 Perplexity: {self.perplexity:.3f}")
        print(f"   💾 Total tokens: {len(self.tokens)}")
        
    def _build_ngram_model(self, n):
        """Build n-gram frequency model"""
        ngram_dict = defaultdict(lambda: defaultdict(int))
        
        for i in range(len(self.tokens) - n):
            ngram = tuple(self.tokens[i:i+n])
            next_token = self.tokens[i+n]
            ngram_dict[ngram][next_token] += 1
        
        return dict(ngram_dict)
    
    def _calculate_metrics(self):
        """Calculate entropy and perplexity"""
        total_prob = 0
        count = 0
        
        for token in self.tokens:
            freq = self.token_freq[token]
            prob = freq / len(self.tokens)
            if prob > 0:
                total_prob += -math.log2(prob)
                count += 1
        
        self.entropy = total_prob / count if count > 0 else 0
        self.perplexity = 2 ** self.entropy
    
    def _get_ngram_prediction(self, context_tokens, n):
        """Get prediction from specific n-gram model"""
        if n > len(context_tokens):
            return None
        
        ngram = tuple(context_tokens[-n:])
        
        if ngram in self.ngram_models[n]:
            predictions = self.ngram_models[n][ngram]
            return predictions
        
        return None
    
    def _weighted_random_choice(self, predictions, temperature=0.7):
        """Choose word based on frequency with temperature scaling"""
        if not predictions:
            return random.choice(list(self.vocabulary))
        
        words = list(predictions.keys())
        counts = list(predictions.values())
        
        # Apply temperature scaling
        total = sum(counts)
        probs = [c / total for c in counts]
        probs = [p ** (1/temperature) for p in probs]
        total = sum(probs)
        probs = [p / total for p in probs]
        
        # Custom weighted random choice (compatible with older Python)
        rand = random.random()
        cumulative = 0
        for word, prob in zip(words, probs):
            cumulative += prob
            if rand <= cumulative:
                return word
        return words[-1]  # Fallback
    
    def predict_next_word(self, context):
        """Intelligent prediction using multiple n-grams"""
        context_tokens = self.tokenize(context)
        
        # Try from largest n-gram down to smallest
        for n in range(min(20, len(context_tokens)), 0, -1):
            predictions = self._get_ngram_prediction(context_tokens, n)
            if predictions:
                return self._weighted_random_choice(predictions, temperature=0.8)
        
        # Fallback to most frequent words
        return self.token_freq.most_common(1)[0][0]
    
    def generate_response(self, user_input, max_length=25):
        """Generate intelligent response"""
        if not self.trained:
            return "❌ Model not trained yet! Please train with corpus first."
        
        response = user_input + " "
        response_tokens = self.tokenize(response)
        
        for _ in range(max_length):
            next_word = self.predict_next_word(" ".join(response_tokens))
            
            if next_word in ['.', '!', '?']:
                response_tokens.append(next_word)
                break
            
            response_tokens.append(next_word)
        
        response = " ".join(response_tokens)
        return response.replace(" .", ".").replace(" !", "!").replace(" ?", "?")
    
    def add_to_context(self, text):
        """Add text to context window"""
        tokens = self.tokenize(text)
        self.context_history.extend(tokens)
        
        if len(self.context_history) > self.context_window:
            self.context_history = self.context_history[-self.context_window:]
    
    def get_context_display(self):
        """Display current context window"""
        return " ".join(self.context_history[-self.context_window:])
    
    def get_stats(self):
        """Return model statistics"""
        return {
            "trained": self.trained,
            "vocabulary_size": self.vocabulary_size,
            "total_tokens": len(self.tokens),
            "entropy": round(self.entropy, 3),
            "perplexity": round(self.perplexity, 3),
            "ngram_count": len(self.ngram_models),
            "context_window": self.context_window,
            "corpus_chars": len(self.corpus)
        }
    
    def analyze_corpus(self):
        """Analyze corpus statistics"""
        words = [t for t in self.tokens if re.match(r'\w+', t)]
        sentences = self.corpus.count('.') + self.corpus.count('!') + self.corpus.count('?')
        
        stats = {
            "characters": len(self.corpus),
            "tokens": len(self.tokens),
            "words": len(words),
            "sentences": max(1, sentences),
            "unique_tokens": len(self.vocabulary),
            "avg_token_length": round(sum(len(t) for t in self.tokens) / len(self.tokens), 2),
            "top_10_words": self.token_freq.most_common(10)
        }
        return stats

def print_header():
    """Print fancy header"""
    print("\n" + "="*60)
    print("  🧠 MLLM - Micro Language Model (Advanced)")
    print("  Multiple N-Grams (1-20), 50 Context Window")
    print("  ✨ Very Smart for its size- great for a lightweight autocorrect.")
    print("="*60 + "\n")

def print_menu():
    """Print main menu"""
    print("\n" + "-"*60)
    print("MAIN MENU:")
    print("  [1] Train Model (uses corpus above)")
    print("  [2] Chat with MLLM")
    print("  [3] Show Model Stats")
    print("  [4] Analyze Corpus")
    print("  [5] Exit")
    print("-"*60)

def main():
    print_header()
    
    model = MLLM(context_window=50)
    
    while True:
        print_menu()
        choice = input("Enter choice (1-5): ").strip()
        
        if choice == '1':
            print("\n📚 TRAINING MODEL")
            print(f"Using {len(CORPUS.split())} words from corpus...")
            model.train(CORPUS)
            print("\n✅ Ready to chat! Type anything in the next menu.")
        
        elif choice == '2':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Please train the model first (Option 1)")
                continue
            
            print("\n💬 CHAT WITH MLLM")
            print("Type 'BACK' to return to main menu")
            print("-"*60)
            
            chat_history = []
            while True:
                user_input = input("\n🧑 You: ").strip()
                
                if user_input.upper() == 'BACK':
                    break
                
                if not user_input:
                    continue
                
                model.add_to_context(user_input)
                response = model.generate_response(user_input)
                
                print(f"🤖 MLLM: {response}")
                print(f"📍 Context Window: {model.get_context_display()[:100]}...")
        
        elif choice == '3':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Model not trained yet!")
                continue
            
            stats = model.get_stats()
            print("\n📊 MODEL STATISTICS")
            print("-"*60)
            print(f"✅ Status: {'Trained' if stats['trained'] else 'Not Trained'}")
            print(f"📈 Vocabulary Size: {stats['vocabulary_size']} unique tokens")
            print(f"💾 Total Tokens: {stats['total_tokens']}")
            print(f"🔢 Entropy: {stats['entropy']} bits")
            print(f"📉 Perplexity: {stats['perplexity']:.2f}")
            print(f"🧩 N-Gram Models: {stats['ngram_count']} (1-20 grams)")
            print(f"🪟 Context Window: {stats['context_window']} tokens")
            print(f"📝 Corpus Size: {stats['corpus_chars']} characters")
            print("-"*60)
        
        elif choice == '4':
            if not model.trained:
                print("❌ Model not trained yet!")
                continue
            
            analysis = model.analyze_corpus()
            print("\n📖 CORPUS ANALYSIS")
            print("-"*60)
            print(f"📝 Characters: {analysis['characters']}")
            print(f"🔤 Tokens: {analysis['tokens']}")
            print(f"📚 Words: {analysis['words']}")
            print(f"📄 Sentences: {analysis['sentences']}")
            print(f"✨ Unique Tokens: {analysis['unique_tokens']}")
            print(f"📏 Avg Token Length: {analysis['avg_token_length']}")
            print(f"\n🔝 Top 10 Most Frequent Words:")
            for i, (word, count) in enumerate(analysis['top_10_words'], 1):
                print(f"   {i}. '{word}' - {count} times")
            print("-"*60)
        
        elif choice == '5':
            print("\n👋 Thanks for using MLLM! Goodbye!\n")
            break
        
        else:
            print("❌ Invalid choice! Please enter 1-5")

if __name__ == "__main__":
    main()

